Finance function high performance capability assessment 
US-8204809-B1
Accenture Global Services Limited
2012-06-19
https://patents.google.com/patent/US8204809B1/en
PRIORITY CLAIM
This application claims the benefit of priority to U.S. provisional patent application assigned Ser. No. 61/092,225 filed in the United States Patent and Trademark Office on Aug. 27, 2008.
BACKGROUND OF THE INVENTION
1. Technical Field
This disclosure concerns a system and method to identify the performance capability of the finance functions of an organization on a scale of representative capabilities. In particular, this disclosure relates to an efficient and cost effective way to assess the performance capability level of key assessment areas of the finance functions within the processes of an organization.
2. Background Information
Businesses in every industry must adapt to an increasingly competitive environment and execute in a clear, consistent, and efficient manner. Furthermore, the global nature of most industries greatly increases the complexity and difficulty of surviving on a day to day basis, let alone growing and prospering.
Despite the need for a business to meet the challenges of the global marketplace, often the business lacks clarity, consistency, and well-defined execution of an improvement program directed to finance transformation. Many chief financial officers (CFOs) fail to measure finance cost and performance in a rigorous way, such as the resources expended on finance, the costs by process and in comparison with other businesses in similar industries. Often, CFOs lack the information necessary to prioritize improvement initiatives, develop a compelling business case for such initiatives and measure performance improvement consistently. These shortcomings severely constrain the business, and lead directly to inefficiencies and waste due to unnecessary complexity, process exceptions, and customer dissatisfaction. At the same time, identifying specific processes to which improvements may be made can be very difficult, either because the business itself does not have the expertise to identify the processes or because the complexities of the business frustrate attempts to clearly delineate the processes to be improved.
Even if the business can identify one of the many processes that need to improve, the business may not know how to improve the process or be able to identify a concrete and measurable improvement goal. Another difficulty exists in determining whether intermediate goals exist that should be reached along the way. As a result, businesses struggle to meet the demands of the modern global marketplace and fail to identify cost reduction opportunities for margin improvement to reach other important goals.
Therefore, a need exists for an efficient and effective system and method to assess the performance capability level of key assessment areas within the processes of an organization.
SUMMARY
A finance function high performance capability assessment (FF-HPCA) model helps businesses meet the challenges of the global marketplace by defining a scale of performance capability along which the current practices of the business may be located. The FF-HPCA model accelerates the discovery of process and capability gaps within business operations. In addition, the FF-HPCA model also helps the business to identify specific areas in which improvements may be made, how to make the improvements, and how to establish levels of capability during the course of attempting to achieve an ultimate capability goal. As a result, the business can achieve the clarity, consistency, and well-defined execution of core processes that reduce inefficiencies and waste.
The FF-HPCA model includes a key factor dimension and a performance capability scale dimension. The performance capability scale dimension defines multiple capability levels. The performance capability levels may form a scale of increasing organizational performance capability. One example of such a scale includes a ‘Basic’ capability level, a ‘Competitive’ capability level, and a ‘Market Leading’ capability level. Each performance capability level includes criteria specific to a corresponding finance function key assessment area. Each finance function key assessment area identifies some aspect of a finance function capability of a business.
Finance function process capabilities of a business may be grouped into platforms. For example, the FF-HPCA model may group the finance function capabilities of an organization into a high-level platform (e.g., finance process excellence platform). Platforms may include sub-platforms, as well as capabilities, and capabilities may include other capabilities (e.g., sub-capabilities). For example, the finance process excellence platform may include a ‘finance function management’ platform, finance and accounting operations platform, enterprise performance management, corporate finance platform and enterprise risk management platform. Examples of capabilities within the finance function management platform may include a manage finance organization capability and a drive enterprise wide change capability.
The key factor dimension establishes a set of key assessment areas in which to analyze the capabilities of a business. Key assessment areas include performance capability criteria. Performance capability criteria populate the performance capability assessment model. The performance capability criteria may be specific to any one of many different business capabilities. For example, the vision and strategy platform includes performance capability criteria for external analysis and internal business planning key assessment areas at each of the capability levels along the performance capability scale dimension and in each of the key assessment areas along the key factor dimension. Any number of performance capability assessment models and performance capability criteria may be defined and stored in a capability detail pool for subsequent retrieval and application to a business under examination. Accordingly, the FF-HPCA model provides a flexible and adaptive scale of performance capability against which finance function business practices may be compared to ascertain where the finance function capabilities of a business under examination fall along the scale.
Other systems, methods, features and advantages will be, or will become, apparent to one with skill in the art upon examination of the following figures and detailed description. All such additional systems, methods, features and advantages are included within this description, are within the scope of the invention, and are protected by the following claims.

BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF THE DRAWINGS
The performance capability assessment model and system may be better understood with reference to the following drawings and description. The elements in the figures are not necessarily to scale, emphasis instead being placed upon illustrating the principles of the capability assessment techniques. In the figures, like-referenced numerals designate corresponding parts throughout the different views.
 FIG. 1 shows an example of high-level platforms that organize capabilities in a finance function high performance capability assessment (FF-HPCA) model.
 FIG. 2 shows a FF-HPCA model with a performance capability scale and performance capability criteria.
 FIG. 3 shows a FF-HPCA model with sub-capabilities within the manage finance organization capability.
 FIG. 4 illustrates a FF-HPCA model with sub-capabilities within the general accounting and reporting (record to report) capability.
 FIG. 5 shows a multidimensional business performance reference set where key assessment performance reference tables may be collected and stored.
 FIG. 6 shows a capability assessment system.
 FIG. 7 shows a flow diagram for establishing high performance capability assessment models.
 FIG. 8 shows a flow diagram for retrieving and applying high performance capability assessment models.
 FIG. 9 shows a flow diagram for analyzing representative practice data to determine a business key assessment area to which representative practice data applies.
 FIG. 10 illustrates capabilities within the ‘manage finance organization’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance function management’ platform.
 FIG. 11 illustrates additional capabilities within the ‘manage finance organization’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance function management’ platform.
 FIG. 12 illustrates capabilities within the ‘drive enterprise wide change’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance function management’ platform.
 FIG. 13 illustrates capabilities within the ‘record transactions’ capability corresponding to the general accounting and reporting (record to report) capability.
 FIG. 14 illustrates capabilities within the ‘perform inter-company accounting’ capability and the ‘manage interfaces’ capability corresponding to the general accounting and reporting (record to report) capability.
 FIG. 15 illustrates capabilities within the ‘analyze and reconcile accounts’ capability corresponding to the general accounting and reporting (record to report) capability.
 FIG. 16 illustrates capabilities within the ‘close books and consolidate financial results’ capability corresponding to the general accounting and reporting (record to report) capability.
 FIG. 17 illustrates capabilities within the ‘perform financial reporting’ capability corresponding to the general accounting and reporting (record to report) capability.
 FIG. 18 illustrates capabilities within the ‘perform regulatory reporting’ capability and ‘perform management reporting’ capability corresponding to the general accounting and reporting (record to report) capability.
 FIG. 19 illustrates capabilities within the ‘maintain accounting master data’ capability corresponding to the general accounting and reporting (record to report) capability.
 FIG. 20 illustrates capabilities within the ‘fixed asset accounting’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 21 illustrates additional capabilities within the ‘fixed asset accounting’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 22 illustrates capabilities within the ‘purchase to pay’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 23 illustrates additional capabilities within the ‘purchase to pay’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 24 illustrates additional capabilities within the ‘purchase to pay’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 25 illustrates additional capabilities within the ‘purchase to pay’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 26 illustrates additional capabilities within the ‘purchase to pay’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 27 illustrates additional capabilities within the ‘purchase to pay’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 28 illustrates capabilities within the ‘travel and expense reimbursement’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 29 illustrates additional capabilities within the ‘travel and expense reimbursement’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 30 illustrates capabilities within the ‘order to cash’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 31 illustrates additional capabilities within the ‘order to cash’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 32 illustrates additional capabilities within the ‘order to cash’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 33 illustrates additional capabilities within the ‘order to cash’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 34 illustrates additional capabilities within the ‘order to cash’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 35 illustrates additional capabilities within the ‘order to cash’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 36 illustrates capabilities within the ‘product costing and inventory accounting’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 37 illustrates additional capabilities within the ‘product costing and inventory accounting/capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 38 illustrates capabilities within the ‘finance systems and data structures’ capability corresponding to the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform.
 FIG. 39 illustrates capabilities within the ‘strategic planning and shareholder value targeting’ capability corresponding to the ‘enterprise performance management’ platform.
 FIG. 40 illustrates capabilities within the ‘target setting’ capability corresponding to the ‘enterprise performance management’ platform.
 FIG. 41 illustrates capabilities within the ‘planning, resource allocation and forecasting’ capability corresponding to the ‘enterprise performance management’ platform.
 FIG. 42 illustrates capabilities within the ‘performance reporting and analytics’ capability corresponding to the ‘enterprise performance management’ platform.
 FIG. 43 illustrates capabilities within the ‘internal controls’ capability corresponding to the ‘corporate finance’ platform.
 FIG. 44 illustrates capabilities within the ‘treasury and cash management’ capability corresponding to the ‘corporate finance’ platform.
 FIG. 45 illustrates additional capabilities within the ‘treasury and cash management’ capability corresponding to the ‘corporate finance’ platform.
 FIG. 46 illustrates capabilities within the ‘corporate tax’ capability corresponding to the ‘corporate finance’ platform.
 FIG. 47 illustrates capabilities within the ‘financial risk management’ capability corresponding to the enterprise risk management platform.
 FIG. 48 illustrates capabilities within the ‘non-financial risk management’ capability corresponding to the ‘enterprise risk management’ platform.
 FIG. 49 illustrates a FF-HPCA benchmarking output report.
 FIG. 50 illustrates a FF-HPCA benchmarking cost and FTE summary report.
 FIG. 51 illustrates a FF-HPCA quartile ranking by process-cost and FTEs report.

DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE PREFERRED EMBODIMENTS
The FF-HPCA model establishes a multidimensional performance reference set that includes multiple key assessment performance reference tables. The key assessment performance reference tables include a ‘Basic’ performance capability level, a ‘Competitive’ performance capability level and a ‘Market Leading’ performance capability level. The ‘Basic’ performance capability level specifies ‘Basic’ finance function performance assessment criteria, the ‘Competitive’ performance capability level specifies ‘Competitive’ finance function performance assessment criteria, and the ‘Market Leading’ performance capability level specifies ‘Market Leading’ finance function performance assessment criteria. The FF-HPCA model receives input data that specifies a finance function business platform (e.g., a business area and/or business process) and a finance function key assessment area (e.g., capability and/or business process) for analysis. The FF-HPCA model searches the multidimensional business performance reference set for a matching key assessment performance reference table that matches the business platform and capability within the platform and the key assessment area, and retrieves the matching key assessment performance reference table. The FF-HPCA model initiates analysis of the matching key assessment performance reference table to obtain a resultant performance capability level for the key assessment area.
The FF-HPCA model provides quantitative assessment of finance function costs and performance of an organization, including comparisons to peers, supplemented with qualitative analysis to provide context and to maximize analytical value. The FF-HPCA model identifies and quantifies improvement opportunities through internal and external performance comparisons (e.g., benchmarking metrics within and/or across multiple industries), highlights specific processes, regions, and/or business units that provide the greatest opportunities for cost reductions and/or performance improvement, and establishes a rigorous baseline to measure the impact of future improvements. The FF-HPCA model provides a knowledge base from which to define improvement recommendations, build a confident business case and focus on rigorous metrics and continuous improvement. The FF-HPCA model calculates quartile rankings for each key assessment area of an organization compared to industry benchmarks. The FF-HPCA model calculates the performance level of each finance function key assessment area, including the cost of each key assessment area as a percent of revenue, and the cost of each key assessment area according to full-time equivalents (FTEs) per dollars of revenue (e.g., FTEs/revenue).
Referring briefly to FIGS. 49-51, the FF-HPCA model comprises a finance function process excellence framework, finance function diagnostic tool and benchmarking. The FF-HPCA model analyzes information regarding finance function key assessment areas of an organization, calculates performance results, and produces FF-HPCA model reports, including: FF-HPCA benchmarking output report 4900; FF-HPCA benchmarking cost and FTE summary report 5000; and FF-HPCA quartile ranking by process-cost and FTEs report 5100. The FF-HPCA model reports and the information contained within the reports may be graphically displayed, presented and/or communicated in any number of ways.
 FIG. 1 shows a finance function high performance capability assessment (FF-HPCA) model 100. The FF-HPCA model 100 (e.g., finance process excellence framework) may be implemented as a multi-level hierarchy encompassing all processes for which a CFO may be accountable. The FF-HPCA model 100 specifies a finance process excellence platform (e.g., hierarchy) 102 including a finance function management platform 104, finance and accounting operations platform 106, enterprise performance management 108, corporate finance 110 and enterprise risk management platform 112. Additional, different, or fewer platforms may be used in other implementations, each platform defining additional, different, or fewer capabilities. Each platform includes one or more capabilities. Capabilities within the FF-HPCA model 100 may include sub-capabilities, which may be organized into further sub-capabilities to form a hierarchy as deep as desired to meet any particular implementation target. The platforms and capabilities of the FF-HPCA model 100 form a multi-level hierarchy, as illustrated in FIGS. 10-48.
A capability may include corresponding key assessment areas. Each key assessment area may include or define additional key assessment areas. In other words, a business capability may include sub-capabilities, and therefore, key assessment areas corresponding to the multiple sub-capabilities. Additional, different, or fewer finance function performance assessment criteria may be used in other implementations, each finance function performance assessment criteria corresponding to additional, different, or fewer platforms and/or capabilities.
In one implementation, the finance function management platform 104 includes: a manage finance organization capability 114 and a drive enterprise wide change capability 116. The accounting operations platform 106 includes: a general account and reporting (record to report) capability 118, fixed asset accounting capability 120, purchase to pay capability 122, a travel and expense reimbursements (T&E) capability 124, order to cash capability 126, ‘product costing and inventory accounting’ capability 128, a payroll capability 130 and a ‘maintain finance systems and data structures’ capability 132. The enterprise performance management platform 108 includes: a strategic planning/shareholder value targeting capability 134, a target setting capability 136, a ‘planning, resource allocation and forecasting’ capability 138, and a performance reporting and analytics capability 140. The corporate finance platform 110 includes internal controls capability 142, an inventor relations capability 144, treasury and cash management capability 146, and corporate tax capability 148. The enterprise risk management platform 112 includes: a financial risk management capability 150, and a non-financial risk management capability 152.
 FIG. 2 shows a portion of the FF-HPCA model 100 and multiple capability levels 208. The capability levels 208 establish a scale of increasing organizational performance capability. In FIG. 2, the capability levels 208 include a ‘Basic’ capability level 210, a ‘Competitive’ capability level 212, and a ‘Market Leading’ capability level 214. The FF-HPCA model 100 establishes a performance capability scale 216 along which current business practices may be located and identified with respect to any platform and capability within a platform according to an analysis of performance capability criteria (PCC) (e.g., 220-230).
 FIG. 3 illustrates that each capability within a platform (e.g., the finance function management platform 104) may include additional capabilities (e.g., 302-316). In other words, a business capability may include multiple sub-capabilities. For example, FIG. 3 shows the finance function management platform 104 with the manage finance organization capability 114 with additional capabilities. FIG. 3 shows the manage finance organization capability 114 that further includes an: identify proper role of finance capability 302, understand needs of internal customers capability 304, manage delivery of finance services capability 306, manage cost of finance capability 308, manage performance of finance function capability 310, create/maintain finance organization structure capability 312, manage finance workforce develop finance skills capability 314, and continuously improve finance function capability 316.
Table 1 provides an explanation of the manage finance organization capability 114 and key assessment areas (e.g., capabilities 302-316) within the manage finance organization capability 114. The key assessment areas (e.g., capabilities 302-316) include performance capability criteria (PCC) (e.g., 220-230). A capability under evaluation may be assigned a capability level 208 based on a capability position 218 along the performance capability scale 216 (e.g., the ‘competitive’ capability level 212).
Performance capability criteria (e.g., 220-230) populate the FF-HPCA model 100. The performance capability criteria capture criteria, characteristics, and/or other features of a capability at a particular capability level for a key assessment area. Examples below illustrate performance capability criteria that provide unexpectedly good analysis and benchmarking for the finance functions of an organization. The FF-HPCA model 100 performance capability criteria provide a tool for determining where a platform and capability under examination falls along the performance capability scale 216. For example, process engineers may interview a business or receive data about the business to determine, measure, or otherwise ascertain the characteristics, criteria, and other features of a particular capability implemented within the business. The process engineers may compare the characteristics of the business to the performance capability criteria in the FF-HPCA model 100 and arrive at a capability level 208 for the capability under examination. In doing so, for example, the process engineers may identify where the capability under examination falls in terms of capability level for each key assessment area of a capability and determine an overall position on the performance capability scale 216 for the capability under examination. Performance capability criteria may populate the FF-HPCA model 100 in whole or in part. Multiple high performance capability assessment models may be collected and stored with the performance capability criteria for future retrieval and possible modification in a capability detail pool, discussed below.



 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 1


 


Manage Finance Organization 114


 




 




Description:
Manage Finance Organization includes all aspects 


 
managing and governing the entire finance 


 
organization - including role definition, managing 


 
the cost, service, and performance of the finance


 
function, and managing the finance workforce.


 
These activities are typically performed by the most 


 
senior finance executives including the CFO, CFO 


 
direct reports, and selected individuals designated 


 
by those executives.




Identify Proper Role of Finance 302/


Understand Needs of Internal Customers 304




Basic Criteria:
Focus primarily on GAAP accounting, financial 


210
performance, and traditional governance; finance 


 
does not actively or effectively partner with the 


 
rest of the organization; finance has not explicitly


 
surveyed the needs of internal customers; limited


 
link between customer needs and finance services


 
provided 220


Competitive
Actively partners with other departments but 


Criteria:
potential for better integration remains; provides 


212
some business support and problem resolution 


 
advice but competes with other groups for this


 
role; spends less time than desired on high value


 
activities; finance has informally identified needs 


 
of internal customers 222


Market Leading
Excels at both traditional governance and 


Criteria:
analytics/decision support; large % of time spent 


214
on high value activities; intimate business partner 


 
with business unit (BU) management; has infused 


 
entire enterprise with a value creation mindset and 


 
financial acumen; is considered the “go-to”


 
organization for decision support; has explicitly 


 
identified needs of internal customers; consciously 


 
makes cost vs. service level decisions 224




Manage Cost of Finance 308




Basic Criteria:
May or may not know the true cost of finance; 


210
limited understanding of cost drivers of cost; no 


 
formal cost reduction program 220


Competitive
Has accurately measured total cost of finance; 


Criteria:
understands drivers of cost; has begun strategic 


212
cost reduction program and realized some 


 
benefits 222


Market Leading
Accurately measured total cost of finance; 


Criteria:
understands cost drivers; achieved desired cost 


214
position 224




Organization Structure 312




Basic Criteria:
Organization structure has “evolved” over time 


210
without conscious design; shared services used 


 
for selected transactional processes; limited use 


 
of low cost locations 220


Competitive
Organization structure has been consciously 


Criteria:
designed, but is not yet optimized; heavy use 


212
of shared services center (SSCs)/low cost 


 
locations/outsourcing; ongoing efforts to


 
refine controllership and financial planning 


 
and analysis (FP&A) structures 222


Market Leading
Organization structure has been consciously 


Criteria:
designed and optimized; all transactional 


214
activities in SSCs/low cost locations/outsourced; 


 
centers of excellence (COEs) used where 


 
appropriate; analysts properly aligned with 


 
business units 224




Manage Finance Workforce 314/Develop Finance Skills 314




Basic Criteria:
Basic finance & accounting skills; limited 


210
business acumen, deep specialization, or 


 
analysis capabilities 220


Competitive
Strong finance & accounting skills; moderate 


Criteria:
business acumen/analysis skills; deep specialists 


212
in selected areas; basic value creation mindset 


 
222


Market Leading
Very strong finance & accounting and business 


Criteria:
acumen skills; deep specialists in all relevant 


214
areas; deep understanding of value creation 224




Continuously Improve Finance Function 316




Basic Criteria:
One-off initiatives targeted at “fixing problems/


210
fighting fires”; no formal, clearly defined finance 


 
roadmap; inconsistent tracking of finance metrics 


 
220


Competitive
Continuous improvement mindset, but no formal 


Criteria:
program; collection of individual initiatives; 


212
selected tracking of finance cost/performance 


 
metrics 222


Market Leading
Formal, ongoing improvement program; senior


Criteria:
leader/sponsor; regular tracking of finance cost/


214
performance metrics; constant “raising of the 


 
bar” 224


 





Table 2 describes additional market leading criteria for key assessment areas (e.g., capabilities 302-316) of the ‘manage finance organization’ capability 114. FIGS. 10 and 11 illustrate capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the ‘manage finance organization’ capability 114. Market leading criteria for ‘identify proper role of finance’ capability 302 may include: maintaining a key role in the management team; actively participating in all key decisions affecting the future of the company; and redirecting time from transaction processing, data gathering and reconciliation.
Market leading criteria for ‘understand needs of internal customer’ capability 304 may include: formally surveying users of finance services to better understand the needs and wants as well as the users' perceptions of finance capabilities; leveraging an online survey tool (e.g., for broad surveys) and/or a standard interview guide (e.g., for more focused surveys); repeating surveys as part of an ongoing cycle and measuring changes over time; and modifying content and delivery of finance services, as appropriate based on identified needs and wants of internal customers.
Market leading criteria for ‘manage delivery of finance services’ capability 306 may include: management possessing a deep understanding of company strategy and value drivers; and assessing opportunities to add value based on the company strategy and value drivers, along with a rigorous definition of the role that finance plays (e.g., low cost provider of basic finance services, and/or intimate business partner). Market leading criteria for ‘manage delivery of finance services’ capability 306 may include: publishing formal quarterly communications (e.g., a web postcard) to all executives above a certain level that highlight relevant changes in finance services, new initiatives, and results of satisfaction surveys; and the communications may be a combination of information, education and internal marketing.
Market leading criteria for ‘manage cost of finance’ capability 308 may include: leveraging cost collection templates and guidelines to ensure all costs are captured consistently; identifying finance costs incurred outside of the “finance budget”; and decomposing capabilities by process (e.g., record-to-report and purchase-to-pay capabilities), by function (e.g., controllership and treasury), by cost type (e.g., people and technology), by activity (e.g., data gathering and analysis), and/or by geography. Market leading criteria for ‘manage cost of finance’ capability 308 may further include: identifying cost drivers and root causes of any cost issues; evaluating the cost of various finance components in connection with the relative value add of each of the various finance components; setting formal cost reduction targets based on benchmarking analysis and/or other objective measures. Establishing formal cost reduction targets may allow finance to better prioritize cost reduction activities and measure progress. Market leading criteria for ‘manage cost of finance’ capability 308 may further include: engaging a formal cost reduction program lead by a single senior executive with oversight of all individual cost reduction efforts in order to make meaningful progress against cost reduction objectives; managing all transactional and general accounting and reporting activities, and selected reporting and analytics that are standard and/or recurring; locating centralized activities in low cost locations (e.g., on, near, or off-shore) based on cost versus quality trade-offs.
A complex IT architecture may be a significant driver of cost (e.g., excess data gathering, reconciliation, data entry, and IT maintenance). Accordingly, market leading criteria for ‘manage cost of finance’ capability 308 may include standardizing on a single enterprise resource management (ERP) system and decommissioning legacy systems. The efficiency of “down-stream” activities (e.g., accounts payable) may be heavily influenced by “up-stream” activities (e.g., purchasing). Accordingly, market leading criteria for ‘manage cost of finance’ capability 308 may include global end-to-end processes (e.g., ‘record to report’—R2R, ‘purchase to pay’—P2P, and ‘order to cash’—OTC) that maximize efficiency and create seamless hand-offs between entities.
Market leading criteria for ‘manage cost of finance’ capability 308 may reflect a conscious trade-off between costs and service levels. For example, the use of technology may heavily facilitate a self service model (e.g., a web portal to deliver finance reports). Common data structures and definitions reduce data gathering and reconciliation time, streamline reporting and analysis, and eliminate uncertainty regarding particular terms used (e.g., “customer”, “headcount”, and “fixed cost”). Market leading criteria for ‘manage cost of finance’ capability 308 may include employing a formal cost control framework, making managers throughout the organization responsible for cost control within the framework and helping the managers understand the cost implications of actions.
Market leading criteria for ‘manage performance of finance function’ capability 310 may include: identifying a list of metrics that cover the spectrum of finance performance; rationalizing the list of metrics based on the level of impact on the finance function and the organization as a whole; setting formal performance targets based on benchmarking analysis and/or other objective measures; and setting formal targets to better prioritize improvement initiatives and measure progress. Market leading criteria for ‘manage performance of finance function’ capability 310 may include: assigning primary responsibility for each metric to an executive with the authority and influence to drive improvement in each assigned metric; integrating the performance reviews of the finance function into the overall cycle of enterprise performance reviews; and delivering finance function metrics via web based portal, as well as enterprise wide metrics.
Market leading criteria for ‘create/maintain finance organization structure’ capability 312 may include: consciously defining the finance organization structure rather than allowing the structure to simply “evolve” over time; periodically reviewing the structure for effectiveness; and re-structuring the organization as necessary. Market leading criteria for ‘create/maintain finance organization structure’ capability 312 may include: designing finance organization structures that are responsive to overall organization objectives and take into consideration the role of finance (e.g., low cost provider of basic finance services, intimate business partner). Examples considerations include transaction processing (e.g., low cost objective and clerical skills), GAAP reporting (e.g., accuracy objective and CPA skills), decision support (e.g., business partnering objective and MBA skills), and specialized expertise (e.g., various objectives and highly specialized skills). Market leading criteria for ‘create/maintain finance organization structure’ capability 312 may include: tightly aligning decision support resources and co-locating resources with the management teams the resources support to allow more effective business partnering; while having decision support resources report directly to the CFO to allow better, standards, consistency, finance career paths, skills development.
Market leading criteria for ‘create/maintain finance organization structure’ capability 312 may further include: for each major finance process, function and activity, formally defining the inputs, roles, and outputs for corporate finance and business unit (BU) finance; and defining working relationships and “hand-offs” between the corporate finance and BU finance. BU, plant, and geography specific finance may be physically co-located with their respective management team, the BU, plant, and geography specific finance report directly to the CFO (even though a “strong dotted line” relationship might exist); CFO should control the hiring, firing, and career development of all finance employees along with the finance budget and the scope, content, and delivery of finance services; one exception is Internal Audit which should report to the Audit Committee of the Board. Examples include investor relations and strategic planning.
Shadow finance organizations hinder efforts to drive consistency, financial control, and low cost. For example, a manager may create a “finance team” with a direct reporting relationship to the manager inconsistent with the organization structure. Market leading criteria for ‘create/maintain finance organization structure’ capability 312 may include using organization controls to prevent the creation of “shadow finance” organizations.
Market leading criteria for ‘create/maintain finance organization structure’ capability 312 may include: ensuring that users of finance services have an effective working relationship with a primary finance contact; and authorizing the creation of shared services and outsourcing a “critical mass” of scarce and/or specialized resources to help finance to drive consistency and standardization. Shared services and outsourcing may include essentially all general accounting and transaction processing activities, such as tax, treasury, pricing, high powered analytics, and M&A. True shared services (as opposed to simple centralization) includes a number of components including a formal service delivery model, service level agreements, common processes and technologies, and an appropriate governance structure. Market leading criteria for ‘create/maintain finance organization structure’ capability 312 may include: limiting redundant transaction processing activities performed at the country level; and performing country specific activities in-country on an exception basis only; distributing activities between a “central hub” and selected low cost locations. Though activities may be located in a number of geographic locations, the centers may be a part of a single shared services organization, led by a senior executive, and employ a formal governance structure. In one implementation, rather than a “finance shared services organization”, a “multi-function business services organization may be employed. The benefits of a shared services organization include maximizing economies of scale, integrated facility utilization, a single shared services leadership team, end-to-end process support for cross-functional processes, single face of shared services for all customers and cross functional job rotation and career options.
Market leading criteria for ‘manage finance workforce; develop finance skills’ capability 314 may include: defining the overall role as well as specific responsibilities, of each finance position, maintaining in a “role dictionary”, and be reviewing and updating as necessary; identifying all skills required by finance professionals (e.g., functional, technical, leadership and communications); identifying the mix of skills required for each role and/or career level; and creating a competency model which describes the progression from “basic” skills through “expert”, and identifies the level of mastery required for each role and/or career level. Market leading criteria for ‘manage finance workforce; develop finance skills’ capability 314 may include ensuring that finance professionals possess the ability to: perform typical accounting and control functions, as well as the ability to partner with other functions; instill a value creation mindset in the broader organization; identify and pursuing value creation opportunities; lead change programs; and making and/or influence important business decisions. Market leading criteria for ‘manage finance workforce; develop finance skills’ capability 314 may include employing rotational programs for finance staff and mid-level finance personnel. Rotational programs may provide opportunities for finance personnel to identify more appealing career paths, in addition to providing a broad exposure to the entire finance function, and potentially increasing the breadth of finance skills of the finance personnel. Market leading criteria for ‘manage finance workforce; develop finance skills’ capability 314 may further include: defining various “jumping off” points where executives may cease rotation and become more specialized; and ensuring that individual performance objectives for all finance staff align with finance mission and overall company strategy.
Market leading criteria for ‘continuously improve finance function’ capability 316 may include: ensuring that managers continuously improve cost effectiveness and budgets; performance evaluations reflect continuous improvement as a goal; maintaining an improvement program with a senior leader/sponsor; regular tracking finance cost and performance metrics; maintaining a mechanism to propose and evaluate new improvement ideas, and traditional project management discipline (e.g., stakeholders, project plans, timelines and deliverables). Market leading criteria for ‘continuously improve finance function’ capability 316 may further include: creating a formal framework to identify and evaluate improvement ideas and/or future state capabilities; continuously evaluating needs of the larger enterprise, the role of finance; objectively analyze existing finance capabilities; and implementing an approach for approving initiatives and integrating initiatives into a larger change management program.



 

 
 



TABLE 2


 


Manage Finance Organization 114 - Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




Identify Proper
Active finance participation in key management 


Role of Finance
decisions


302
Significant % of finance time spent on high value 


 
added activities


 
Heavy focus on decision support and analytics


 
Actively instill a value creation mindset and 


 
financial acumen into the enterprise


 
State finance's goals clearly in a written vision 


 
statement


Understand
Formally measure needs, wants, and satisfaction


Needs of 
of internal finance customers


Internal
Make changes to content or delivery of finance services


Customer
based on legitimate internal customer desires


304
Hold regular meetings between Finance and business


 
leaders/other department heads to ensure that finance 


 
is clearly focused on the needs of the business


 
Use customer focus groups to resolve specific issues


Manage 
Align finance service delivery with the strategic 


Delivery
objectives of the company


of Finance
Make conscious trade-offs between cost and service 


Services
levels when structuring finance service delivery


306
Formal service level agreements with internal customers


 
Regularly communicate with internal customers 


 
decisions regarding delivery of finance services


Manage Cost 
Formally measure the cost of finance; decompose by


of Finance
process, function, cost type, by activity, and/or by


308
geography


 
Analyze finance cost to understand cost drivers and


 
relative level of value add of each cost component


 
Set formal cost reduction targets


 
Structure formal cost reduction program


 
Maximize the use of shared services and/or outsourcing


 
Leverage use of low cost locations


 
Standardize on a single ERP system; decommission


 
legacy systems


 
Adopt a process view (as opposed to a “department” 


 
view) of activities and design end-to-end processes


 
Rationalize service levels and/or adopt self service 


 
models where practical


 
Adopt common data structures and definitions


 
Make managers throughout the organization 


 
responsible for cost control


 
Reduce complexity of “upstream” processes


Manage
Identify short list of most relevant finance function


Performance 
performance metrics


of Finance 
Set targets for each metric based on benchmarking 


Function
or other objective measure


310
Assign accountability for each metric


 
Hold formal performance reviews


 
Publish performance against selected metrics


 
Continuously monitor performance and take 


 
corrective action as required


Create Finance
Consciously define the desired finance organization


Organization
structure


Structure
Review the organization's strategic objectives; identify


312
finance's role; then design a structure around this


 
Segregate activities requiring different skill sets and 


 
which have different objectives


 
Tightly align decision supportresources with the BU


 
management they support; but directly reporting to the


 
CFO


 
Formally define the working relationship and division 


 
of responsibilities between corporate and business unit


 
finance in the overall design


 
All of finance reports into the CFO organization, 


 
including BU finance personnel


 
Often, “finance related areas” should report to the to 


 
CFO as well


 
Perform no finance activities outside of finance; 


 
eliminate any “shadow finance” organizations


 
All internal customers of finance should have clear 


 
points of contact


 
Maximize the use of shared services and/or outsourcing 


 
as well as use of low cost locations


 
Leverage centers of expertise wherever deep specialized


 
skills are required


 
Maximize the use of true shared services and/or


 
outsourcing in the transaction processing space


 
Eliminate redundancies across countries


 
Employ a global shared services/business process


 
outsourcing (BPO) strategy and model


 
The shared services organization should be a formal


 
organization entity


 
Employ a “multi-function” shared services model


 
Employ standard processes across all business units 


 
and geographies


 
Maximize the use of true shared services and/or


 
outsourcing in the Controllership space


 
Formally define the working relationship and division 


 
of responsibilities between Controllership and FP&A


 
Centralize as much as possible with minimal activities


 
performed at the regional/country level


 
Remove transaction processing from direct Controller


 
responsibility - Focus Corporate Controller group on


 
highest vale activities


 
Formally define the working relationship and division 


 
of responsibilities between corporate and business unit


 
finance in the FP&A decision support space


 
Tightly align decision support resources with the BU


 
management they support; but report hard-line to the 


 
CFO


Manage Finance
Leverage centers of expertise wherever specialized 


Workforce;
skills are required


Develop Finance
Create formal role definitions for all finance positions


Skills
Identify and define the required finance skills for all 


314
career levels and roles and embed in a formal


 
competency model


 
Focus heavily on leadership skills and “MBA skills” 


 
in addition to traditional “CPA skills”


 
Use rotation programs to develop finance skills and 


 
provide broad exposure to the finance function


 
Formal professional development plans for all


 
finance staff


 
Formal succession plans for key finance staff


 
Individual performance objectives for all finance staff


 
Rotate tasks to promote “process thinking” and to 


 
increase motivation and flexibility


 
Review staff performance against the achievement 


 
of pre-defined objectives


 
Use Finance as a training ground for future company


 
leaders


Continuously
Create a continuous improvement mindset and culture


Improve Finance
Pursue finance transformation via a formal program


Function
Identify desired future capabilities based on overall 


316
goals of the organization and an analysis of existing


 
finance capabilities


 





Table 3 provides an explanation of the ‘drive enterprise wide change’ capability 116, key assessment areas within the finance function platform 104 and corresponding performance capability criteria.



 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 3


 


Drive Enterprise Wide Change 116


 




 




Description:
Drive Enterprise Wide Change addresses the finance


 
function's role in educating the enterprise on financial


 
concepts and driving or participating in enterprise wide


 
change programs.




Drive a Value Focus into Enterprise 1202




Basic Criteria:
Heavy focus on “getting the accounting right”, 


210
“making plan” and “increasing current profit”; limited 


 
shareholder value focus; finance as a whole cannot claim 


 
to deeply understand how the enterprise creates share- 


 
holder value 226


Competitive
Finance understands value creation but has not yet infused


Criteria:
the rest of this enterprise with this mindset; more senior


212
employees understand how their actions contribute to the


 
achievement of business goals, but this understanding has


 
not filtered down to lower levels 228


Market Leading
Finance deeply understands shareholder value creation 


Criteria:
and has infused the entire organization with a value 


214
creation mindset and financial acumen; employees at all


 
organizational levels understand how individual actions


 
contribute to achievement of business goals 230




Decision Making Framework




Basic Criteria:
Limited value based analysis is performed; key business


210
decisions are made without adequate information or are


 
based on simplistic frameworks (e.g., expect profit to go 


 
up, impact on capital or risk not considered) 226


Competitive
Business decisions are generally based on value analysis;


Criteria:
profit, cash flow, capital, and risk are all considered; but


212
important information is often unavailable; instinct is 


 
relied on more often executives would prefer 228


Market Leading
All key business decisions are based on rigorous value


Criteria:
analysis prepared with accurate and timely data; profit, 


214
cash flow, capital, and risk (short term and long term) 


 
are all considered; executive experience and instinct 


 
supplements the analysis but does not replace analysis 


 
230




Level of Finance Influence




Basic Criteria:
Finance has only partial control of traditional finance 


210
activities and must often seek “permission” to makes 


 
finance function changes; limited or no finance influence 


 
outside of the finance function 226


Competitive
Finance has complete control over “traditional finance”


Criteria:
activities and can manage the finance function as it sees 


212
fit; finance has only selective influence outside of 


 
finance function however 228


Market Leading 
Finance influence extend well beyond the finance


Criteria:
organization; finance is involved in all major decisions


214
pertaining to the future of the company 230




Act as Change Agent Across the Enterprise 1206




Basic Criteria:
Finance is typically in a reactive mode, racing to respond 


210
to changes driven from elsewhere in the organization; 


 
typically plays a relatively minor role in major business 


 
transformation efforts 226


Competitive
Finance reacts quickly to enterprise-wide change; and


Criteria:
proactively drives changes within its own organization; 


212
but is not truly a change agent across the enterprise; 


 
often plays a key supporting role in major business 


 
transformation efforts 228


Market Leading
Finance is proactive in driving both finance-specific 


Criteria:
and enterprise-wide change aligned with company 


214
strategy and with shareholder value creation; is viewed 


 
as a change agent; often plays a lead role in major 


 
business transformation efforts 230


 





Table 4 describes additional market leading criteria for the capabilities of the ‘drive enterprise wide change’ capability 116. FIG. 12 illustrates a hierarchy of capabilities (e.g., key assessment areas 1202-1206) corresponding to the ‘drive enterprise wide change’ capability 116. Market leading criteria for ‘drive enterprise wide change’ capability 116 may include: ensuring that executives have a clear and consistent understanding of value drivers for the organization that are consistent with shareholder value principles; maintaining and frequently updating a formal enterprise valuation model (e.g., the type used by sell-side equity analysts); ensuring that finance executives are familiar with enterprise valuation model and the primary drivers of shareholder value; and actively incorporating the model into long-term/strategic planning; ensuring that discussions about performance (e.g., analysis of past performance and/or plans for future performance) are grounded in shareholder value; ensuring that finance executives and personnel understand the distinction between current value and future value; ensuring that management devotes sufficient time to managing future value.



 

 
 



TABLE 4


 


Drive Enterprise Wide Change 116 - Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




Drive a Value
Active finance participation in key management 


Focus into the
decisions


Enterprise
Actively instill a value creation mindset and financial


1202
acumen into the enterprise


 
Maintain formal enterprise valuation model


 
Ground all planning and analysis in shareholder value


 
Distinguish between current value and future value


 
Conduct formal and informal training sessions on 


 
the topic of shareholder value creation


 
Communicate regularly with management on 


 
business and financial issues


 
Work to develop financial skills in all key decision-


 
makers (inside and outside of finance)


Act as Change
Actively Identify value creating opportunities 


Agent Across 
across the enterprise


the Enterprise
 


1206


 





 FIG. 4 further illustrates that each capability within a platform (e.g., the finance and accounting operations platform 106) may include additional capabilities (e.g., 402-418). For example, FIG. 4 shows the finance and accounting operations platform 106 with the record to report capability 118 with additional capabilities. FIG. 4 shows the record to report capability 118 that further includes a records transaction capability 402, a perform inter-company account capability 404, a manage interfaces capability 406, an analyze and reconcile accounts capability 408, a close books and consolidate financial results capability 410, a perform financial reporting capability 412, a perform regulatory reporting capability 414, a perform management reporting capability 416 and maintain accounting master data capability 418.
Table 5 provides an explanation of the general accounting and reporting (record to report) capability 118, key assessment areas within the capability and corresponding performance capability criteria. FIG. 12 illustrates capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the ‘record transactions’ capability 402.



 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 5


 


General Accounting & Reporting (Record to Report) 118


 




 




Description:
Record to Report is the end-to-end process that 


 
begins with the collection of source transactions 


 
and other accounting data and ends with the 


 
creation of external statutory reporting. 


 
It encompasses the majority of activities typically


 
referred to as “general accounting”.




Record Transactions 402




Basic Criteria:
Heavy focus on transaction capture, month-end 


210
close, and “getting the accounting right”


Competitive
Close process is a challenge; but moderate focus 


Criteria:
on management reporting and analysis


212
 


Market Leading
Heavy focus on management reporting and analysis 


Criteria:
(rather than just basic accounting)


214
 




Perform Inter-company Accounting 404




Basic Criteria:
Closing and reporting cycle times are slower than 


210
peers.


 
One of the last companies in the industry to report 


 
results after a quarter end


Competitive
Closing and reporting cycle times are consistent 


Criteria:
with peers


212
 


Market Leading
Closing and reporting cycle times are materially 


Criteria:
faster than peers. One of the first companies in 


214
the industry to report results after a quarter end




Accuracy




Basic Criteria:
Financial results finalized after many audit 


210
adjustments.


 
Internal users often question the accuracy of 


 
management reporting. Restatements are 


 
required periodically


Competitive
Limited audit adjustments are required to 


Criteria:
finalize financial results. Internal users 


212
question the accuracy of selected management


 
reporting - but overall it is considered accurate.


 
Restatements are extremely rare


Market Leading
Few, if any, audit adjustments are required to 


Criteria:
finalize financial results. Internal management 


214
reporting is considered highly accurate by all 


 
users. Restatements are essentially unheard of




Reporting Content




Basic Criteria:
Reporting content designed to meet external 


210
reporting requirements is also used for management 


 
reporting. Limited value added management


 
reporting


Competitive
Reporting content feeds distinct management 


Criteria:
reports in addition to financial reports. 


212
Management reporting meets some of the needs 


 
of internal users


Market Leading
Reporting content feeds distinct management 


Criteria:
reports in addition to financial reports. Reporting 


214
is adequate to meet the needs of all users - internal 


 
and external


 





Table 6 describes additional market leading criteria for the capabilities of the ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform 106. Market leading criteria for ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform 106 may include: aligning the organization to support the processes of finance and accounting operations, rather than aligning the processes of finance and accounting operations to fit into organizational silos; and ensuring that entities use the same process, regardless of BU or geography.
General accounting and reporting (record-to-report) (RTR) capability 118 may be deployed to a shared services center (SSC) and/or business process outsourcing (BPO). The transactional portion of RTR is typically a non-core competency for many organizations. Market leading criteria for RTR capability 118 may include deploying RTR to SSR and/or BPO and thereby, reducing operating expenses, and improving controls, scalability and efficiencies by consolidating operations. Market leading criteria for RTR capability 118 may include providing online policy manuals to employees conducting RTR activities; employing service level agreements (SLAs), service management reporting, customer satisfaction surveys, internal audit, and external audits; improving overall performance through proactive management of RTR capability. Market leading criteria for RTR capability 118 may further include: employing incentive compensation to manage attrition and performance in specific areas, and non-monetary incentives to build team morale. Market leading criteria for RTR capability 118 may include controlling operating expenses with a highly leveraged organization; improving service levels, customer interactions, and cycle times and performance by developing specializations, while also cross training personnel. Developing specializations and cross training personnel may be incorporated into initial employee training, training across disciplines (e.g., functional, technical and communications), and training across the RTR process to enable integration and work load balancing, while improving staff performance.



 

 
 



TABLE 6


 


Finance & Accounting Operations 106 - 


Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




General
Leverage a single, standard, end-to-end RTR 


Accounting &
process - across all business units and 


Reporting
geographies


(Record to
Perform the majority of RTR activities using 


Report)
a shared service center or BPO model


118
Utilize flexible sourcing models that take 


 
advantage of cost reductions available by 


 
placing select staff in low cost geographic 


 
locations.


 
Formally document all RTR policies and 


 
procedures


 
Formally and regularly measure the level 


 
of internal customer satisfaction with the 


 
RTR process


 
Implement a formal feedback loop and 


 
continuous improvement process within 


 
the RTR process


 
Develop incentive structure that includes 


 
performance based compensation at the 


 
SSC, team, and individual levels.


 
Implement a relatively flat organization 


 
with high spans of control


 
Organize RTR staff in specialized teams 


 
based on function


 
Establish clear and regular communication 


 
channels and escalation paths across entities 


 
involved with the within the RTR process


 
Institute a robust RTR training curriculum 


 
and program


Basic Criteria:
Reporting content designed to meet external 


210
reporting requirements is also used for 


 
management reporting. Limited value added 


 
management reporting


Competitive
Reporting content feeds distinct management 


Criteria:
reports in addition to financial reports. 


212
Management reporting meets some of the 


 
needs of internal users


Market Leading
Reporting content feeds distinct management 


Criteria:
reports in addition to financial reports. 


214
Reporting is adequate to meet the needs of all 


 
users - internal and external


 





Table 7 describes additional market leading criteria for the capabilities of the finance and accounting operations platform 106. Market leading criteria for finance and accounting operations platform 106 includes ‘general accounting and reporting (record to report)’ capability 118. FIGS. 13-19 illustrate capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the ‘general accounting and reporting (record to report)’ capability 118.
The foundation for financial transactions is the ERP code block, which includes the chart of accounts (COA) as well as other master data elements (detailed cost centers, profit centers, legal entities, currencies, product types, internal counterparties, customers, sales codes, and tax codes). Market leading criteria for finance and accounting operations platform 106 may include: standardizing all of the business units, geographies and legal entities of an organization onto a single code block so that transaction processing is simplified and account reconciliations, analyses, and adjustments are sharply reduced. Market leading criteria for ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform 106 may further include: providing online, user-friendly access to all relevant accounting policies, procedures, and account definitions; standardizing core processes and policies (e.g., areas such as transfer pricing, inter-company transactions, payments and receipts) to improve accessibility and ease to data entry; limiting the amount of reconciliation and adjustments that hold up a close; improving efficiencies, (e.g., in SSC/BPO environments); streamlining data roll-up and summarization, closing, and consolidation. Market leading criteria for ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform 106 may include: validating data at the source of input, rather than at a subsequent point; employing a set of common validation tables and rules in all transaction systems; establishing and enforcing information quality responsibilities with the information source provider; recording transactions once and capturing all relevant information (e.g., financial, statutory, management, and tax) to eliminate statutory and management discrepancies and streamlines tax processes. Market leading criteria for ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform 106 may also include: locating transaction system views in subsidiary ledgers rather than in the general ledger (GL); posting all transactions to sub-ledgers rather to the GL so that the GL remains clean, minimizing reconciliation and analysis between the GL and sub-ledgers. Maximizing use of standard and recurring journal entries may limit manual activity.
Market leading criteria for ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform 106 may include: automating recurring entries and related controls (e.g., prior to close) to simplify transaction processing and eliminate time and critical path items from the closing process. Examples of recurring entries and related controls include: inter-company transactions, currency translation, allocations, accruals and reversals. Market leading criteria for ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform 106 may further include: eliminating all unnecessary accruals; and imposing materiality thresholds. For example, accruals with low volatility and/or materiality estimates may be used and accruals may be performed earlier in the month (e.g., before the closing process begins). Market leading criteria for ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform 106 may include: automating all key accruals, including reversals; creating accruals dynamically when a commitment occurs (e.g., goods and/or services are received); employing subsystems rather than people to calculate key accruals; prohibiting accruals and allocations to be performed via personal computer spreadsheets; and limiting allocations to only controllable expenses and revenues. Market leading criteria for ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform 106 may include: prohibiting allocations less than a certain dollar amount; applying basic rules such as whether an allocation adds value (e.g., different decisions without allocation); ensuring that the “receiving” manager controls and/or influences the allocated costs; performing allocations in ERP and/or consolidation systems rather than manually calculating allocations using a spreadsheet. Market leading criteria for ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform 106 may include: booking allocations prior to the close, based on fixed-rate, budgeted rates and/or prior month. Allocation cycles may be run automatically overnight, and the basis, validity, usefulness and relevance of allocations may be reassessed frequently. Market leading criteria for ‘finance and accounting operations’ platform 106 may include: ensuring that necessary information is captured once, in a consistent format, for each journal entry across the entire enterprise; and ensuring that management accounting requirements lead to identifying reclassification needs and legally required reclassification only upon hard close; requiring approvals for selected entries based on pre-defined policy which incorporates dollar value and risk; and reducing the approval process cycle time and manual effort; and automating entries resulting from transactions between companies leveraging web technology.
 FIG. 14 illustrates the hierarchy of ‘Perform Inter-Company Accounting’ capability 404. Market leading criteria for ‘Perform Inter-Company Accounting’ capability 404 may include clearly defining and strictly enforcing an inter-entity transaction policy; promoting the use of internal “contracts” and formal documentation to justify inter-company transactions to reduce disputes from occurring after processing a transaction; automatically managing inter-organization transactions in the accounting systems (e.g., credit transactions may automatically generate the debit transactions in the debtor set of books) to reduce “out-of balance” conditions and reconciliations. Market leading criteria for ‘Perform Inter-Company Accounting’ capability 404 may include: allowing the sending organization to create both the receivables and payables entries streamlines inter-company billings in addition to eliminating “out of balance” situations; agreeing inter-company balances some number of days (e.g., 5 days) before the month end by reporting balances in advance and monitoring the final weeks transactions; investigating mismatches over a certain threshold (by the local reporting units) after applying the group consolidation tool; simplifying inter-company transactions, reconciliations, and automating off-set entries; employing worldwide data definitions so that all entities can agree on the balances to included in a particular account.
 FIG. 14 further illustrates the hierarchy of ‘Manage Interfaces’ capability 406. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage Interfaces’ capability 406 may include: posting all transaction activities to sub-ledgers rather than to the general ledger (GL); loading sub-ledger source system data into the GL on a weekly, daily, and/or instantaneously to eliminate some activities from the close process critical path and allow interim flash reporting during the month; reducing manual activities by employing automated interfaces between source systems and main repositories; aggregating and closing non-critical sub-ledgers prior to month-end to spread closing activities over a longer period without adversely impacting the moth-and close cycle. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage Interfaces’ capability 406 may include: executing selected processes prior to the close and then perform catch-up activities during the actual close.
Integrated ERP solutions can provide drill-down capability from the GL to the sub-ledgers simplifying account analysis. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage Interfaces’ capability 406 may include: employing an ERP solution to perform data extracts from internal and external systems into a central repository to meet multiple reporting requirements (one version of the truth); aggregating receiving and shipping data more frequently to facilitate ongoing accessibility to data, rather than only at period end, and thereby reducing reconciliation; deploying a single ERP system worldwide and eliminate and/or limit the use of legacy systems; transforming all sub-ledger account validation to the common ERP chart of accounts which supports the corporate general ledger; integrating systems to eliminate and/or reduce stand-alone sub-ledgers, feeder systems and the related interfaces and reconciliation; establishing common definitions and usage guidelines for key data elements, regardless of the system where the data resides; and facilitating efficient interface, roll-up and aggregation.
 FIG. 15 illustrates the hierarchy of ‘Analyze & Reconcile Accounts’ capability 408. Market leading criteria for ‘Analyze & Reconcile Accounts’ capability 408 may include: employing an expansive cost center, profit center, legal entity structure and chart of accounts adds significant complexity to the R2R process including account reconciliation, analysis, and adjustment; and assigning accounts to entities (e.g., corporate controller or SSC) and individuals within the entities based on account materiality, complexity, and risk. Market leading criteria for ‘Analyze & Reconcile Accounts’ capability 408 may further include: defining the reconciliation frequency for each account and maintaining formal calendar and tracking of completed reconciliations; automatically managing inter-organization transactions in the accounting systems (e.g., credit transactions automatically generate the debit transactions in the debtor set of books); ensuring that local reporting units maintain ownership of information and responsibility for quality and accuracy of the local reporting unit reports and corporate notifies the local unit of errors.
 FIG. 16 illustrates the hierarchy of ‘Close Books & Consolidate Financial Results’ capability 410. Market leading criteria for ‘Close Books & Consolidate Financial Results’ capability 410 may include: maintaining a highly structured and rigorous close process so that finance can pre-determine close; issuing a calendar on an annual basis that identifies the when each accounting period should close, when inter-company balances should be agreed, when the ledgers are to be closed, and the dates for various cut-offs; implementing and/or re-designing a consolidated close calendar managed by a single process owner to shorten the closing cycle; ensuring that all purchase orders are registered, purchase and sales invoices are processed and expense claims are submitted; holding individuals accountable for major errors that impact the close timeline; and employing automatic “trigger” in the general ledger (GL) that downloads data to the consolidation tool on a set date each month. Market leading criteria for ‘Close Books & Consolidate Financial Results’ capability 410 may include: employing a formal and pre-defined communication approach, issue resolution process and decision framework to speed identification and resolution of close issues; monitoring continuous improvement of the close process by developing and tracking metrics including days to close, days to report, # of manual journal entries; and periodically reviewing process, systems and data to identify and manage bottlenecks. Market leading criteria for ‘Close Books & Consolidate Financial Results’ capability 410 may include: leveraging formal communication vehicles (e.g., meetings, conference calls, websites, and online activity tracking) to ensure that all issues are raised and resolved in the most timely manner; discussing any unusual results with management and auditors; performing less analysis, limiting reconciliations and adjustments during non-quarter end months, and adjusting materiality thresholds in connection with strong quarter-end closing and reporting processes and strong internal controls; aggregating and closing non-critical sub-ledgers prior to month-end to spread closing activities over a longer period without adversely impacting the month-end close cycle; ensuring that as many activities as possible are performed in parallel rather then serially to dramatically shorten the close cycle; limiting period end and closing entries to only those that are required for financial reporting purposes and/or are material from a management reporting standpoint (e.g., corrections, adjustments, and reclassifications).
Market leading criteria for ‘Close Books & Consolidate Financial Results’ capability 410 may include: optimizing the materiality levels for making adjusting entries, allocations and/or inter-company charges; establishing and enforcing materiality thresholds; evaluating the impacts at the consolidated level when determining materiality thresholds for closing cycle adjustments; avoiding missing a closing deadline by keeping source systems open to book last minute adjustments that are not material to the enterprise as a whole. Often, in decentralized companies with “full P&L business units”, the full P&L business units attempt to “negotiate” with corporate for last minute adjustments. Market leading criteria for ‘Close Books & Consolidate Financial Results’ capability 410 may include: employing a “controllable P&L” to eliminate a negotiation process around non-controllable expense allocations; maintaining exchange rates in the system by corporate so that currency translations occur automatically (e.g., systems, process, timetable, foreign exchange translation and “topside” entries); harmonizing the code block so that finance can automate the consolidation process through the use of a standard consolidation tool; transmitting balances directly to corporate consolidating books, where consolidation has not been automated; transmitting balances directly to corporate consolidating books and eliminating other hierarchical consolidations; restricting allocations to areas where there is a business reason to justify the allocation rationale; eliminating hierarchical, multi-level, or sub-consolidations, where possible; and transmitting data electronically with limited and/or no manual input or re-keying.
 FIG. 17 illustrates the hierarchy of ‘Perform Financial Reporting’ capability 412. Market leading criteria for ‘Perform Financial Reporting’ capability 412 may include: management understanding the differences between internal and external reporting needs so that GAAP P&L is not used as the single tool to run the business; extracting data from internal and external systems into a central repository to meet multiple reporting requirements; eliminating stand-alone statutory reporting systems; supporting all statutory/management reporting requirements through a single chart of accounts; employing a single and/or few data sources for US GAAP, IAS, and local country requirements to allow consolidated results to feed financial report directly, without adjustment, reclassification and/or modification; ensuring that ERP (e.g., consolidation system) automatically feeds financial reports and templates; ensuring that quarterly hard closes are performed to meet external reporting needs, and monthly soft closes meet internal management needs; implementing comprehensive statutory reporting procedures that are regularly updated and communicated to staff (e.g., base statutory reporting on draft tax charge and liabilities to an acceptable materiality within the same fully integrated system). Market leading criteria for ‘Perform Financial Reporting’ capability 412 may include: regularly reviewing accounting policies and compare to best practice, with reviews actively involving external advisors, Board members and the audit committee; explaining statutory accounting numbers to investors in terms of drivers of long term shareholder value; and supplying additional non-statutory information to support explanations.
 FIG. 18 illustrates the hierarchy of ‘Perform Regulatory Reporting’ capability 414. Market leading criteria for ‘Perform Regulatory Reporting’ capability 414 may include: implementing comprehensive statutory reporting procedures that are regularly updated and communicated to staff (e.g., base statutory reporting on draft tax charge and liabilities to an acceptable materiality within the same fully integrated system); and regularly reviewing accounting policies and compare to best practice, with reviews actively involving external advisors, Board members and the audit committee.
 FIG. 19 illustrates the hierarchy of ‘Maintain Accounting Master Data’ capability 418. Market leading criteria for ‘Maintain Accounting Master Data’ capability 418 may include: centralizing ownership of establishing and maintaining a standardized code block as well as standardization of other master data. For example, corporate finance may control all master data changes and only specific people may be allowed to make changes, while other people and/or entities may little or no access to such information. Market leading criteria for ‘Maintain Accounting Master Data’ capability 418 may include: leveraging formal request template, approval structure, central control, and policy; defining specific standards that must be met in order to add a new account and cost center. Market leading criteria for ‘Maintain Accounting Master Data’ capability 418 may include: identifying key performance indicators (KPIs) by which the organization desires to operate the business; designing the financial language of the organization to enable reporting by those KPIs; defining reporting requirements and then design the code block (e.g., ERP code block, which includes the chart of accounts); defining appropriate code block segments to support profitability and cost analysis and reporting so that one code block element can answer one business question; eliminating redundancy and inconsistency of values assigned to codes; design the language to capture data in basic elements that answer 7 fundamental business questions (who, what, why, where, when, how, which); employing combinations of basic elements to support different views of data; providing common and consistent definitions of code to both employees and applications. Market leading criteria for ‘Maintain Accounting Master Data’ capability 418 may include: planning and anticipating future mergers, divestments, re-organizations, geographic expansion and new product lines; designing intelligence into a code to restrict the number of values that the code can support and increase the amount of data input; prevent systems processing from relying on the values of certain elements and/or portions of elements when mnemonics are involved; deriving roll-ups by the reporting mechanism rather than embedding roll-ups in the language; employing relational tables to enable roll-ups; and providing end-user tools to users to define ad-hoc roll-ups.



 

 
 



TABLE 7


 


General Accounting & Reporting 


(Record to Report) 118 - Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




Record
Leverage a single, standard, end-to-end RTR 


Transactions
process - across all business units and 


402
geographies


 
Perform the majority of RTR activities using a 


 
shared service center or BPO model


 
Utilize flexible sourcing models that take advantage 


 
of cost reductions available by placing select staff in 


 
low cost geographic locations.


 
Formally document all RTR policies and procedures


 
Formally and regularly measure the level of internal


 
customer satisfaction with the RTR process


 
Implement a formal feedback loop and continuous


 
improvement process within the RTR process


 
Develop incentive structure that includes performance


 
based compensation at the SSC, team, and individual


 
levels.


 
Implement a relatively flat organization with high 


 
spans of control


 
Organize RTR staff in specialized teams based on 


 
function


 
Establish clear and regular communication channels 


 
and escalation paths across entities involved with the 


 
within the RTR process


 
Institute a robust RTR training curriculum and program


 
Leverage a single, standardized, comprehensive code


 
block across the enterprise


 
Have a formal accounting manual available online


 
Standardize policies and processes for recording of key


 
transactions


 
Standardize accounting treatments for all transactions


 
across all legal entities


 
Capture and validate management and statutory data


 
once, at the source


 
Post all transactions to the sub-ledger


 
Maximize use of standard and recurring journal entries


 
Automate recurring entries


 
Accruals: Minimize the number of accruals


 
Accruals: Use estimates where possible - and perform


 
earlier in the month


 
Accruals: Automate accruals


 
Allocations: Limit allocations


 
Allocations: Prohibit allocations by PC spreadsheet


 
Allocations: Minimize the negative impact of 


 
allocations on process efficiency


 
Allocations: Continually reassess allocation 


 
methodology


 
Manual Journal Entries: Use standard, online journal 


 
entry request templates


 
Manual Journal Entries: Book no reclassifications or


 
manual correcting entries unless material


 
Manual Journal Entries: Require approvals on only 


 
high dollar/high risk journal entries


 
Manual Journal Entries: Leverage workflow 


 
capabilities for approval/posting


 
Leverage web connections to customers, suppliers, 


 
and other functions


 
Establish an automated payroll accrual to accrue 


 
for the difference between payroll cycles and 


 
accounting periods


Perform Inter- 
Establish a formal inter-organization transaction 


Company
policy


Accounting
Use inter-company contracts


404
Automate off-setting inter-entity entries


 
Promptly agree inter-company balances, if not fully


 
automated


 
Require all entities to use a single, standard chart of


 
accounts


 
Use consistent data definitions and roll-up structures


 
across all entities


 
Standardize accounting treatments for all transactions


 
across all legal entities


 
Automated tools to support the collection and 


 
reconciliation of inter-entity balances


Manage
Post all transactions to the sub-ledger


Interfaces
Aggregate sub-ledgers to the general ledger (GL)


406
frequently


 
Automate interfaces between source systems and 


 
main repository


 
Shift systems interface and sub-ledger aggregation to 


 
pre-close where possible


 
Provide drill-down from the general ledger (GL) to 


 
the sub-ledgers


 
Sub-accounts and general ledger should continuously


 
reconcile


 
Leverage single ERP/integrated systems to reduce


 
number of interfaces


 
Use consistent and common definitions for metrics 


 
and data elements across systems


Analyze &
Rationalize the number of cost centers, profit centers, 


Reconcile
G/L accounts, and legal entities


Accounts
Assign a formal account owner for each account


408
Maintain a formal reconciliation schedule


 
Automate off-setting inter-entity entries to eliminate 


 
out-of-balance situations and reconciliations


 
Promptly agree inter-company balances, if not fully


 
automated


 
Limit the number of and continuously clear suspense


 
accounts


 
Sub-accounts and general ledger should continuously


 
reconcile


 
Accountability for data integrity should lie with local


 
reporting unit.


Close Books &
Structure a formal close process and calendar managed 


Consolidate
by a single process owner


Financial 
Issue clear and concise instructions to all departments/


Results
entities stating what will be required of them and by 


410
when


 
Strict adherence to the timetable for monthly cut-offs


 
Well understood and documented financial procedures 


 
and policies


 
Pre-define issue resolution approach


 
Continuously focus on and formally measure close 


 
process improvements


 
Require formal, prompt, and regular communication


 
between local reporting units and corporate during 


 
the close


 
Establish a “pre close meeting” early in the closing 


 
cycle


 
Accountability for data integrity lies with local 


 
reporting unit.


 
Implement a soft close


 
Shift non-critical items to pre-close


 
Perform activities in parallel, wherever possible


 
Address planning and forecasting outside of the 


 
close process


 
Limit period end/closing entries


 
Evaluate materiality thresholds - and book no


 
reclassifications or manual correcting entries unless


 
material


 
Rationalize the number of management adjustments


 
Support drill-down back to individual set of books


 
All corporate adjustments reconciled and reported, 


 
where appropriate, to local units, so adjustments 


 
are also made locally


 
Automate currency translation


 
Centralize control of the consolidation environment


 
Automate/streamline consolidations


 
Simplify the allocations process


 
Promptly agree inter-company balances- in advance 


 
of month-end wherever possible


 
Transmit subsidiary balances directly to corporate


 
consolidating books


 
Transmit all data electronically


 
Automate key accruals and minimize the number of


 
accruals during the closing process


 
Use subsystems, not people, to calculate key accruals


 
Accruals should be created dynamically when a


 
commitment occurs (i.e. goods receipt)


 
Create and post all reversals automatically


Perform
Differentiate between internal (mgmt) and external


Financial
(financial/regulatory) reporting needs - but leverage 


Reporting
a single data source


412
Single data source meets multiple country statutory


 
reporting requirements


 
The annual report format and notes to the accounts 


 
are agreed by the time that the results have been 


 
consolidated


 
Release earnings and publish regulatory/statutory 


 
reports as rapidly as possible after period end


 
Link financial reporting into the broader performance


 
management agenda


 
Make financial reporting available to managers at 


 
all levels of the organization


 
Automated financial reporting


 
‘Soft’ close performed to support internal reporting 


 
needs on a more timely basis than required for 


 
external reporting


 
Put in place comprehensive training plans to ensure 


 
all staff are up to date on current and future financial 


 
reporting requirements.


 
Track key shareholder value measures in addition to


 
accounting measures and use them to communicate 


 
with analysts


Perform
Publish statutory reports ahead of time and exceed


Regulatory
investors' expectations.


Reporting
Put in place comprehensive training plans to ensure 


414
all staff are up to date on current and future regulatory


 
reporting requirements.


Perform
See Performance Reporting and Analytics - Measure,


Management
Report, and Analyze Business Performance


Reporting
 


416
 


Maintain
Maintain master data centrally


Accounting
Adopt a formal master data add/change/delete 


Master Data
process and policy


418
Leverage a single, standardized, comprehensive code


 
block across the enterprise


 
Clearly define the relationship between corporate and 


 
local chart of accounts


 
Align the master data structure/language with the way


 
management wants to run the business


 
Reporting requirements should drive the development 


 
of the code block


 
Simplify and focus the code block: Each element 


 
should be clearly defined and used solely for that 


 
purpose across the organization. And each element 


 
should have an expressed reporting/transaction 


 
capture purpose.


 
Design flexibility into the code block to support future


 
requirements.


 
Use non-intelligent/non-hierarchical codes in the code


 
block


 
Support flexible, user-definable rollups


 
Rationalize the number of cost centers, profit centers, 


 
and legal entities


 
Continually assess/monitor/revise company cost 


 
center structure


 





Table 8 provides an explanation of the fixed asset accounting capability 120, key assessment areas within the capability and corresponding performance capability criteria.



 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 8


 


Fixed Asset Accounting 120


 




 




Description:
Includes all transactional activities associated with 


 
fixed asset accounting.




Process




Basic Criteria:
Heavy focus on transaction capture and “getting the


210
accounting right”; high volume of manual processing;


 
moderate amount of finance management time devoted


 
to fixed asset accounting


Competitive
Transaction capture and accounting fully automated 


Criteria:
but with exceptions; moderate amount of manual 


212
processing; minor amount of finance management time 


 
devoted to fixed asset accounting


Market Leading
Transaction capture and accounting fully automated; 


Criteria: 214
minor amount of manual processing; essentially no 


 
finance management time devoted to fixed asset 


 
accounting




Systems




Basic Criteria:
Multiple ERP and/or legacy systems


210
 


Competitive
Single ERP system, but with exceptions - some legacy


Criteria:
systems; various “work-arounds”


212
 


Market Leading
Single end-to-end ERP system used worldwide for fixed


Criteria:
assets, CIP/project accounting, and general accounting


214
 




Organization




Basic Criteria:
Fixed asset accounting activities fragmented across


210
businesses and/or geographies; process designed 


 
around functional/geographic silos


Competitive
Selected use of shared services/outsourcing for fixed 


Criteria:
asset processes; journey to shared services not complete


212
 


Market Leading
Maximum leverage of shared service and/or outsourcing;


Criteria:
organization is aligned to fit the process, not the other 


214
way around;


 





Table 9 describes additional market leading criteria for the capabilities of the fixed asset accounting capability 120. FIGS. 20-21 illustrate capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the ‘fixed asset accounting’ capability 120. Market leading criteria for ‘fixed asset accounting’ capability 120 may include: aligning the organization to support the process. Fixed asset accounting is well suited for SSC and/or BPO. The transactional portion of fixed asset accounting is non-core competency for many organizations. Market leading criteria for ‘fixed asset accounting’ capability 120 may include: implementing fixed asset accounting capability as a SSC and/or BPO to reduce operating expense, improves controls, improves scalability, and improves efficiency by consolidating operations; employing incentive compensation to manage attrition and performance in specific areas, and non-monetary incentives to build team morale to improve fixed asset accounting performance; controlling operating expense with a highly leveraged organization.



 

 
 



TABLE 9


 


Finance & Accounting Operations 106 -


Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




Fixed Asset
Leverage a single, standard, end-to-end fixed asset


Accounting
accounting process - across all business units and


120
geographies


 
Perform the majority of fixed asset accounting activities 


 
using a shared service center or BPO model


 
Maximize use of low cost locations for fixed asset


 
accounting activities/staff


 
Formally and regularly measure the level of internal


 
customer satisfaction with the fixed asset accounting


 
process


 
Implement a formal feedback loop and continuous


 
improvement process within the fixed asset accounting


 
process


 
Develop incentive structure that includes performance


 
based compensation at the SSC, team, and individual


 
levels.


 
Implement a relatively flat organization with high spans 


 
of control


 
Organize fixed asset accounting staff in specialized 


 
teams based on function


 
Establish clear and regular communication channels and


 
escalation paths across entities involved with the within 


 
the fixed asset accounting process


 
Institute a robust fixed asset accounting training 


 
curriculum and program


 





Table 10 describes additional market leading criteria for capabilities within the fixed asset accounting capability 120, including criteria for: ‘establish and communicate fixed asset policies and procedures capability 2002; ‘record asset acquisition/disposition’ capability 2004; ‘physically track assets’ capability 2102; and ‘properly value assets for accounting purposes’ capability 2104. The ‘establish and communicate fixed asset policies and procedures’ capability 2002 may include making an online policy manual available to employees conducting fixed asset accounting activities, which may ensure that once procurement of an asset has been approved in the budget process, subsequent approval requests do not occur. ‘Record asset acquisition/disposition’ capability 2004 may reduce and/or eliminate re-keying of fixed asset detail. Updating the fixed asset system with the acquisition, transfer, and/or disposal of an asset may automatically update the GL. Acquisitions of a capital nature may be capitalized for acquisitions over a minimum value. ‘Physically track assets’ capability 2102 may include tracking and identifying physical assets using bar-coded asset tags, which simplifies and streamlines fixed asset inventories and write-offs. ‘Properly value assets for accounting purposes’ capability 2104 may include company-wide standards (e.g., per category of assets) that are used consistently by all business units and regions, which simplifies data entry, depreciation calculation and projection, and reporting.



 

 
 



TABLE 10


 


Fixed Asset Accounting 120 - 


Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




Establish and
Formally document all fixed asset accounting 


Communicate
policies and procedures


Fixed Asset
Enforce one approval route; eliminate redundant 


Policies and
approval of the same requisition


Procedures
Paperless approval process for asset transfers


2002
 


Record Asset
Fixed asset register is an integrated part of 


Acquisition/
accounting system with link to purchase ordering 


Disposition
system, accounts payable application, and GL


2004
Automatically update on-line fixed asset register 


 
from requisitions


 
Set materiality limit for capitalizing fixed assets at 


 
the highest level appropriate for the line of business


 
Details held in the asset system should include 


 
information necessary for insurance, taxation, 


 
and GAAP accounting requirements


 
Integrate fixed assets and leased asset systems to 


 
capture and report on all assets regardless of 


 
financing and accounting treatment


 
Use pooling of assets approach for capitalizing 


 
assets with multiple units that have low 


 
individual asset values


Physically Track
Attach bar coded asset tags to fixed assets, either 


Assets
during manufacture by the vendor or upon receipt


2102
Integrate fixed assets system with budgets (e.g., 


 
for assets under construction), purchasing, accounts 


 
payable and tax reporting.


 
Maintain a continually updated surplus asset list 


 
that is available online to divisions, branches, 


 
and subsidiaries


 
Evaluate the tracking and record maintenance 


 
effort on a cost-benefit basis


 
Separation of asset accounting and physical asset


 
management


 
Track assets still under warranty to prevent 


 
unnecessary costs for repairs, faults, etc.


Properly Value 
Use standardized depreciation lives for assets to


Assets for
streamline depreciation reporting


Accounting
Utilize a depreciation simulation tool for 


Purposes
planning purposes


2104
Treat similar assets as “quantity assets” or 


 
“mass assets” which are treated as one unit 


 
and depreciated in mass i.e. computer 


 
equipment, furniture etc.


 
Depreciation charges and asset activities post


 
automatically to the ledger system


 
Automate notification of fully depreciated assets.


 
Calculate property taxes in fixed asset system


 
Regularly review depreciation policies from the 


 
viewpoint of expected continued use and tax 


 
efficiency.


 





Table 11 provides an explanation of the purchase to pay capability 122 (FIG. 1), key assessment areas within the capability and corresponding performance capability criteria.



 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 11


 


Purchase to Pay (P2P) 122


 




 




Description:
The Purchase to Pay cycle generally refers to the 


 
end-to-end process beginning with the requisition 


 
and purchase of goods and services and ending with 


 
payment for those goods and services.




Process




Basic Criteria:
Fragmented process; functional silos between 


210
“purchasing” and “finance”; limited process 


 
documentation and rigor; no formal integration 


 
with supplier processes


Competitive
End-to-end process design partially in place, but 


Criteria:
“up-stream” purchasing issues still cause “down-


212
stream” problems with payables processing; 


 
limited supplier integration


Market Leading
Single end-to-end P2P process with formal process 


Criteria:
owner, process documentation, and desk procedures; 


214
extensive integration with supplier processes




Systems




Basic Criteria:
Multiple ERP and/or legacy systems including 


210
multiple P2P systems; limited or no global visibility 


 
into purchasing commitments, spend, or payables by 


 
vendor; limited use of EDI and/or other paperless 


 
technology


Competitive
Single ERP system, but with exceptions - some legacy


Criteria:
systems; various “work-arounds” (e.g., data warehouse,


212
spreadsheets) required to get visibility into global 


 
purchasing commitments, spend, or payable balance 


 
by vendor


Market Leading
Single end-to-end ERP system used worldwide; no 


Criteria:
legacy P2P systems; ERP-generated visibility into 


214
global purchasing commitments, spend, and payables 


 
balance for each supplier; heavy use of EDI and/or 


 
other paperless technologies




Data




Basic Criteria:
Multiple definitions/instances of common data 


210
elements (e.g., multiple records for the same 


 
vendor), multiple vendor masters, limited 


 
governance of P2P master data


Competitive
Common P2P data definitions, but with exceptions; 


Criteria:
global vendor master addresses majority of vendors/


212
payments; central governance of P2P master data


Market Leading
Common P2P data definitions including standard


Criteria:
“parent-child” structure for vendors, single global


214
vendor master, central governance of P2P master data




Organization 




Basic Criteria:
Purchase to Pay activities fragmented across


210
businesses and/or geographies; process designed


 
around functional/geographic silos


Competitive
Selected use of shared services/outsourcing for P2P


Criteria:
processes; journey to shared services not complete


212
 


Market Leading
Organization is aligned to fit the process, not 


Criteria:
the other way around; maximum leverage of


214
shared service and/or outsourcing


 





Table 12 describes additional market leading criteria for capabilities within the ‘purchase to pay’ capability 122. FIGS. 22-27 illustrate capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the ‘purchase to pay’ capability 122. Market leading criteria for ‘purchase to pay’ capability 122 may include: treating purchasing and accounts payable as part of a single process; and aligning the organization to support the process P2P is well suited for SSC/BPO. The transactional portion of P2P is non-core competency for most organizations. Market leading criteria for ‘purchase to pay’ capability 122 may include: implementing P2P as a SSC/BPO; providing policy manuals online to any employee conducting P2P activities; improving overall performance through proactive management of the P2P process; employing incentive compensation to manage attrition and performance in specific areas, and non-monetary incentives to build team morale to improve P2P performance; and performing downstream payables activities in the same system as the upstream purchasing activity.



 

 
 



Table 12


 


Finance & Accounting Operations 106 


Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




Purchase to 
Leverage a single, standard, end-to-end P2P process


Pay 122
across all business units and geographies


 
Perform the majority of P2P activities using a shared


 
service center or BPO model


 
Formally document all P2P policies, procedures, processes


 
and controls


 
Implement a formal feedback loop and continuous


 
improvement process within Procure to Pay


 
Develop incentive structure that includes performance


 
based compensation at the SSC, team, and individual


 
levels


 
Implement an organization structure with minimal


 
management levels and high spans of control


 
Organize P2P staff in specialized teams based on function


 
and/or vendor segmentation


 
Establish clear and regular communication channels and


 
escalation paths within the P2P operation and with other


 
related departments


 
Institute a robust P2P training curriculum and program


 
including both P2P practioners and internal customers


 
Leverage a single, end-to-end ERP system for the entire


 
P2P process


 
Centralize payables functions, decentralize accountability,


 
error, authorization and approval processing


 
Extend the requisition to pay functions to support


 
integration with vendors/suppliers


 
Track, report and eliminate non-compliant (maverick)


 
spend


 
Fully integrated with Tax functions, i.e. ensure proper tax


 
treatment for all purchase items (tax and non-tax items,


 
rate validation), automated feeds into tax software


 
Manage operations through defined key performance


 
measures which are real time, cascaded down from team


 
targets, individual Management by Objectives (MBO), and


 
partner/supplier SLAB


 
Formalize vendor selection process including fraud


 
prevention requirements


 
Eliminate one-time vendor processing


 
Align purchasing strategy with organizational strategies


 
Develop and actively monitor supplier performance ratings


 
Create P2P structures to supporting ethical supplier


 
relationships


 
Reduce cycle times for routine orders


 
View vendors as business partners whose goals are


 
aligned with yours, sharing both risks and rewards


 
Benchmark comparisons completed on a periodic basis


 
Shared services for capital buying, order management,


 
vendor management, content management, and payables


 
processing across all business units, in a low-cost


 
operating locale


 
People developed, dynamically matched, and cross trained


 
throughout the corporation


 





Table 13 describes additional market leading criteria for capabilities within the ‘purchase to pay’ capability 122, including criteria for: ‘manage and record requisition and purchase’ capability 2202; ‘manage inbound documents’ capability 2204; ‘record goods receipt; approve and schedule payment’ capability 2302; ‘process payments’ capability 2502; ‘address vendor inquiries; handle disputes and exceptions’ capability 2602; ‘perform P2P reconciliations and period end close activities’ capability 2604; ‘manage vendor data/data master’ capability 2702; and ‘manage corporate P-card program’ capability 2704.
‘Manage and record requisition and purchase’ capability 2202 may include arranging with frequently used vendors to have sales tax information captured at point of sale. Relationships may include national purchasing agreements, consolidated and centralized billings, consignment inventories (e.g., wholesaler holding stock of supplier “on consignment”, which is paid for after sales to customer), evaluated receipt settlement (ERS) to pay on receipt of goods and/or services may eliminate the need to receive and process vendor invoices. ‘Manage and record requisition and purchase’ capability 2202 may include: employing online purchase requisition submission and approval; using paperless catalogues with real time pricing and quantity; employing Outbound Electronic Data Interchange (EDI) and/or an Internet link to vendor sites for purchase order and requisition; employing Inbound EDI and/or an Internet link from procurement card and vendors; actively pursuing vendors to leverage electronic commerce; analyzing and evaluating total cost of ownership over the expected life of the product and/or service, and assessing vendors, products and services accordingly (e.g., in additional to more traditional price, quality and terms); formulating and implementing different strategies for different commodity groups; and leveraging “specialist” buyers.
The ‘manage inbound documents’ capability 2204 may include implementing initiatives to reduce invoice volumes, despite a possible increase in matching issues, and centralizing the receipt of invoices; performing opening, sorting, scanning in the same location where invoices are received.
‘Record Goods Receipt; Approve and Schedule Payment’ capability 2302 may include: eliminating approvals for stock goods (e.g., materials and merchandise may be automatically replenished); scanning delivery notes and receivers at the warehouse and entering service acceptances directly with outstanding deliveries flagged on the system; using computerized scanners to read and enter data as opposed to manual entry of invoice amounts; leveraging analytics tools and reporting to identify duplicate payments; performing “preventative” analytics, as well as post “audit and compliance” analytics; raising limit for checks requiring signatures; automatically approving low dollar invoices; reviewing large dollar invoices and statistically sampling the remainder (e.g., through a tie back to PO); and refusing invoices without proper order number.
‘Process payments’ capability 2502 may include: eliminating paper checks to the extent possible; holding check stock in safe in locked office space so that access is limited to a few designated key holders; requiring suppliers to invoice once per month and use composite invoices for high volume supplies to reduce invoice volumes; invoicing by GRN to improve and more efficiently match.
‘Address vendor inquiries; handle disputes and exceptions’ capability 2602 may include: implementing Internet enabled link and/or interactive voice response (IVR) unit allows suppliers to perform and/or access account status inquiries, payment inquiries, remittance advices, and vendor reconciliations; reducing help desk employee time and related cost; reducing and/or eliminating the number of personnel involved in contacting a vendor for a particular request; dedicating personnel to particular vendors to develop an efficient and consistent handling of vendor inquiries and requests.
‘Perform P2P reconciliations and period end close activities’ capability 2604 may include: ensuring that all purchase orders are registered, purchase and sales invoices are processed and expense claims submitted; holding individuals accountable for major errors that impact the close timeline; and implementing a formal and pre-defined communication approach and issue resolution process and decision framework to speed identification and resolution to close issues.
‘Manage Vendor Data/Data Master’ capability 2702 may include: preventing multiple (e.g., duplicate) vendor records that lead to inaccuracies in tracking and managing individual vendor activity. Separate records can also lead to separate contracts with different prices and payment terms for identical items. Structured parent-child relationships allow companies to address the situation where they deal with multiple entities within the same vendor company. ‘Manage Vendor Data/Data Master’ capability 2702 may include: providing major ERP vendors robust vendor master data management capabilities to efficiently produce visibility into global purchasing commitments, spend, and payables balance for each supplier and to maximize buying power; regularly searching for and eliminating duplicates; and regularly analyzing inactive vendors
‘Manage corporate P-card program’ capability 2704 may include: implementing separate P-Cards for each account to be charged; coordinating with frequently used vendors to have department and accounts and/or other relevant information entered at point of sale by vendor; setting a materiality limit under which manual allocations are prohibited; employing procurement cards to minimize the high volume of low dollar PO's and invoices being processed; minimizing vendor blocking where exceptions may occur (e.g., blocking all hotel charges when a travel card is not used may block charges for meeting facility rental from a hotel); relying on budget controls for certain expense items; and automatically checking orders against budgets.



 

 
 



TABLE 13


 


Purchase to Pay (P2P) 122 


Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




Manage and
Establish standard electronic RFQ process is 


Record
available to external suppliers


Requisition and
Code and validate expense information (e.g., 


Purchase
GL acct, project codes, cost center, product) 


2202
at time of requisition/approval process


 
Approval process is standardized across 


 
organization and integrated to procurement 


 
system


 
Eliminate expense pre-approval requirements 


 
for purchases below established tolerances


 
Establish preferred supplier programs that 


 
leverage negotiated buying power and key 


 
supplier performance criteria


 
Establish strategic vendor relationships


 
Use the Web for electronic commerce through 


 
the use of online catalogs and order processing


 
Automate the requisition process including the 


 
interface with vendors


 
Fully integrate the purchase order system to 


 
the accounts payable system and accounts 


 
payable to the general ledger with on-line 


 
verification capability


 
Value and measure total cost of ownership 


 
when making purchasing decisions


 
Divide purchased parts and services into 


 
commodity groups handled by specific buyers


 
Involve potential suppliers in the definition of 


 
requirements for specialized purchases


 
Contracts are centrally logged, compliance is 


 
pro-actively managed and regularly reported and 


 
contract information available on-line to 


 
appropriate individuals


 
Leverage purchasing contracts to secure pricing 


 
for volatile purchase items


 
Maintain automated approval workflow routing 


 
for requisition processes


 
Leverage vendor-based forecasting and 


 
replenishment systems by outsourcing inventory 


 
management to vendors


 
Leverage reverse auctions to reduce purchase item


 
costs


 
Perform all required approvals at time of requisition/


 
purchase


 
Populate and leverage requisition coding system 


 
defaults by vendor, items (i.e. type of expense, 


 
inventory) and requester (i.e. business unit, cost 


 
center)


Manage Inbound 
Request summary and consolidated invoices from 


Documents
key suppliers


2204
Receive and image all inbound documents at a 


 
single central location


 
Establish date of receipt as the applicable date for


 
discounts rather than the invoice date


 
Leverage optical character recognition (OCR) to 


 
reduce data input


 
Leverage imaging application to index, deliver, store, 


 
and retrieve Purchase to Pay documentation (paper 


 
invoices, bill of lading, etc.)


Record Goods
Reduce vendor invoice volumes by leveraging 2-way


Receipt; Approve
match/invoiceless processing (ERS, pay upon receipt,


and Schedule
self billing) for major suppliers


Payment
Use a standardized inventory receipt and accounting


2302
process across organization


 
Eliminate approvals for stock goods


 
Utilize ERP material and service receipt functionality 


 
to facilitate downstream transaction processing


 
Use electronic notification of receipt of material 


 
goods


 
Maintain current and timely status of orders (via 


 
timely order entry and change orders) to facilitate 


 
down-stream processing.


 
Use bar coding to match receiving documents with 


 
goods expected for delivery


 
Automatically load procurement card transaction 


 
data into accounts payable system


 
Allow for automatic payment of recurring invoices


 
Perform formal duplicate payment audit


 
Review 100% of large dollar invoices and statistically


 
sample the remainder.


 
Personnel are able to utilize imaging and drill down


 
capabilities within ERP system to gather information


 
Link receivables and payables systems to net 


 
payments due to/due from other parties


 
Request suppliers to state the order number (as used 


 
in the buyer's computer system) in their invoices to


 
accelerate internal processing


 
Focus exception processing on significant matching


 
variances or high value transactions


 
Migrate from EDI to XML based payment methods


 
Request invoice segmentation according to invoice


 
processing requirements (e.g., cost center, locations)


 
Establish automated workflow defaults for any 


 
required invoice approvals


Process
Optimize number of check runs each month; leverage 


Payments
daily electronic payment runs where practical


2502
Batch/schedule supplier payments into one


 
payment made from central Accounts Payable


 
function


 
Utilize EFT/direct deposit for payment to 


 
eliminate use of paper checks as much as possible


 
Limit/eliminate manual check request generation


 
Automate signature blocks applied to checks


 
If paper checks do exist, maintain tight physical 


 
control over check stock


 
Automate determination of payment date based 


 
upon vendor profiles


 
Implement positive pay capabilities to reduce 


 
fraudulent check processing


 
Evaluate requirement that vendors provide 


 
summarized and consolidated invoices


Address Vendor
Equip suppliers with self-service tools (web and 


Inquiries; Handle
interactive voice response) to perform routine 


Disputes and
inquiries


Exceptions
Capture during the initial vendor inquiry/request 


2602
all information necessary to categorize, route, 


 
and resolve the inquiry


 
Establish an inquiry handling function or help 


 
desk as a distinct function within the P2P process


Perform P2P
Automate key accounts payable accruals and 


Reconciliations &
minimize the number of accruals during the 


Period End Close 
closing process


Activities
Accruals should be created dynamically when a


2604
commitment occurs (i.e. goods receipt)


 
Perform formal vendor statement reconciliations


 
Distribute clear and concise monthly and weekly


 
instructions to all departments/entities including 


 
specific activities and required timing


 
Strictly adhere to the defined timetable for 


 
monthly cut-offs


 
Pre-define issue resolution approach


Manage Vendor
Rationalize vendors on a periodic basis evaluating


Data/Data
number of vendors utilized, minimizing vendor 


Master
base and partnering with primary vendors


2702
Centralize control and maintenance of the vendor 


 
master file


 
Maintain a single, global vendor master; maintain 


 
a single record for each vendor


 
Support customer parent/child relationships in the


 
customer master and any supporting systems


 
Employ standard vendor naming convention


 
Clearly defined master data processes, procedures 


 
and policies are in place across the organization


 
Perform formal vendor database clean-up on a 


 
recurring basis


 
Implement duplicate account edits which are executed


 
during account setup and perform periodic duplicate


 
account reviews


 
Vendor master file should accurately reflect terms


 
negotiated by purchasing


 
Use vendor master data set up to define the type of 


 
invoice and subsequent treatment and routing


Manage
Use a corporate purchasing card (P-Card) for low 


Corporate
value purchases


P-Card Program 
Use card data to negotiate discounts and other benefits


2704
with vendors, including the card provider


 
Arrange for individual cardholders to receive 


 
statement information electronically or via the web


 
Minimize allocation of cost of P-Card purchases to


 
departments. When allocations must be made, employ


 
strategies to reduce manual allocations.


 
Minimize P-Card usage restrictions; encourage use 


 
of P-Card program


 
Central bill/central pay for P-card transactions


 





Table 14 provides an explanation of the ‘travel and expense reimbursement’ capability 124, key assessment areas within the capability and corresponding performance capability criteria.



 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 14


 


Travel & Expense Reimbursement 124


 




 




Description:
Includes those activities associated with reimbursing


 
employees for travel and other appropriate expenses.




Process




Basic Criteria:
Inconsistent policies and processes for travel 


210
authorization and expense submission and 


 
reimbursement


Competitive
Single, standard, T&E submission and reimbursement


Criteria:
process partially in place, but with various exceptions


212
 


Market Leading
Single, standard, T&E submission and reimbursement


Criteria:
process used consistently across the entire enterprise


214
 




Systems




Basic Criteria:
Paper based submission process with manual data 


210
entry by T&E staff; stand alone system not 


 
integrated with ERP/GL/cost center reporting


Competitive
Single online T&E system, integrated with the 


Criteria:
ERP system, but with exceptions for selected 


212
business units/geographies


Market Leading
Single online T&E system, integrated with the 


Criteria:
ERP system, used consistently across the entire 


214
enterprise




Organization




Basic Criteria:
T&E activities fragmented across businesses and/or


210
geographies; process designed around functional/


 
geographic silos; activities performed in high cost 


 
location(s)


Competitive
Selected use of shared services/outsourcing for T&E


Criteria:
processes; journey to shared services/low cost 


212
location not complete


Market Leading
Maximum leverage of shared services and/or 


Criteria:
outsourcing in low cost location for all T&E 


214
activities


 





Table 15 describes additional market leading criteria for capabilities within the ‘travel and expense reimbursement (T&E)’ capability 124. FIGS. 28-29 illustrate capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the ‘travel and expense reimbursement (T&E)’ capability 124. ‘Travel and expense reimbursement (T&E)’ capability 124 may include: ‘create and submit reimbursement request’ capability 2802; ‘authorize payment’ capability 2804; ‘audit expense reports’ capability 2806; ‘maintain travel and expense policy’ capability 2902; and ‘manage corporate card program’ capability 2904. Market leading criteria for ‘Create and submit reimbursement request’ capability 2802 may include ensuring that entities use the same process, regardless of BU or geography. T&E is well suited for SSC/BPO. T&E is non-core competency for most organizations. Market leading criteria for ‘Travel and expense reimbursement (T&E)’capability 124 may include: deploying T&E as a SSC/BPO; and eliminating paper based expense claims. Market leading criteria for ‘Authorize payment’ capability 2804 may include automatically flagging expense requests that require pre-approval. Market leading criteria for ‘Audit expense reports’ capability 2806 may include: auditing a small sample of low value/low risk reimbursement requests; auditing all of high value/high risk reimbursement requests; updating future samples sizes and the approach used to audit based on data from previous audits; sending automated e-mail for initial and minor issues (e.g., inadequate expense receipts); sending follow up communications for policy violations or unresolved issues; escalating unresolved issues to employees supervisor; and blocking further expense payments and/or garnish wages when required. Market leading criteria for ‘Maintain travel and expense policy’ capability 2902 may include implementing a relevant and clearly stated financial control framework; and ensuring that managers throughout the organization are responsible for controlling expenses and understanding the implications of any actions. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage corporate card program’ capability 2904 may include: implementing corporate cards to eliminate the need for advances and floats; the organization receiving discounts from the card issuer in exchange for the employees using the card.



 

 
 



TABLE 15


 


Travel & Expense Reimbursement (T&E) 124 -


Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




Create & Submit
Leverage a single, standard, T&E reimbursement 


Reimbursement
process


Request
Leverage a single T&E system, integrated with 


2802
the ERP system


 
Perform the majority of T&E activities using a 


 
shared service center or BPO model


 
Utilize flexible sourcing models that take advantage 


 
of cost reductions available by placing select staff 


 
in low cost geographic locations.


 
Formally document and distribute all T&E 


 
policies and procedures


 
Implement a formal feedback loop and continuous


 
improvement process within the T&E process


 
Develop incentive structure that includes 


 
performance based compensation at the SSC, team, 


 
and individual levels.


 
Implement a relatively flat organization with high 


 
spans of control


 
Establish clear and regular communication channels 


 
and escalation paths within the P2P operation and 


 
with other related departments.


 
Institute a robust training curriculum and program


 
Employees arrange own travel through designated 


 
travel agency within organization guidelines, 


 
reclaiming cost on expense claims


 
Self approval of expense claims followed by post 


 
audit


 
Use a customized credit card statement as the 


 
expense claim form


 
Leverage an on-line travel and expense system 


 
that is fully integrated with the accounting system


 
Require employees to complete expense claims


 
electronically, using the on-line T&E system


 
Have electronic input prompt for explanation of 


 
non-compliance with company policy using 


 
validation rules


 
Require expense receipts to be mailed in pre-


 
printed/coded expense envelopes on the same 


 
day that the on-line expense claim in submitted


Receive
Receive all in-bound T&E documents in one 


Reimbursement
central location


Request
Use image processing for receipts (expense


-----
documentation)


 
Automated notification if expense receipt 


 
envelope is not received within one week of 


 
on-line expense claim submission


Authorize
Eliminate redundant reviews and approvals - 


Payment
perform post audit rather than pre-approval 


2804
in most cases


 
Segment reimbursement requests into risk 


 
categories when determining post audit sample 


 
sizes


 
Require pre-authorization only when amounts 


 
are over predetermined limits or if charges do 


 
not comply with policy


 
Embed controls in technology


Audit Expense
Eliminate redundant reviews and approvals - 


Reports
perform post audit rather than pre-approval 


2806
in most cases


 
Control T&E processes via sample audits


 
Segment reimbursement requests into risk 


 
categories when determining post audit sample 


 
sizes


 
Rout exception reports automatically to managers


 
electronically


 
Create standard, pre-defined escalation procedures 


 
for non-compliance


T&E Document
Require expense receipts to be mailed in pre-


Retention
printed/coded expense envelopes on the same 


-----
day that the on-line expense claim in submitted


 
Use image processing for receipts (expense


 
documentation)


Maintain Travel &
Use one travel agency, organization wide - 


Expense Policy
review annually


2902
Have travel policies available on-line in an 


 
easily accessible, user friendly format


 
Relevant, clearly stated financial control 


 
framework


 
Use T&E expense data to negotiate discounts 


 
with primary vendors


Manage
Provide a corporate credit card for all employees 


Corporate Card
incurring business expenses


Program 2904
Put in place an agreement with Customs and 


 
Excise for reclaiming VAT from credit card


 





Table 16 provides an explanation of the order to cash capability 126, key assessment areas within the capability and corresponding performance capability criteria.



 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 16:


 


Order to Cash (OTC) 126


 




 




Description:
A process in which an organization realizes revenue.




Role/Focus/Impact




Basic Criteria:
Focus on reducing days sales outstanding (DSO).


210
 


Competitive
Monitor and focus on improving select metrics and 


Criteria:
service levels in each area of the OTC process.


212
 


Market Leading
Drive value through OTC by comprehensively improving


Criteria:
customer service, working capital utilization, operating


214
expense, and revenue/risk mix.




Process




Basic Criteria:
Partially standardized processes by business segment;


210
substantial exception processing takes place. Deeply


 
experienced personnel relied upon to provide process 


 
and customer specific knowledge.


Competitive
Standardized and documented processes by business


Criteria:
segment; limited exception processing required. 


212
Process and customer specific knowledge captured in 


 
a repository shared by all relevant personnel.


Market Leading 
Single integrated set of standardized and documented


Criteria:
processes across all business segments; exception


214
processing is rare. Process and customer specific


 
knowledge embedded within OTC systems and workflow


 
management tools.




System




Basic Criteria:
Elements of the OTC process (Order Entry, AR, Billing)


210
integrated by single transaction processing system.


Competitive
Tightly integrated transaction processing system 


Criteria:
spanning the entire OTC process.


212
 


Market Leading
Integrated transaction processing system across OTC


Criteria:
process supported by performance management 


214
reporting and collection workflow tools.




Data




Basic Criteria:
Basic OTC reporting in place (e.g., aging analysis, 


210
unapplied cash).


Competitive
OTC cycle data used to perform issue root cause analysis


Criteria:
and develop continuous feedback channels.


212
 


Market Leading
Detailed data used to optimize the OTC cycle, prevent


Criteria:
issues, predict customer actions, and drive employee


214
performance.




Organization




Basic Criteria:
OTC personnel are distributed across business segments 


210
or sales organizations.


Competitive
Transaction processing personnel are located in low cost


Criteria:
locations using flexible sourcing models that include the 


212
use of shared services or outsourcing.


Market Leading
Most OTC personnel who are not required to spend time 


Criteria:
on customer premises are managed as integrated process


214
team(s) in low cost locations.




Controls




Basic Criteria: 
Manual process controls in place to comply with audit 


210
and Sarbanes Oxley (Sarbox) requirements.


Competitive
Basic audit and Sarbox controls are supported by 


Criteria:
systematic enforcement. Key revenue assurance 


212
controls in place.


Market Leading
System and process controls embedded within every 


Criteria:
aspect of the OTC process to facilitate Sarbox 


214
compliance, provide revenue assurance support, 


 
ensure accuracy, and drive data entry quality.


 





Table 17 describes additional market leading criteria for capabilities within the order to cash (OTC) capability 126. Market leading criteria for ‘Order to cash’ capability 126 may include: improving process efficiency, eliminating break points, and enhancing customer service; reducing operating expense, improves controls, improves scalability, and improves efficiency by consolidating operations. Improves overall performance through proactive management of the OTC process; and controlling operating expense by using part-time employees.



 

 
 



TABLE 17


 


Finance & Accounting Operations 106 -


Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




Order to Cash 
Manage OTC as an end-to-end process which integrates


126
front office customer facing functions with back office


 
transaction processing.


 
Utilize flexible sourcing models that take advantage of cost


 
reductions available by placing select staff in low cost


 
geographic locations.


 
Implement a formal feedback loop and continuous


 
improvement process within the OTC process.


 
Develop incentive structure that includes performance


 
based compensation at the BU/department, team, and


 
individual levels. Include incentives to manage attrition and


 
non-monetary incentives to build team morale.


 
Implement a relatively flat organization with high spans of


 
control.


 
Organize OTC staff in specialized teams based on function


 
and/or customer segmentation.


 
Establish clear and regular communication channels and


 
escalation paths within the OTC operation and between


 
OTC, Customer Care, Sales, and other related departments.


 
Institute a robust training curriculum and program which


 
includes initial employee training, training across


 
disciplines (functional, technical, telephone etiquette, etc.),


 
and training across the OTC process to enable integration


 
and work load balancing.


 
Establish a well defined career path for OTC staff.


 
Implement a robust performance monitoring process which


 
includes evaluation of both written and verbal customer


 
communications. Performance shortfalls should be


 
addressed directly through counseling and training.


 
Leverage a significant number of part-time staff to perform


 
activities such as inbound call handling and telephone


 
collection reminders.


 
Recognize and actively develop leadership potential of


 
OTC leadership; consider grooming for leadership


 
positions inside/outside OTC.


 
Provide performance management reporting with metrics


 
spanning the entire OTC process. Metrics should cascade


 
from the overall operation, individual business unit/


 
segment, team, and individual.


 
Provide real-time access through a common front end to all


 
required applications (where controls permit) for all OTC


 
personnel.


 
Implement resource forecasting and work load balancing in


 
the OTC process; using capacity management software for


 
large operations.


 





 FIGS. 30-35 illustrate capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the ‘order to cash’ capability 126. Table 18 describes additional market leading criteria for the capabilities of the order to cash capability 126, including criteria for: ‘Authorize and manage credit’ capability 3002 (FIG. 30); ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30); ‘Maintain customer master data’ capability 3102 (FIG. 31); ‘Invoice customer’ capability 3202 (FIG. 32); ‘Maintain NR ledger and apply cash’ capability 3302 (FIG. 33); ‘Manage and process collections’ capability 3402 (FIG. 34); and ‘Manage and Process Disputes and Deductions’ capability 3502 (FIG. 35).
Market leading criteria for ‘Authorize and manage credit’ capability 3002 (FIG. 30) may include: ensuring that the credit policy of the organization is properly enforced by confirming that the policy is clear to all parties involved; ensuring that the policy supports corporate objectives because credit risk tolerance can have a direct impact on sales and revenue; and removing conflict of interest between sales objectives and credit risk management. Credit management can be used to produce significant value but requires investment to develop and continually refine. New credit requests may be validated against current account activity, previous denials and previous write-offs, but may not be necessary for regular, high volume customers but is recommended for customers who are less established. Market leading criteria for ‘Authorize and manage credit’ capability 3002 (FIG. 30) may include: aligning all parts of the organization with the desired credit quality; eliminating conflicts of interest between managing credit quality and generating sales; reducing transaction process expense; reducing cycle time and transaction processing expense; reducing cycle time and transaction processing expense. Credit evaluations may be performed on all customers because gaps may exist regarding customer credit activity processed on systems owned by other organizations. Credit models may be updated regularly to reflect experience with different types of customers/organizations using both internal and external data. Market leading criteria for ‘Authorize and manage credit’ capability 3002 (FIG. 30) may improve customer satisfaction by simplifying the credit evaluation process. Using credit risk to differentiate treatment is a leading practice most commonly used with consumer debt but may also be applied for business customers (e.g., the customer base may include a significant small business component).
Market leading criteria for ‘Authorize and manage credit’ capability 3002 may include restricting risky customers to lower tier product/services until credit worthiness is proven; and limiting uncollectible charges by blocking premium tier product/services. For example, a new customer for Product Line A may already have history with Product Line B so the Product Line B data should be used in making a new credit decision. Authorize and manage credit’ capability 3002 may include: improving the ability to manage credit risk by having a complete view into exposure related to a particular customer; reducing credit risk exposure by limiting fraudulent activity. Reducing credit risk exposure by limiting fraudulent activity may include: using deposits or automatic bill pay to minimize credit risk and allow the organization to do business with customers that would otherwise be turned down. Market leading criteria for Authorize and manage credit’ capability 3002 (FIG. 30) may include: maximizing coverage for credit scoring and updating; and using 3rd party data to provide a broader base of information, beyond information available internally, on which to evaluate credit worthiness. Market leading criteria for ‘Authorize and manage credit’ capability 3002 (FIG. 30) prevents and reduces fraudulent activity such as the use of a stolen identity and/or other account information, and reduces cycle time and transaction processing expenses, and may include providing online access to information that can be used throughout the OTC process including collections.
Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) may include implementing an integrated solution for pricing, order entry, invoicing, and credit. Accurate terms and pricing may reduce customer disputes and improve working capital utilization. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) provides a basic check and balance that allows the business to consciously determine when and where margin exceptions may be made rather than leaving margin decisions open to the sales force which is often incented only on sales. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) facilitates consistency between customer expectations and pricing that is ultimately recorded and serves to validate accuracy before producing an invoice, thereby, minimizing collection issues. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) may address permitted time and conditions of authorized return, price to be credited (e.g., avg. price/period or actual price), freight/handling fees, and required documentation. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) may ensure an organization can leverage a well defined and controlled returns process consistent w/policy, reduce errors, customer disputes, unauthorized returns, and reverse logistics processing cost. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) may avoid pricing discrepancies between credit memos and customer's deductions, which leads to revenue leakage and follow-up efforts.
Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) may include: using bar-coded RMA's and hand-held scanners in the returns process. Returns screens may prompt for RMA#, SKU or UPC code, quantity, disposition and physical state of the merchandise. The RMA may be reconciled against the return to record quantity received for credit. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) may reduce cycle time and improve error prone data entry and credit processing typically associated with a paper-based returns process, and support monitoring what is approved as a return versus what is actually received as a return. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) may include monitoring cycle time and total credit exposure.
Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) may include: providing customers a way to generate their own orders on-line or via EDI. The selection criteria for product quantities may be tied to what can be shipped, and credit cards may be accepted. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) may include: reducing cycle time and transaction processing expense; eliminating many ordering errors including those that require follow-up calls to customers; and allowing for reduction in DSO with credit card payment. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) may include: incorporating a web-enabled or system look-up to show stock availability into the order process; providing a web-enabled site for a quick reference to determine when a backordered product may be available; and providing customers the option to receive an e-mail alert when stock is available, thereby eliminating the need for the customer to periodically check product availability. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) may include: implementing online and/or e-RMA solutions that enable return requests to be submitted over the Internet on customized forms and allow the return to be linked to the original order; providing real-time reporting on the products returned, the reasons and sources of returns; increasing control and policy compliance to reduce credit discrepancies; coordinating with key customers to reduce errors and miscommunication; and reducing cycle time and disputes.
Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) may include: reduces working capital requirements; employing electronic catalogues to facilitate customer awareness of broader product offerings; maintaining appropriate training of order entry personnel, so that companies may sell upgrades and/or additional services that might be appropriate for the customer; requiring small customers to adhere to price schedules, while allowing key customers to leverage volume discounts; establishing long term contracts to “lock in” customers as opposed to continuous renegotiating; preventing pricing discrepancies and associated rework to correct customer accounts. Longer term contracts may reduce the amount of time and the effort spent to renegotiate and ensure continued sales for a longer period of time. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) may include: establishing order entry system validations to ensure accurate information is captured at the time of order entry and/or shortly after order submission (e.g., units of measure, reasonable quantities based on historical/average purchases, payment terms, ship to address, and customer number); preventing incomplete orders from being processed and/or occurring unless all relevant data is captured at the time of order entry. Upfront validation increases control, improves quality of data and reduced re-work and questions from warehouses and collections. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) may include: implementing a link between the order entry and the warranty system (e.g., to verify that the customer requesting a part under warranty actually purchased the system for which the part is required) and thereby reducing ordering errors and eliminating the majority of unauthorized warranty claims. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) may include: preventing pricing discrepancies and associated rework to correct customer accounts; providing electronic order notifications and advanced shipping notifications to customers to confirm what has been ordered, the price that will be billed, and validate orders quickly before the shipment is released, rather than relying on back-end disputes to identify discrepancies. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage sales orders’ capability 3004 (FIG. 30) may include: implementing automated methods (e.g., auto-fax, auto e-mail, and/or web-portal) that provide the customer the ability to review the order details without manual print and faxing; integrating fax purchase orders with OCR software to semi-automate the order entry process; and electronically storing for future research, inquiries and quality audits orders where OCR is not an option (e.g., images of each faxed purchase order), where customers are unwilling and/or unable to transmit purchase orders electronically.
Market leading criteria for ‘Maintain customer master data’ capability 3102 (FIG. 31) may include: enabling customers to track their own orders, shipment details, and history on the internet, using a unique customer number and order reference number for each purchase and thereby reducing manual inquiries and increasing customer satisfaction. Market leading criteria for ‘Maintain customer master data’ capability 3102 (FIG. 31) may include: increasing control over price changes; managing inventories across corporate boundaries; integrating purchasing, manufacturing operations, logistics, invoicing, claims, returns, and backlog management; increasing communication across divisions; and implementing integrated management of product and customer relationships up and down the supply chain.
Market leading criteria for ‘Maintain customer master data’ capability 3102 (FIG. 31) may include: minimizing integration issues by using consistent nomenclature across business areas and systems; providing the basis to perform analysis on total credit exposure; ensuring that the organization can seamlessly serve customers at both the parent and child levels. Customer information may be captured at the beginning of the process rather than in arrears so as to avoid processing errors, reduce communication challenges, and improve analytical capabilities by having one customer master entry per customer. Market leading criteria for ‘Maintain customer master data’ capability 3102 (FIG. 31) may include: increasing agent efficiency and improving the customer experience by quickly retrieving relevant data using whatever information the customer is readily able to present; avoiding future issues by confirming correct customer account details; reducing fraud generated by identify theft and using information to aid the collections process and any potential skip tracing requests; and improving customer communications to improve working capital utilization and the customer experience.
Market leading criteria for ‘Invoice customer’ capability 3202 (FIG. 32) may include: minimizing integration issues by using consistent nomenclature across business areas and systems; providing the basis to perform analysis on total credit exposure. ‘Invoice customer’ capability 3202 (FIG. 32) may ensure that the organization can seamlessly serve customers at both the parent and child levels. Market leading criteria for ‘Invoice customer’ capability 3202 (FIG. 32) may include: implementing electronic delivery (e.g., EDI, email, and self-service options); reducing disputes and improving working capital utilization, which is particularly important in high volume operations; ensuring ensure customers know where/who to contact when facing a billing issue, rather than letting an issue turn into a collections problem. Information access is critical for managing credit risk, collections, and resolving customer disputes. Fees may include reactivation, NSF check charges, and late fees.
Market leading criteria for ‘Invoice customer’ capability 3202 (FIG. 32) may reduce operating expense, fosters accuracy and consistency in revenue recognition, and aid in achieving revenue recognition compliance across the organization. Market leading criteria for ‘Invoice customer’ capability 3202 (FIG. 32) may reduce fraud generated by identify theft, aid in the collections process and any potential skip tracing requests. Market leading criteria for ‘Invoice customer’ capability 3202 (FIG. 32) may enable the organization to provide more clear and effective customer communications that in turn improves working capital utilization and the customer experience, and promotes quality and consistency in the data masters.
Market leading criteria for ‘Invoice customer’ capability 3202 (FIG. 32) may include: placing credit as an approval step when changing customer financial information, which may facilitate managing the credit exposure of an organization. Market leading criteria for ‘Invoice customer’ capability 3202 (FIG. 32) may improves efficiency across the OTC process by making information easier to locate and reduce complication in supporting IT systems.
‘Maintain A/R ledger and apply cash’ capability 3302 (FIG. 33) may include: reducing cycle time and transaction processing expenses; improving working capital utilization; establishing predictability with bad debt reserves; ensuring the availability of source document and information to improve efficiency, reduce cycle time, transaction processing expense and improve customer service; improving working capital utilization. ‘Maintain A/R ledger and apply cash’ capability 3302 (FIG. 33) may reduce AR transaction processing expense by leveraging low cost labor markets and provide visibility to the most current balances to be used by credit, collections, billing, and disputes. ‘Maintain A/R ledger and apply cash’ capability 3302 (FIG. 33) may provide visibility to short payments to pinpoint areas where preventative measures can be pursued, maintain a clean AR ledger and reduce customer service issues by providing a current view of the account. ‘Maintain A/R ledger and apply cash’ capability 3302 (FIG. 33) may improve working capital utilization and reduce operating expense by developing solutions to correct cash posting issues rather than leveraging staff to continually resolve.
Market leading criteria for ‘Manage and process collections’ capability 3402 (FIG. 34) may include: employing multiple servicing locations based on language requirements; ensuring that collectors have complete and accurate information when discussing collection issues with the customer; providing the information in a condensed format to improve collector efficiency and average handle times. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage and process collections’ capability 3402 (FIG. 34) may reduce cycle time and process expenses, provide the ability to leverage low cost channels for certain customer segments and risk profiles, improve working capital utilization and reduce transaction processing expenses. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage and process collections’ capability 3402 (FIG. 34) may improve operating expense and collector efficiency by reducing wasted processing, and improve working capital utilization and reduce transaction processing expenses. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage and process collections’ capability 3402 (FIG. 34) may include: implementing metrics that cascade down from aggregate level, BU/product/service line, geography, team, and individual collector. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage and process collections’ capability 3402 (FIG. 34) may include: measuring the performance of collectors based on the reduction in bad debt and cash collected rather than on number of customer contacts made; reviewing the number of contacts when the collector is not meeting cash collection targets; providing visibility into which segments and/or accounts drive DSO. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage and process collections’ capability 3402 (FIG. 34) may include: prioritizing based on aging bucket, balance, segment, targeted collection campaign and/or other criteria; allowing collectors to address issues within certain parameters to improve customer satisfaction and/or retention; actively monitoring and adjusting differentiated treatments to optimize results and costs for each strategy.
Market leading criteria for ‘Manage and process collections’ capability 3402 (FIG. 34) may include: requiring collectors to increase severity and use of a stronger tone as the debt ages and gets harder to collect. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage and process collections’ capability 3402 (FIG. 34) may prevent debt from moving to late stage delinquency and becoming uncollectible. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage and process collections’ capability 3402 (FIG. 34) may include: modifying a treatment (e.g., manner of handling delinquency) when the customer provides an indication that the current form of treatment may not be successful. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage and process collections’ capability 3402 (FIG. 34) may maximize the use of collector time and efforts, ensure the account progresses through the treatment cycle and use PTPs to help improve cash forecast accuracy and use these as a key input to driving collector performance. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage and process collections’ capability 3402 (FIG. 34) may include: improving collections by having specific tasks performed by organizations (e.g., SSC and/or BPO) where such tasks are core competencies. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage and process collections’ capability 3402 (FIG. 34) may include: improving collections performance by using groups specializing in specific types of collections; and keeping AR ledger clean, and avoiding spending additional time and/or expense on balances that cannot be collected. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage and process collections’ capability 3402 (FIG. 34) may include: making a final attempt to collect internally to avoid external agency fees; and designing and implementing the ‘Manage and process collections’ capability integrated with the overall telephony infrastructure; supported by a call monitoring/recording tool in medium to high volume operations; routing calls to reduce operating expense; providing targeted coaching and frequent adjustments; and evaluating a cost/benefit analysis of the capability to establish parameters for which accounts are contacted proactively.
Market leading criteria for ‘Manage and process collections’ capability 3402 may include: implementing call scripting embedded in training and/or provided through a call scripting tool; implementing automated tools to improve agent call performance; systematically analyzing and adjusting treatment strategy to improve collections effectiveness; reducing operating expense by capturing PTPs in an automated fashion.
‘Manage and Process Disputes and Deductions’ capability 3502 (FIG. 35) may include: managing the quantity of potential deductions and/or disputes by clear communication and strict adherence to policy; and establishing a standard set of reason codes, rather than free form text, provides a solid basis by which reporting and analysis can be performed on issues occurring in the OTC cycle. Breakdowns in the OTC process often manifest themselves as a customer deduction and/or dispute and may be recurring issues. ‘Manage and Process Disputes and Deductions’ capability 3502 (FIG. 35) may include: eliminating and/or reducing customer deduction and/or disputes by tracking, evaluating and correcting such deduction and/or disputes.
Overall margins can be eroded when agents offer adjustments that exceed desired limits (e.g., offering a $100 adjustment for a customer that generates $50 in margin annually). ‘Manage and Process Disputes and Deductions’ capability 3502 (FIG. 35) may include: conducting training to develop the specialized skill of exception handling; and creating a focused, highly skilled team may shorten the resolution cycle time which may drive improved customer satisfaction and working capital utilization. Manage and Process Disputes and Deductions' capability 3502 (FIG. 35) may include: requiring personnel familiar with deduction/dispute issues categorizing and reporting to perform task in order to facilitate consistency in reporting and categorization; conducting and communicating Top 10/Top 20 Reason Code and by Customer analysis to relevant parties (e.g., Sales, Collections and Management).
Market leading criteria for ‘Manage Customer Requests and Inquiries’ capability 3504 (FIG. 35) may include: reducing operating expense and improve customer satisfaction by automating the handling of routine inquiries with IVR so that staff are able to focus on exception items and analysis; providing a toll-free and/or local phone number to customers to facilitate access to key order shipment information. Market leading criteria for ‘Manage Customer Requests and Inquiries’ capability 3504 (FIG. 35) may include: utilizing phone numbers by country to enable routing of calls with common language preferences; reducing the need to contact the customer multiple times for the same request; dedicating personnel to ‘Manage Customer Requests and Inquiries’ capability may develop an efficient and consistent way of handling customer inquiries and/or requests.
Market leading criteria for ‘Perform Revenue Assurance Activities’ capability 3506 (FIG. 35) may include: driving the increase revenue and improve working capital utilization; while reducing fraud. Market leading criteria for ‘Perform Revenue Assurance Activities’ capability 3506 (FIG. 35) may involve varying sources of revenue by industry, switch (e.g., telecommunications), meter (e.g., utilities), and point of sale (e.g., products).



 

 
 



TABLE 18


 


Order to Cash 126 -


Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




Authorize 
Credit policy is clearly defined, monitored, communicated


and
and operationalized.


Manage 
Credit policy supports the sales and marketing strategy,


Credit
corporate vision, and financial goals.


3002
Credit decision and maintenance functions separated from


 
Sales organization.


 
The value provided by credit scoring is widely accepted in


 
the organization and model development receives


 
appropriate funding


 
Develop internal tracking of positive and negative events to


 
use during the credit approval process.


 
Establish regular credit line reviews throughout entire


 
customer lifecycle.


 
Encourage appropriate credit quality by linking sales/staff


 
compensation to net portfolio profitability.


 
Online credit applications available to customers and/or


 
sales force to submit new requests which are tracked and


 
have online status available until decided. Utilize Optical


 
Character Recognition (OCR) when paper forms are


 
required.


 
Allow customers to submit self-service requests for credit


 
line changes.


 
Allow immediate approval for customers with good


 
previous history.


 
Credit decisions span all customer acquisition channels


 
including affiliates, resellers, points of sale, kiosks, etc.


 
Automate credit analysis and initial credit line approval


 
using rule-based decision support capability which is


 
regularly updated.


 
Provide an initial credit approval process which meets


 
customer expectations as being logical and


 
straightforward.


 
Accounts assigned a risk score which is used to


 
differentiate treatment/handling throughout the customer


 
lifecycle.


 
Multiple tiers of credit approval supported.


 
Where customers have activity across multiple business


 
units or product lines, use data from all available sources


 
to make credit decisions.


 
Monitor total customer credit exposure including subsidiary


 
activity, child accounts, and activity across product lines.


 
Systematic review of selected accounts, particularly high


 
risk accounts, for abnormal activity.


 
Optimize the balance of credit risk and revenue/market


 
share by using risk adjusted pricing, offerings, and terms to


 
do business profitably with customers having lesser credit


 
quality.


 
Use of external alert notification to trigger action based on


 
changes in customer information.


 
Use of waterfall methodology employing multiple credit


 
bureaus


 
Exchange data with outside credit bureaus and ‘negative


 
database’ for credit information, bad debt, fraud, etc.


 
Utilize fraud and positive identification systems to support


 
the credit risk management.


 
Identify during credit evaluation any new account requests


 
where the customer has an existing parent/child record in


 
the customer master.


 
Automatic credit line increase/decrease initiated based on


 
continuous monitoring of internal/external activity (behavior


 
scoring).


Manage
Quote and order management systems are integrated with


Sales
current and accurate terms/pricing master which can be


Orders
quickly and easily updated.


3004
Establish target profitability guidelines and ensure


 
customer quotes meet those guidelines; unless exceptions


 
have been approved through a controlled process.


 
Manage all customer quotes in a system with appropriate


 
version control and history.


 
Communicate full terms of sale in customer


 
communications including product brochures (where


 
possible), quotes, deal sheets, the contract, and other


 
sales materials.


 
Standard terms are defined by policy and deviation is


 
approved/monitored including those involving special


 
pricing, promotions, payment terms, returns policy, late


 
fees, etc.


 
Use consistent format/information to communicate with


 
both customers and the order entry team. Information


 
going to the order entry team should contain the necessary


 
information to accurately record revenue.


 
Confirm upon receipt that customer purchase order is


 
consistent with pricing and terms of sale and that


 
information is consistent with published standards.


 
Return policy is enforced and utilizes a process that


 
minimizes complexity.


 
Bar-coded RMA's (return merchandise authorization)


 
received with handheld scanners


 
Provide real-time visibility to pending orders.


 
Maximize use of paperless ordering including internet and


 
electronic data interchange (EDI).


 
Provide real-time inventory data to sales, order entry, and


 
customers (where appropriate).


 
Online returns authorization process


 
Order management maintains complete and updated


 
documentation to comply with requirements of key


 
customers.


 
Utilize and automated replenishment capability to help


 
minimize required on hand inventory.


 
On-line electronic catalogs


 
Utilize customer insight and product training for agents to


 
cross-sell and up-sell at time of order.


 
Customize pricing strategy by customer segment (where


 
allowed).


 
Perform reasonableness validation/alerts.


 
Implement a direct link between the order entry system and


 
the warranty system.


 
Alert notification process to proactively identify price


 
changes that occur for orders that are in progress.


 
Automated customer notification


 
Image and/or digitize paper based or faxed purchase


 
orders using Optical Character Recognition (OCR).


 
On-line self service order tracking


 
Reports to monitor price overrides are monitored and


 
related approvals are tracked.


 
Organize around supply chain management concept (true


 
end-to-end process).


Customer 
Develop consolidated customer master which uses a


Master
standard naming/number convention and contains all


Data
essential customer attributes including addresses, credit


3102
score, and payment terms.


 
Support customer parent/child relationships in the


 
customer master and any supporting systems.


 
Collect and store necessary customer information and


 
demographics before or during the order entry process.


 
Develop customer segmentation methodology can capture


 
appropriate attributes in the customer master.


 
Implement duplicate account edits which are executed


 
during account setup and perform periodic duplicate


 
account reviews.


 
Customer service representatives have multiple search


 
mechanisms (e.g., account number, account name, phone,


 
invoice number, etc.) available to access customer data.


 
This data should be integrated seamlessly to customer


 
account/history.


 
Conduct an account verification/approval upon completing


 
customer account setup.


 
Include customer identification as part of account setup


 
and verification.


 
For consumer driven organizations, collect customer


 
identification such as drivers license number, government


 
ID, employer, bank account and other information.


 
Flag the customer master with the primary language to be


 
used in written/oral communications with the customer.


Invoice 
Develop consolidated customer master which uses a


Customer
standard naming/number convention and contains all


3202
essential customer attributes including addresses, credit


 
score, and payment terms.


 
Support customer parent/child relationships in the


 
customer master and any supporting systems.


 
Collect and store necessary customer information and


 
demographics before or during the order entry process.


 
Develop customer segmentation methodology can capture


 
appropriate attributes in the customer master.


 
Implement duplicate account edits which are executed


 
during account setup and perform periodic duplicate


 
account reviews.


 
Customer service representatives have multiple search


 
mechanisms (e.g., account number, account name, phone,


 
invoice number, etc.) available to access customer data.


 
This data should be integrated seamlessly to customer


 
account/history.


 
Conduct an account verification/approval upon completing


 
customer account setup.


 
Provide standard, automatically consolidated invoice


 
formats which are utilized across customers, business


 
units, geographies, languages, and product/service lines.


 
Identify and document a set of standard, automatically


 
executed billing triggers.


 
Invoices should be clear, intuitive, comprehensive, and


 
legible when scanned.


 
Provide ability to delivery invoices electronically and incent


 
customers to accept electronic delivery.


 
Proactively confirm that the first invoice sent to a customer


 
meets their processing requirements and contains the


 
correct customer/billing information.


 
Balance/spread billing cycles throughout the period rather


 
than batching and issuing invoices all at once.


 
Invoices and statements carry contact number with specific


 
contact name. For high volume operations, the number


 
should be listed (no name) and that number staffed for


 
rapid answer.


 
Provide on demand, online access to historical billing/


 
volume information containing at least 12 months history.


 
Billing system allows for automatic charge of special fees.


 
For printed invoices, control reports should be put in place


 
to ensure all expected invoices are printed.


 
Invoicing is done on the same day as product shipment or


 
service delivery (where appropriate for the business


 
model).


 
Approvals/routing for credit memos, rebilling, and invoice


 
adjustments are workflow enabled.


 
Utilize bulk mailing solutions to minimize mail costs.


 
Establish clear, well defined revenue recognition guidelines.


 
Provide revenue recognition training across the organization 


 
including executives and sales force.


 
Include customer identification as part of account setup


 
and verification.


 
For consumer driven organizations, collect customer


 
identification such as drivers license number, government


 
ID, employer, bank account and other information.


 
Flag the customer master with the primary language to be


 
used in written/oral communications with the customer.


 
Establish system enforced controls that limit which


 
personnel have access to change master data.


 
Financial oriented changes to customer accounts should


 
be routed through the Credit function for approval.


 
Establish and adhere to a clearly defined account purge


 
policy.


Maintain 
Maximize use of electronic payment channels including


A/R 
credit/debit card, automated bill pay, internet and EDI.


Ledger
Provide automated posting of electronic payments.


and
Paper based cash receipts processed through consolidated 


Apply 
lock box network and posted electronically.


Cash
Paper documents including remittances and credit/debit


3302
memos are scanned and stored for electronic retrieval by


 
those involved in the OTC process including customer


 
care, sales, finance, etc.


 
Complete periodic lock box studies to maintain best geo-


 
graphic distribution and/or mail times.


 
Automated cash application algorithms and OCR technology 


 
used to electronically match payments to invoices.


 
Utilize low cost shared service center or outsourcer to


 
handle manual cash application, research unapplied cash,


 
and resolve cash posting exceptions.


 
Automate cash discount earned/unearned transactions at


 
time of cash application.


 
Payments, credits, and adjustments applied to customer


 
balances real-time or, at a minimum, on day of receipt.


 
Financially incent customer behavior. Offer early invoice


 
discounts strategically for high value customers that pay


 
late and/or require collections activity. Apply late fees and


 
penalties for those who pay beyond terms.


 
Utilize product holds and other operational enforcement to


 
help shape customer behavior when late payment is


 
recurring. This capability should be enabled through an


 
integrated transaction processing system.


 
Customer short payments/deductions set up as unique


 
new items versus being set only as a short pay which are


 
passed to a group that specializes in handling exceptions.


 
Allow for systematic removal of small balances (invoice or


 
account level) due to incorrect amount remitted. Maintain


 
edit/audit control reporting to indicate any abuse.


 
Where the customer is also a vendor, net refunds/rebates


 
against outstanding accounts payable (if mutually agreed).


 
Clear unapplied cash on a daily basis.


 
Track and analyze root causes of unapplied cash or


 
exception payments to provide the basis for developing


 
corrective/preventative solutions.


 
Bad debt reserves policy and calculation is based on


 
historic revenue and charge off experience.


Manage 
Perform collections from a consolidated servicing


and
location(s) supporting multiple business units,


Process
product/service lines, and geographies.


Collections
Provide collector with complete customer account


3302
information including contact/correspondence history,


 
account activity, and customer invoices (preferably in the


 
exact format seen by the customer). Minimize the number


 
of screens necessary to display this information to the


 
collector.


 
Provide self-service capabilities (e.g., internet, IVR) that


 
allow customers to access account information, view


 
information on commonly asked questions, review terms of


 
sale, initiate questions, resolve issues, track invoice status,


 
and review account documentation.


 
Develop multiple channels to contact customer including


 
direct mail, email, voice mail, SMS, and live agents.


 
Provide multiple payment channels including automated bill


 
pay, direct debit, electronic bill presentment, internet,


 
electronic check, and personal/corporate credit card.


 
Integrate collections system with AR such that payments


 
can be recognized real-time in the collections system.


 
Incent customers to adopt automated bill payment


 
methods.


 
Create a collections reporting dashboard that provides


 
daily and/or weekly metrics from aggregate level down to


 
individual collectors. This information should be shared


 
with the collections team members as well as business


 
owners supported by the team.


 
Team/Collector performance metrics based on effectiveness 


 
rather than throughput measures.


 
Throughput measures should be used to investigate


 
effectiveness shortfalls.


 
Collection metrics should be aligned with overall corporate/


 
departmental strategy and objectives.


 
Measure/monitor average days to pay/average days late


 
for all customer segments with drill down to individual


 
accounts.


 
Collector workstation should organize and prioritize


 
collectors work based on criteria defined by the management 


 
team.


 
Collections staff should be empowered with well-defined


 
and appropriate approval authorities for write-offs,


 
settlements, collections expenses, and settlements.


 
Defined collection treatment cycles should be tailored


 
based on: type of customer (e.g., personal vs. corporate),


 
risk classification, historical behavior, and other groupings


 
(e.g., industry classification). These should be updated on


 
a periodic basis.


 
Dunning letters and other customer contacts should


 
demonstrate an intensity that appropriately reflects that


 
stage of the debt and current customer relationship.


 
Offset customer overpayments/rebates/credits against any


 
outstanding balances.


 
Offer early pay incentives (monetary or non-monetary) to


 
drive timely payment.


 
Collectors should be trained to focus on “curing” the account


 
as a top priority.


 
Focus time and a portion of the organization's best collectors 


 
on earlier stage delinquencies; particularly large balances.


 
Transfer collections activities between stages based on


 
events rather than elapsed time.


 
Outstanding debt pursued by “total account” rather than by


 
each invoice.


 
A follow up action is created based on the outcome of each


 
collections contact.


 
Capture promises to pay (PTPs) in the collections tool and


 
use that information to establish the next collections action,


 
to help formulate cash flow reporting, and to monitor


 
collector performance.


 
Leverage outside collection agencies (OCAS) for small


 
balance collections, recoveries, legal, and skip tracing


 
using criteria which includes skill specialization, regional


 
presence, scalability and performance.


 
Utilize multiple OCAS to create competition and


 
comparability. Incent the OCAS with additional volume


 
rather than cash bonuses.


 
Automated transfer of accounts to external OCAS or legal


 
services, according to collection policy.


 
Allow automatic write-off for uncollectible balances/accounts 


 
up to a pre-defined level, if treatment is unsuccessful.


 
Use properly experienced staff to address hard to collect


 
accounts as a final step prior to outside collections


 
placement.


 
Route multiple incoming phone numbers to consolidated


 
servicing location(s) using the actual numbers to drive call


 
handling and priorities.


 
Minimize call transfers and call backs required.


 
Transferred calls should carry forward the current state of


 
the customer inquiry.


 
Live inquiries initiated from an IVR or other self service 


 
tool should pass details from the self-service tool to the agent.


 
Management monitors/samples actual collection contact


 
calls on a regular basis to assess interaction, approach,


 
performance and to provide agent coaching.


 
Automated call distribution (ACD) used to route calls.


 
Establish daily/weekly cash targets for department, group,


 
individuals.


 
Provide technology for collectors to accept credit cards,


 
electronic checks, and other forms of immediate payment


 
during a customer contact.


 
Use proactive customer calls for larger accounts/invoices


 
and habitually past due customers.


 
Charge bad debt losses against salesperson commissions.


 
Maintain collector alignment by customer whenever


 
possible.


 
Provide multi-lingual support for phone contact and cor-


 
respondence as necessary.


 
Utilize caller identification and computer telephone


 
integration (CTI) to route inbound calls and automatically


 
retrieve customer information.


 
Utilize Automatic Number Identification (ANI) to capture


 
potential contact numbers for delinquent/written off accounts.


 
Leverage a predictive dialer to improve agent utilization;


 
include use of agentless jobs and answering machine


 
detection to leave automated messages regarding


 
delinquent accounts.


 
Blend the dialer to handle inbound and outbound calls


 
simultaneously.


 
Use call scripting specific to each call type to assure proper


 
steps, actions, and follow through are taken.


 
Automate evaluation and scoring of collector performance


 
on live customer calls.


 
Behavioral scoring system utilized to automatically assign


 
treatment strategy based on historical customer behavior.


 
Adaptive modeling used to continually test and modify the


 
results of various treatment strategies.


 
Leverage advanced ACD functionality including skill based


 
call routing, load balancing, announcements, messaging,


 
and priority inquiry handling.


 
IVR enabled to accept promise-to-pays (PTP) and update


 
the customer account record. Transfer call to a live agent


 
if the PTP is too low or promise date is too far out.


 
Automate collection contacts for initial past due contact for


 
appropriate customer segments using email, letter, or voice


 
blast.


 
Utilize “scoring” in collection agency selection to identify


 
which agency is most effective on which types of accounts.


 
Voice mail/voice blast capability in place to remind


 
customers of overdue balances.


 
Accounts in an advanced state of collections are routed


 
directly to the collections center when they contact the


 
organization for product or service.


 
Automatically reinstatement of services for accounts when


 
minimum thresholds for payment have been reached or


 
adjustments made.


Manage and
Set clear policy and enforcement on disputes/deductions


Process
for documentation and time period accepted.


Disputes 
Identify and define a standard set of reason codes to be


and
assigned to all disputes/deductions. These codes, along


Deductions
with other information about the account (e.g., geography)


3502
should be used to determine the issue routing patch and


 
expected resolution timeframe.


 
Formulate a continuous improvement activity/function that


 
uses customer inquiry/dispute data to perform root cause


 
analysis to implement resolutions.


 
Assign clear accountabilities and timeframes for the


 
escalation and resolution of customer deductions/disputes;


 
with some portion of compensation linked to deduction/


 
dispute metrics.


 
Authorize customer service and/or collection agents to


 
resolve deductions/disputes on a real-time basis, within a


 
certain pre-defined limit.


 
Establish adjustment guidelines which link adjustment levels 


 
with the economic value of the customer.


 
Establish a separate function/group responsible for exception 


 
handling and resolution.


 
Exception management function is responsible for determin-


 
ing dispute/deduction reason code based on documentation 


 
and/or specific actionable knowledge.


 
Notify customers in advance of netting credit memos


 
against outstanding AR.


 
Leverage a tool designed specifically for the purpose of


 
deduction/dispute handling including the ability to identify,


 
categorize, track, report, workflow, escalate, and close


 
customer exceptions.


 
Implement exception reporting which shows number of


 
occurrences and financial exposure to be used in analyzing


 
root cause, customer concentrations, trends, and resolution 


 
performance.


Manage
Maximize the use of self-service using a customer portal to


Customer
provide online bill presentment, online payment options,


Requests 
transaction history, dispute handling, copies of documents


and
(e.g., invoice, proof of delivery, purchase order, contract),


Inquiries
submit requests, answer FAQs, etc.


3504
Integrated voice response (IVR) for routine customer


 
inquiries


 
Toll-free/local phone number for order claims and inquiries


 
Capture during the initial customer inquiry/request all


 
information necessary to categorize, route, and resolve the


 
inquiry


 
Establish an inquiry handling function or help desk as a


 
distinct function within the OTC process


 





 FIGS. 36-37 illustrate capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the ‘product costing and inventory accounting’ capability 128. Each capability within the ‘product costing and inventory accounting’ capability 128 may include one or more key assessment areas and corresponding performance capability criteria.
Table 19 provides an explanation of the ‘maintain finance systems and data structures’ capability 132, key assessment areas within the capability and corresponding performance capability criteria.



 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 19


 


Maintain Finance Systems and Data Structures 132


 




 




Description:
Refers to the maintenance of finance data structures and


 
finance systems.




Data Structure




Market 
Formal enterprise data model (x-functional, financial and 


Leading
non-financial, internal and external); consistent data 


Criteria:
definitions; high data quality and integrity


214
 




Performance Language




Market 
Common performance language across the enterprise; robust


Leading
and consistent definitions for metrics, measures, and info


Criteria:
requirements; no debate about common measures such as


214
“customer” or “headcount”; formal templates, formulas, &


 
guidelines for recurring analyses




Data Governance




Market 
Centralized data governance and control; formal policy and


Leading
procedures


Criteria:
 


214
 




Systems Architecture




Basic 
Multiple ERP and legacy systems; numerous point-to-point


Criteria:
interfaces; spreadsheets and/or various stand alone


210
applications dominate planning, forecasting, data analysis,


 
and reporting activities; no web enablement


Competitive
Single ERP system, but with exceptions; some legacy


Criteria:
systems not yet decommissioned; best of breed extensions


212
(e.g., data warehouse, planning/forecasting) not fully


 
integrated and/or deployed inconsistently; spreadsheets still


 
tool of choice


Market 
Single ERP system used worldwide; essentially no legacy


Leading
systems; integrated best of breed extensions (e.g., data


Criteria:
warehouse, planning/forecasting) consistently used;


214
spreadsheets as “supplements” only; web connections to


 
customers, suppliers, and partners; automated work flow




Information Access




Market 
Automated information access and delivery


Leading
 


Criteria:
 


214


 





 FIG. 38 illustrates capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the ‘maintain finance system and data structure’ capability 132. Table 20 describes additional market leading criteria for capabilities within the ‘maintain finance system and data structure’ capability 132. ‘Maintain finance system and data structure’ capability 132 may include: ‘Maintain Enterprise Data Model; Perform Data Governance Activities’ capability 3802; and ‘Maintain Integrated Finance Information Technology Architecture’ capability 3804.
Market leading criteria for ‘Maintain Enterprise Data Model; Perform Data Governance Activities’ capability 3802 may include: implementing a cross functional data model that supports financial and non-financial internal and external; centralizing ownership to achieve and maintain a standardization and consistency; ensuring that corporate controls all master data changes; leveraging formal request template, approval structure, central control, and policy; and defining specific standards that must be met in order to perform a particular operation (e.g., add a new account and cost center); ensuring that all master data elements are used consistently by all entities within the enterprise and use the identical definition; maintaining the master data information in an easily accessible “data dictionary” (e.g., data elements such as customer, product, project, geography, market, contract type, pricing level, and channel). For example, data structures should accommodate an acquisition and/or an internal restructuring without significant manual effort to “move data around”. Market leading criteria for ‘Maintain Enterprise Data Model; Perform Data Governance Activities’ capability 3802 may include: designing financial performance language (e.g., terms and metrics) that support the key business objectives of the organization; identifying KPIs by which the organization desires to operate the business; designing the financial performance language to enable reporting by the KPIs of the business. Multiple vendor records can lead to inaccuracies in tracking and managing individual vendor activity. Separate records can also lead to separate contracts with different prices and payment terms for identical items. Structured parent-child relationships allow companies to address the situation where they deal with multiple entities within the same vendor company. Market leading criteria for ‘Maintain Enterprise Data Model; Perform Data Governance Activities’ capability 3802 may include: providing major ERP vendors robust vendor master data management capabilities to efficiently produce visibility into global purchasing commitments, spend, and payables balance for each supplier and to maximize buying power and prevent duplicate payments. Market leading criteria for ‘Maintain Enterprise Data Model; Perform Data Governance Activities’ capability 3802 may include: employing consistent nomenclature across business areas and systems; providing the basis to perform analysis on total credit exposure and customer segmentation in reporting, analysis, and collections; employing robust and consistent definitions for all key metrics, assets, and decision support information requirements; defining unit of measure, formula, data source, frequency, and dimensions; and ensuring consistent use of a performance language dictionary to eliminate or minimize debate about straightforward measures. For example, implement a standard “make vs. buy” analysis template and/or a standard “capital project approval request” document.
Market leading criteria for ‘Maintain Integrated Finance Information Technology Architecture’ capability 3804 may include: leveraging a single ERP system across all geographies and business units. A complex IT architecture is a significant driver of cost (e.g., excess data gathering, reconciliation, data entry, and IT maintenance) and a barrier to optimized process design. Market leading criteria for ‘Maintain Integrated Finance Information Technology Architecture’ capability 3804 may include: employing best of breed data warehouse and planning, reporting and analytic tools superior to the functionality offered within ERP systems; and integrating the tools with the ERP system; implementing online, dashboard style presentation of key data; customizing dashboards for all key executives and delivered directly via the financial systems; implementing dashboards with simple user interfaces; ensuring the use of single, best of breed reporting and analysis application consistently throughout the organization; and ensuring the use of spreadsheets are used as “supplements” rather than primary finance analysis tools.



 

 
 



TABLE 20


 


Maintain Finance Systems and Data Structures 132 -


Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




Maintain
Maintain formal enterprise data model


Enterprise 
Maintain master data centrally


Data Model; 
Adopt a formal master data add/change/delete process


Perform Data 
and policy


Governance
Ensure consistent data definitions for all master data


Activities
Data structure should support multi-dimensional profitability 


3802
analysis for all relevant dimensions


 
Integrate processes and controls to maintain/improve


 
integrity of data and quality of outputs


 
Data models should be flexible to change as the business/


 
organization does


 
Leverage a single, standardized, comprehensive code


 
block across the enterprise


 
Clearly define the relationship between corporate and local


 
chart of accounts


 
Align the master data structure/language with the way


 
management wants to run the business


 
Reporting requirements should drive the development of


 
the code block


 
Simplify and focus the code block - each element should


 
be clearly defined and used solely for that purpose across


 
the organization and each element should have an expressed 


 
reporting/transaction capture purpose


 
Design flexibility into the code block to support future


 
requirements


 
Use non-intelligent/non-hierarchical codes in the code block


 
Support flexible, user-definable rollups


 
Rationalize the number of cost centers, profit centers, and


 
legal entities


 
Continually assess/monitor/revise company cost center


 
structure


 
Centralized control and maintenance of the vendor master


 
file


 
Maintain a single, global vendor master; maintain a single


 
record for each vendor


 
Support customer parent/child relationships in the customer 


 
master and any supporting systems.


 
Employ standard vendor naming convention


 
Perform formal vendor database clean-up on a recurring


 
basis


 
Vendor master file should accurately reflect terms negotiated 


 
by purchasing


 
Implement duplicate account edits which are executed during 


 
account setup and perform periodic duplicate account reviews


 
Develop consolidated customer master which uses a


 
standard naming/number convention and contains all


 
essential customer attributes including addresses, credit


 
score, and payment terms.


 
Support customer parent/child relationships in the customer 


 
master and any supporting systems.


 
Develop customer segmentation methodology and capture


 
appropriate attributes in the customer master.


 
Maintain a common data structure with consistent definitions 


 
and performance language documented in a “dictionary”


 
Maintain a library of templates and usage guidelines for


 
recurring analyses


Maintain
Standardize on a single ERP system; decommission legacy 


Integrated
systems


Finance
Best of breed extensions should be fully integrated and


Information 
consistently used


Technology 
Fully integrated and automated reporting capability


Architecture 
including simple user interface with drill-down capability


3804
Use a single reporting and analytic tool across the


 
enterprise


 
Build driver based planning models directly in planning tool


 
Limit the use of spreadsheets


 
Data extracted from internal and external systems into a


 
central repository to meet multiple reporting requirements


 
(one version of the truth)


 
Enable automated work flow capabilities


 
Automated information access and delivery


 
Enable web connections to customers, suppliers, and


 
partners


 
Technical solution should be able to accommodate future


 
growth and/or structural changes to the organization


 
Single point of access for multiple applications


 
Data from the source systems is extracted once, at the


 
appropriate level of detail


 
Fully automated sub-ledger interfaces


 
Integration of the GL with treasury and tax systems


 
Fully automated inter-company accounting and elimination


 
of inter-company balances


 
Highly automated financial consolidation activities


 





Table 21 provides an explanation of the ‘strategic planning/shareholder value targeting’ capability 134 and key assessment areas within the capability and corresponding performance capability criteria.



 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 21


 


Strategic Planning/Shareholder Value Targeting 134


 




 




Description:
Strategic planning refers to the periodic/ongoing process of


 
identifying appropriate business strategy, translating that


 
strategy into specific business objectives, value drivers, and


 
KPI's, and creating strategic planning documents and


 
strategy maps to guide the business forward.




Focus/Objective




Basic Criteria:
Strategic planning is essentially a long-term forecasting


210
exercise, with a focus on incremental changes


Competitive
Focus is on longer term and/or structural changes, but only


Criteria:
loosely linked to shareholder value


212
 


Market Leading
Strategic plan focuses on the financial, operational, and


Criteria:
structural changes needed to achieve shareholder value


214
objectives




Link to Shareholder Value




Basic Criteria:
Strategic planning not always shareholder value-driven


210
 


Competitive
Strategic planning loosely driven by shareholder value; but


Criteria:
not always an explicit link; no formal enterprise value 


212
model is used


Market Leading
Strategic planning is firmly grounded in shareholder value;


Criteria:
formal enterprise value model is maintained; external focus


214
on current and future value




Use of Business Drivers




Basic Criteria:
Limited use of business drivers in planning process; where


210
used, the linkage to strategy and future value is not well


 
understood


Competitive
Business drivers are used; but drivers are only partially


Criteria:
identified and/or not prioritized


212
 


Market Leading
Both current and future value drivers are identified,


Criteria:
prioritized, and clearly linked to strategy


214
 




Driver Cause and Effect




Basic Criteria:
Limited use of business drivers; no quantitative testing of


210
linkage to shareholder value creation


Competitive
Focus on current value drivers with assumed cause and


Criteria:
effect linkages (conceptual linkage)


212
 


Market Leading
Cause and effect linkages between drivers and results are


Criteria:
well-understood and quantitatively tested


214
 




Link to Target Setting




Basic Criteria:
Strategic plan stands alone


210
 


Competitive
Partial linkage to targets and budgets; but changes to


Criteria:
strategy do not always result in changes to targets and


212
budgets


Market Leading
Strategic plan explicitly linked to targeting and resource


Criteria:
allocation


214
 




Result Measures




Basic Criteria:
Many P&L-focused performance measures; neither well-


210
defined nor consistent across the organization


Competitive
Driver based measures are used in addition to traditional 


Criteria:
P&L measures; but may not be prioritized or used 


212
consistently


Market Leading
Consistent, prioritized, clearly-defined key result measures 


Criteria:
of successful execution of strategy with direct linkage to 


214
total return to shareholders




Intangible Assets




Basic Criteria:
Intangible assets not accepted as value drivers; intangible


210
asset performance neither explicitly measured nor actively


 
managed


Competitive
Intangible assets accepted as key drivers of value; but


Criteria:
intangible asset performance is not consistently measured 


212
or actively managed


Market Leading
Intangible assets accepted as key drivers of future value and


Criteria:
managed actively


214


 





 FIG. 39 illustrates capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the ‘Strategic Planning/Shareholder Value Targeting’ capability 134. Table 22 describes additional market leading criteria for the capabilities of the ‘Strategic Planning/Shareholder Value Targeting’ capability 134, including criteria for: ‘Refine Organization Vision and Strategic Objectives’ capability 3902; ‘Determine Key Business Drivers’ capability 3904; ‘Determine Key Measures of Success’ capability 3906; and ‘Create Strategic Plan’ capability 3908.
Market leading criteria for ‘Refine Organization Vision and Strategic Objectives’ capability 3902 may include: long term planning focused on the financial performance and options necessary to achieve shareholder value objectives; financial and operational considerations determined beyond simply performing a “long-term forecasting” exercise. Options and opportunities may be evaluated based on expected contribution to current and future value. A formal enterprise valuation model (e.g., the type used by sell-side equity analysts) may be maintained and updated frequently. Market leading criteria for ‘Refine Organization Vision and Strategic Objectives’ capability 3902 may include: requiring all finance executives to be familiar with the model and the primary drivers of shareholder value; actively incorporating the model into long-term and strategic planning; tightly integrating strategic planning with target setting and resource allocation; ensuring that targets “add up” to the performance necessary to achieve shareholder value objectives.
Market leading criteria for ‘Determine Key Business Drivers’ capability 3904 may include: ensuring that management understands the distinction between current value and future value; allocating adequate management time devoted to managing future value; formally identifying and documenting drivers of current and future value (e.g., at the corporate and BU level); reviewing key business drivers whenever significant changes in the business occur (e.g., acquisition, new product introduction, change in business model, and new competitive landscape); identifying, prioritizing and clearly linking current and future value drivers to strategy; ensuring that management focuses on the most sensitive and manageable drivers; creating and maintaining a formal economic model that incorporates the “mathematical linkage” between business drivers and financial results; leveraging the model for strategic planning and metric identification activities to understand the true sensitivity of financial results to changes in the value of the underlying business drivers. Market leading criteria for ‘Refine Organization Vision and Strategic Objectives’ capability 3902 may include: quantitatively testing the linkage between drivers and shareholder value creation; assessing the ability of management to impact and manage each driver; ensuring a common understanding exists regarding key value drivers across the entire enterprise at all levels of the organization to enable the organization to deliver sustained value creation.
Market leading criteria for ‘Determine Key Measures of Success’ capability 3906 may include: measuring business drivers, in addition to results; ensuring all key business drivers have an associated metric and/or metrics; evaluating whether to provide temporary, initiative specific metrics to track progress against specific strategic initiatives and eliminating metrics from scorecards when the metrics are no longer needed; ensuring that measurement and management of key value drivers and metrics is a primary focus of management and not considered secondary to traditional earnings measures and accounting ratios; identifying the critical few measures that are balanced and aligned with strategic objectives and value creation. Market leading criteria for ‘Determine Key Measures of Success’ capability 3906 may include: aligning key stakeholders to establish and maintain key success measures in the organization; identifying the impact of improving a metric on shareholder value objectives; identifying and documenting key management decisions required to achieve shareholder value objectives, the frequency of those decisions, and the information requirements to make each decision, and ensuring metrics support the decisions. Market leading criteria for ‘Determine Key Measures of Success’ capability 3906 may include: ensuring that the collection of metrics can meet three objectives: 1) track progress and explain the past (e.g., how are we doing, what happened and why); 2) forecasting the future (e.g., what do we expect to occur); and 3) support decisions (e.g., what should we do to achieve objectives). Market leading criteria for ‘Determine Key Measures of Success’ capability 3906 may further include: defining which of these roles each metric is expected to play; linking business unit metrics to and/or “feeding” corporate level metrics; and linking sub-BU and/or shared service group metrics to BU metrics.
Market leading criteria for ‘Create Strategic Plan’ capability 3908 may include: creating a formal review process to evaluate the success of investment spending and of other strategic initiatives; conducting strategic planning sessions to review performance against previous session's strategic objectives and commitments; reviewing actual R&D spending and ROI against original estimates (e.g., using information from a project accounting system and process); clearly specifying the processes and associated governance frameworks that define how key decisions may be made (e.g., prioritization of value drivers, approval of capital investment, and change in strategy direction); aligning decisions with strategic planning and ensure decisions facilitate shareholder value creation.



 

 
 



TABLE 22


 


Strategic Planning/Shareholder Value Targeting 134 -


Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




Refine
Focus strategic plan on the financial, operational, and


Organization
structural changes needed to achieve objectives


Vision and
Ground all strategic planning activities in shareholder 


Strategic
value


Objectives
Maintain formal enterprise valuation model


3902
Actively instill a value creation mindset and financial


 
acumen into the enterprise


 
Distinguish between current value and future value


 
Formally link strategic planning to target setting and


 
resource allocation


Determine Key
Actively distinguish between current value and future 


Business
value


Drivers
Identify and prioritize value drivers


3904
Maintain internal economic model


 
Quantitatively test the linkage between drivers and


 
shareholder value creation


 
Prioritize business drivers


 
Ensure deep understanding and alignment around critical


 
value drivers across the enterprise


Determine Key
Attach one or more measures to each business driver and


Measures of
strategic objective


Success
Focus on the “critical few” metrics necessary to measure


3906
successful execution of strategy


 
Define and gain alignment on all critical metrics


 
Ensure executive scorecards are aligned with strategic


 
objectives and include associated metrics


 
Measure and test linkage between individual metric and


 
overall shareholder value creation


 
Ensure metrics support key management decisions


 
Segregate metrics by purpose


 
Organize metrics into tiers


Create Strategic
Strategic planning should clearly define organizational


Plan 3908
responsibility and accountability


 
Strategic plans should be translated into phased,


 
actionable programs


 
Create formal framework to make investment trade-off


 
decisions


 
Perform post implementation review of strategic plans


 
Communicate strategy broadly throughout the 


 
organization


 
Employ standardized management processes to support


 
key decision making


 





Table 23 provides an explanation of the target setting capability 136, key assessment areas within the capability and corresponding performance capability criteria.



 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 23


 


Target Setting 136


 




 




Description:
Target Setting refers to the process of analyzing the 


 
portfolio of businesses that make up the enterprise and 


 
the expected contribution of each, setting top down 


 
performance targets, and then cascading or assigning those 


 
targets to segments of the business.




Portfolio View




Basic Criteria:
When setting targets, no distinction between assets earning 


210
a high return on invested capital and those earning a low 


 
return


Competitive
Distinction is made between high and low returning assets


Criteria:
when setting targets, but without the full rigor of a portfolio


212
value assessment


Market Leading
Portfolio is fully analyzed to identify opportunities to 


Criteria:
redeploy resources from assets that are not returning the 


214
cost of capital to higher-return assets




Target Accountability




Basic Criteria:
Target ownership not aligned with roles, responsibilities,


210
incentives, and rewards


Competitive
Target ownership aligned with roles and responsibilities, 


Criteria:
but incentives and rewards are aligned to budgets or other


212
measure


Market Leading
Clearly aligned target ownership, accountability, decision


Criteria:
rights, and incentive compensation


214
 




Nature of Targets




Basic Criteria:
Targets negotiated based on probability of achievement 


210
and/or set on the basis of last year's actuals


Competitive
Targets heavily influenced by external market expectations 


Criteria:
or other external benchmark; but “target negotiation” still


212
allowed


Market Leading
Targets predetermined based on external market


Criteria:
expectations. Relative targets (compared to some external


214
benchmark) instead of absolute targets




Link to Strategic Planning




Basic Criteria:
No link between strategic plan and targets


210
 


Competitive
Partial linkage to strategic plan, but changes to strategy do


Criteria:
not always result in target changes


212
 


Market Leading
Strategic plan explicitly linked to targeting and resource


Criteria:
allocation


214
 




Cascade Approach




Basic Criteria:
Targets set at the corporate level and applied uniformly to


210
business units


Competitive
Target cascade recognizes differences in business units, but


Criteria:
no formal portfolio approach is employed


212
 


Market Leading
Value and risk treated as an aggregation of the business


Criteria:
portfolio to set targets by business unit


214
 




External Communication




Basic Criteria:
Externally-communicated targets not consistently


210
incorporated into the internal target-setting process


Market Leading
Internal targets consistent with externally communicated


Criteria:
targets


214
 




Target Management




Basic Criteria:
Scorecard measure tolerances not set at each organization


210
level; difficult to know when and where to initiate 


 
corrective action


Market Leading
Consistent targets and tolerances in place for the critical 


Criteria:
few key metrics at each organization level


214


 





 FIG. 40 illustrates capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the target setting capability 136. Table 24 describes additional market leading criteria for the capabilities of the target setting capability 136, including criteria for: Perform Portfolio Value Assessment’ capability 4002; ‘Set Targets for Key Measures of Accountability’ capability 4004; ‘Cascade Targets Throughout the Organization’ capability 4006; and ‘Ongoing Target Review & Management’ capability 4008.
Market leading criteria for ‘Perform Portfolio Value Assessment’ capability 4002 may include: designing and implementing at the onset of the target setting process, a clear governance structure to support the necessary activities with the process; and analyzing the portfolio of business units, project, and assets to identify opportunities to redeploy resources from assets that are not returning the cost of capital to higher-return assets.
Market leading criteria for ‘Set Targets for Key Measures of Accountability’ capability 4004 may include: tightly integrating target setting to strategic planning and resource allocation; deriving targets from the strategy setting process; leveraging external benchmarks and minimum market expectations of returns (e.g., a cost of capital return on enterprise value over the industry lifecycle); preventing the negotiation of targets based on bottom-up budgets; driving targets based on the financial performance necessary to meet shareholder value objectives, rather than “what management believes can be achieved” under a business as usual scenario and/or “last year+10%” approach; ensuring that targets “add up” to the performance necessary to achieve shareholder value objectives; separating targets from shareholder value objectives to de-politicize the process and improve speed and accuracy; and leveraging external and/or industry benchmarks.
Market leading criteria for ‘Cascade Targets Throughout the Organization’ capability 4006 may include ensuring that each unit earns an appropriate return on capital allocated to the unit.
Market leading criteria for ‘Ongoing Target Review & Management’ capability 4008 may include: focusing on closing the gaps between target performance and bottom up estimates through action plans and changes to performance, rather than re-negotiating targets; reviewing targets during the year to focus on how successful each business unit is in closing the gaps; assigning managers accountability for meeting those targets over which the manager has control, and compensating managers accordingly from an incentive compensation perspective; maintaining a strategic focus (e.g., forward looking) approach that is analytically driven and provides better insight into the target review process by requiring executives to quickly identify where and when to initiate corrective action in the event targets are not being met; requiring managers to focus on targets, even where bottom-up budgets do not reconcile to the targets; and comparing performance against top-down targets to maintain and adjust detailed budgets as necessary without altering targets.



 

 
 



TABLE 24


 


Target Setting 136- 


Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




Perform Portfolio
Clear governance structures should be in place 


Value
throughout the target-setting process


Assessment
Perform formal and recurring portfolio analysis


4002
Treat value and risk as an aggregation of the 


 
business portfolio to set targets by business unit


Set Targets for
Formally link target setting to strategic planning and


Key Measures of
resource allocation


Accountability
Targets should be “predetermined” based on external


4004
market expectations


 
Separate target setting and forecasting


 
Use relative targets instead of/in addition to absolute


 
targets


 
Clearly align target ownership, accountability 


 
and decision rights


 
Make internal targets consistent with externally


 
communicated targets


 
Establish consistent targets and tolerances 


 
for the critical few key metrics at each 


 
organization level


 
Establish multi-year targets


 
Include non-financial measures in targets


Cascade Targets
Treat value and risk as an aggregation of the business


Throughout the
portfolio to set targets by business unit


Organization
Cascade targets down to individual business/


4006
organizational units/geographies and tie to capital


 
allocation


 
Unique hurdle rates applied to individual 


 
organizations and projects to reflect 


 
relative risk


Ongoing Target
Corporate and organization units jointly develop 


Review &
action plans and tactics for achieving targets


Management
Gaps between top-down targets and bottom 


4008
up budgets/forecasts should be allocated across the 


 
business in the form of stretch targets


 
Clearly aligned target ownership, accountability, 


 
decision rights, and incentive compensation


 
Establish consistent targets and tolerances for the 


 
critical few key metrics at each organization level


 
Exception based reporting with root cause 


 
analysis and corrective actions


 
Measure performance against targets (rather


 
than budgets)


 





Table 25 provides an explanation of the ‘planning, resource allocation and forecasting’ capability 138, key assessment areas within the capability and corresponding performance capability criteria.



 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 25


 


Planning, Resource Allocation and Forecasting 138


 




 




Description:
Includes planning, budgeting, and forecasting activities


 
as well as capital/investment planning & allocation


 
activities.




Nature of Budgets and Forecasts




Basic Criteria:
Budgets updated annually and based on unsupported


210
assumptions; budgets usually out-of-date


 
due to changing circumstances


Competitive
Traditional budget in addition to rolling forecast;


Criteria:
budgets and forecasts are driver based


212
 


Market Leading
Annual budget replaced with a driver-based rolling


Criteria:
forecast; financial outcomes linked to key drivers of


214
current and future value




Resource Allocation and Deployment




Basic Criteria:
Investments politically-driven and not clearly linked to


210
value creating opportunities. No tactical budgeting 


 
process to pace resource deployment against


 
strategies.


Market Leading
Capital allocation priorities linked with overall strategy 


Criteria:
and value creation across the portfolio. Resource 


214
deployment well-timed against strategies.




Content




Basic Criteria:
Unnecessary planning and forecasting detail. Only 


210
results forecasted, not business drivers. Budgets set 


 
for every line item on the P&L.


Competitive
Unnecessary detail minimized. Selected business drivers 


Criteria:
forecast in addition to result measures. Budgets set for 


212
the most material and volatile line items on the P&L.


Market Leading
Planning & forecasting detail based on materiality


Criteria:
and volatility. All important business drivers


214
forecasted. Budgets set for highest material and volatile


 
drivers, key metrics, and P&L line items.




Relationship To Targets




Basic Criteria:
Target setting and forecasting are combined; highly-


210
politicized; much gamesmanship


Market Leading
Target setting and forecasting are separated to de-


Criteria:
politicize the process


214
 




Treatment of Risk




Basic Criteria:
Individual organizations and project hurdle rates not 


210
differentiated for risk


Market Leading
Unique hurdle rates applied to individual organizations/


Criteria:
projects reflecting relative risk


214
 




Process




Basic Criteria:
Many iterations of bottom-up budget/forecast due to 


210
minimal initial target setting; focused on negotiations


 
and detail roll-up


Market Leading
Limited number of budget/forecast iterations because 


Criteria:
of top down target setting; focused on drivers


214
 




Forecast Accuracy




Basic Criteria:
Forecasts are considered reliable over very short time


210
horizons only


Competitive
Forecasts accuracy is adequate to support most 


Criteria:
business decisions; some exceptions


212
 


Market Leading
Forecasts accuracy supports essentially all business


Criteria:
decisions that rely on forecasts


214
 




Budget Cycle Time




Basic Criteria:
Budget cycle time is longer than peers and consumes 


210
much finance capacity


Competitive
Budget cycle time is consistent with or slightly better 


Criteria:
than peers


212
 


Market Leading
Budget cycle time is substantially shorter then peers


Criteria:
and does not hinder other activities


214


 





 FIG. 41 illustrates capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the ‘Planning, Resource Allocation & Forecasting’ capability 138. Table 26 describes additional market leading criteria for the capabilities of the ‘Planning, Resource Allocation & Forecasting’ capability 138, including criteria for: ‘Develop Plans and Budgets’ capability 4102; ‘Perform Capital Planning/Resource Allocation’ capability 4104; ‘Review, Challenge, and Finalize Plans and Budgets’ capability 4106; and ‘Perform Periodic Forecasting’ capability 4108.
Market leading criteria for ‘Develop Plans and Budgets’ capability 4102 may include identifying and quantitatively testing in advance, business drivers (current and future, financial and operational) and driver based planning models. Market leading criteria for ‘Develop Plans and Budgets’ capability 4102 may include: planning activities focused on estimating values for the drivers instead of “detail roll-up” work to enable scenario planning and predictive modeling; creating budgets focused on the highest material and volatile drivers, key metrics, and P&L line items, with only limited focus on other items; developing near term plans and forecasts with more details, and longer term plans with fewer details; developing plans with more detail for material and/or volatile drivers and result measures, and fewer details for immaterial and/or stable drivers and result measures; employing planning tools that are more than roll-up and consolidation tools; employing models built directly in the tool to minimize maintenance, testing, standardization and control, rather than a collection of offline spreadsheets; employing a 4 or 6 quarter rolling horizon for planning and/or forecasting; ensuring that the entire organization uses the same tool for target setting, planning, budgeting, forecasting, and management reporting. Market leading criteria for ‘Develop Plans and Budgets’ capability 4102 may include creating multiple scenarios based on likely variation in key business drivers, rather than a single plan and forecast; employing a planning tool that includes workflow and online review, edit and approval functionality so budget documents do not have to be routed manually (e.g., eliminate the need to e-mail documents); distributing a comprehensive set of planning assumptions (e.g., benefits cost per employee) in advance of the planning process (e.g., benefits cost per employee and average salary increases); and embedding planning assumptions in the planning tool and presenting targets, prior year actuals and most recent forecast using the tool.
Market leading criteria for ‘Perform Capital Planning/Resource Allocation’ capability 4104 may include: designing planning process to help the enterprise achieve targets and implement strategy; enabling planning to be performed beyond the current fiscal year, eliminate tying compensation to meeting an annual budget; employing a rolling business planning process that is dynamic and focused on reallocating resources to drive business performance; streamlining processes and technology to decrease the number of required resources needed to support the planning process and enable the resources to be allocated where they can contribute the most value; and identifying process efficiencies that yield headcount reductions.
Market leading criteria for ‘Review, Challenge, and Finalize Plans and Budgets’ capability 4106 may include: eliminating and/or preventing argument and negotiation among different layers of management about what is going to be achieved and the composition of the budget; and conducting period reviews during the year that focus on how successful each business unit is in closing budget gaps.
Market leading criteria for ‘Perform Periodic Forecasting’ capability 4108 may include: forecasting a 4 to 6 quarter rolling horizon; and creating a “rhythm” of updating existing forecast information and adding a month/quarter with each update. Business drivers (current and future, financial and operational) and driver based models are identified and quantitatively tested in advance. Forecasting activities may focus on estimating values for the drivers instead of “detail roll-up” work, which enables scenario planning and predictive modeling.



 

 
 



TABLE 26


 


Planning, Resource Allocation & Forecasting 138-


Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




Develop Plans 
Plans/budgets/forecasts should be driver based


and Budgets
Focus planning efforts on most material and volatile 


4102
drivers 


 
Planning & forecasting detail vary over time,


 
based on materiality and volatility


 
Build driver based planning models directly in 


 
planning tool


 
Adopt a rolling planning/forecasting horizon


 
De-emphasize/eliminate annual budget process; 


 
replace with rolling forecast


 
Limit the # of budget/iterations because of top-down


 
target setting, bottom-up resource allocation, 


 
and reconciliation


 
Integrate financial, operational, and capital plans/


 
budgets/forecasts


 
Use a single, best of breed planning tool across the 


 
entire organization


 
Perform scenario planning for all plans and forecasts


 
Automated distribution of budgets and revisions 


 
(workflow capabilities)


 
Create and distribute comprehensive set of planning


 
assumptions


 
Planning tool should relevant comparative data to 


 
assist in building the plan or budget


 
Finance and operations leadership jointly develop 


 
plans and budgets


Perform Capital
Capital allocation priorities should be clearly linked 


Planning/
with overall strategy and value creation across the 


Resource
portfolio


Allocation
Use the planning processes to allocate resources (i.e.,


4104
capital and people) to highest-value opportunities


 
Streamline analysis processes and technology 


 
enablers to increase planning efficiency


 
Resource deployment should be well-timed against


 
strategies


 
Apply unique hurdle rates to individual organizations 


 
and projects to reflect relative risk


Review,
Gaps between top-down targets and bottom up 


Challenge, and
budgets/forecasts should be allocated across the 


Finalize Plans
business in the form of stretch targets


and Budgets
 


4106
 


Perform Periodic
Adopt a rolling forecast horizon


Forecasting
Produce driver based forecasts


4108
Build driver based forecast models directly in 


 
planning tool


 
Vary forecasting detail over time, based on materiality 


 
and volatility


 
De-emphasize/eliminate annual budget process; 


 
replace with rolling forecast


 
Separate target setting and forecasting


 
Perform scenario planning for all plans and forecasts


 
Integrate financial, operational, and capital forecasts


 
Use a single, best of breed planning tool across the 


 
entire organization


 
Finance and operations leadership jointly develop


 
forecasts


 





Table 27 provides an explanation of the performance reporting and analytics capability 140, key assessment areas within the capability and performance capability criteria.



 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 27


 


Performance Reporting & Analytics 140


 




 




Description:
Performance Reporting and Analytics includes all


 
management reporting and analysis activities - both 


 
recurring and ad-hoc.




Metrics and Measures




Basic Criteria:
Many P&L-focused performance measures; neither 


210
well-defined nor consistent across the organization. 


 
Multiple definitions and calculations of metrics. 


 
Measures used at the top not aligned/connected 


 
to those used to manage day-to-day operations.


Competitive
Driver based measures in addition to P&L 


Criteria:
measures; may not be prioritized. Single 


212
definition & calculation for most metrics. Partial 


 
alignment of metrics across the organization.


Market Leading
Consistent, prioritized, clearly defined key result 


Criteria:
measures with direct linkage to shareholder value. 


214
Single definition & calculation for each metric. 


 
Clear alignment between measures 


 
reported up and those used to manage down.




Tools




Basic Criteria:
Multiple disparate tools required


210
 


Competitive
Single reporting and analytical tool with exceptions 


Criteria:
for selected geographies or data sources


212
 


Market Leading
Single integrated reporting and analytics tool


Criteria:
 


214
 




Information Access




Basic Criteria:
Management book manually published well after


210
month-end


Competitive
Management information available on-line in static


Criteria:
scorecard/report format


212
 


Market Leading
Online reporting capability including simple user


Criteria:
interface with drill-down capability


214
 




Internal versus External Reporting




Basic Criteria:
No distinction between internal/external reporting


210
 


Competitive
Understands internal/external reporting needs and 


Criteria:
creates manual reporting processes to support


212
 


Market Leading
Understands internal external reporting needs and


Criteria:
automates data requirements accordingly


214
 




Business Rhythm




Basic Criteria:
Inconsistent or multiple processes for measuring


210
performance. Periodic performance reviews usually 


 
informal and ad-hoc in nature and structure


Competitive
Formal reviews focused on many metrics with 


Criteria:
inclusion/exclusion rules applied


212
 


Market Leading
Consistent process for measuring performance 


Criteria:
against an agreed upon target. Formal reviews focused 


214
on the critical few performance metrics aligned 


 
to business rhythm




Reporting & Analytic center of Excellence




Basic Criteria:
Analytical information is inconsistent 


210
and independently supported by specific 


 
functional area


Competitive
Single source within specific functional area 


Criteria:
is identified and leverages centralized 


212
data and standardized process


Market Leading
Information is centralized and leverages Center 


Criteria:
of Excellence (COE) support capability


214
 




Action Planning Process




Basic Criteria:
Inconsistent process to measure performance; limited 


210
link to action planning/improved results. Variance 


 
explanations lack root cause analysis and corrective 


 
actions. No post-implementation reviews of plans, 


 
forecasts, and capital allocation decisions.


Competitive
Standardized process to measure performance 


Criteria:
with on-going negotiations of targets.


212
Variances are understood, but action plans have 


 
limited accountability/link back to performance. 


 
Post-implementation reviews conducted 


 
inconsistently/for selected investments.


Market Leading
Simplified process for measuring performance 


Criteria:
tied to action planning with accountability 


214
to close gaps. Root cause analysis and 


 
corrective action only required when keymeasures 


 
are out of tolerance; corrective actions plan monitored.


 
Rigorous, consistent post-implementation 


 
reviews of all key investment decisions.


 





 FIG. 42 illustrates capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the ‘Performance Reporting and Analytics’ capability 140. Table 28 describes additional market leading criteria for the capabilities of the ‘Performance Reporting and Analytics’ capability 140, including criteria for: ‘Measure, Report, and Analyze Business Performance’ capability 4202; ‘Maintain Common Performance Language and Definitions’ capability 4204; ‘Provide On-going Reporting & Analytical Support’ capability 4206; and ‘Review Impact of Management Incentive Structure on Financial Performance’ capability 4208.
Market leading criteria for ‘Measure, Report, and Analyze Business Performance’ capability 4202 may include: the measurement and management of key value drivers and metrics as a primary focus, rather than subordinate to traditional earnings measures and accounting ratios; and identifying the critical few measures that are balanced and aligned with strategic objectives and value creation. Market leading criteria for ‘Measure, Report, and Analyze Business Performance’ capability 4202 may include: employing a shareholder value measure or a proxy thereof incorporating cash flow, invested capital and risk as a key result measure of financial performance; employing other result measures that directly impact the overall shareholder value measure; employing metrics that form a cascading hierarchy, where more detailed metrics are components of more summary metrics; ensuring that the reporting process includes trending and root cause analysis as key components; ensuring that information is captured and reported quickly and consistently for all levels and all parts of the business; ensuring the use of common data models (e.g., customer, product, project, geography, market, contract type, pricing level, and channel).
Historically, value was heavily tied to tangible assets. However, currently only 25% of the S&P 500's value can be traced to tangible assets with the balance largely attributed to intangible value. Market leading criteria for ‘Measure, Report, and Analyze Business Performance’ capability 4202 may include: employing balanced scorecards that reflect tangible and intangible valuations; employing customized dashboards for all key executives and delivered directly via the financial systems; employing reporting content focused on the critical few financial and non-financial metrics and value drivers that align with overall organization objectives; employing online, dashboard style presentation of key data; employing a single, best of breed reporting and analysis application used consistently throughout the organization. The single, best of breed reporting and analysis application may directly access financial and operational data with drill-down capability. Market leading criteria for ‘Measure, Report, and Analyze Business Performance’ capability 4202 may include: employing a standardized process to review reports on a bi-annual or annual basis and pro-actively make decisions to add, change, or eliminate reports based on the current reporting needs of the business; eliminating unused and non-value added reports; ensuring that management spends more time looking forward than backward (e.g., related to pricing, new products, and geographical expansion); ensuring that analysts within the organization spends relatively little time on historical variance analysis, traditional ratio analysis (e.g., automate historical variance analysis); ensuring that each metric corresponds to a formal target and a pre-defined tolerance range; conducting root cause analysis and corrective action when out of tolerance; developing customized scorecards, reporting and analytics for executives responsive to the executives respective scope of responsibility; providing reporting and analytics in real-time, as needed to support decisions; ensuring a primary group is involved in acknowledgement, evaluation and management of risk; ensuring a secondary group views reports for informational purposes only.
Market leading criteria for ‘Maintain Common Performance Language and Definitions’ capability 4204 may include: employing robust and consistent definitions for all key metrics, assets, and decision support information requirements; addressing unit of measure, formula, data source, frequency, and dimensions; and ensuring the consistent use of a performance language dictionary to eliminate and/or minimize debate performance measures. For example, a standard “make vs. buy” analysis template or a standard “capital project approval request” document. Model should be cross functional, financial and non-financial, internal and external.
Market leading criteria for ‘Provide On-going Reporting & Analytical Support’ capability 4206 may include: employing a standardized process; whereas, the company reviews reports on a bi-annual or annual basis, and pro-actively makes decisions to add, change, and/or eliminate reports based on the current reporting needs of the business.
Market leading criteria for ‘Review Impact of Management Incentive Structure on Financial Performance’ capability 4208 may include: reviewing current value and future value; using a measure of value (e.g., economic value analysis—EVA) as the primary incentive metric; evaluating the use of non-financial metrics (e.g., customer and/or employee) to provide a balanced perspective to compensation and may influence a different set of behaviors that may prove beneficial for the organization; analyzing incentives for performance measured strictly by short-term financial metrics to determine whether a linkage exists to the creation of long-term shareholder value; implementing performance payout reserves and/or bonuses based on sustained performance over time (e.g., multi-year targets and “bonus bank”); evaluating and/or eliminating incentives to “shift performance between years”; removing disincentives to high performance; ensuring a line-of-sight with strategy; and ensuring board and management alignment on incentive pay, and encouraging cooperation across organizational entities.



 

 
 



TABLE 28


 


Performance Reporting and Analytics 140-


Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




Measure, Report, 
Focus on the “critical few” metrics necessary to


and Analyze
measure successful execution of strategy


Business
Define and gain alignment on all critical metrics


Performance 
Measure and test linkage between individual 


4202
metric and shareholder value creation


 
Ensure metrics support key management decisions


 
Segregate metrics by purpose


 
Key result measures are consistent, prioritized, 


 
and clearly defined


 
Key result measures have direct linkage to 


 
shareholder value


 
Clear alignment between measures reported up and 


 
those used to manage down


 
Use performance monitoring and analytics to 


 
improve the statistical fact base and relevance 


 
of what is being measured over time


 
Fast reporting cycles to support decisions and actions


 
required to meet or exceed performance targets


 
Multi-dimensional profitability analysis methodology


 
extended to all applicable dimensions


 
Use analytics to customize offerings and maximize


 
revenue/profit


 
Produce BU P&Ls that only reflect that unit's 


 
controllable revenue and cost


 
Balanced scorecard that represents both quantitative


 
(tangible) and qualitative (intangible) information


 
Balanced scorecards with a clear link between the


 
scorecards and growth in shareholder value


 
Incorporate external information in management


 
dashboards


 
Fully integrated and automated reporting capability


 
including simple user interface with drill-down


 
capability 


 
Use a single reporting and analytic tool across the


 
enterprise


 
Reports are few in number and focused on a shared


 
management understanding of what is important


 
Employ an ongoing report rationalization process


 
Focus on forward looking analysis 


 
(as opposed to historical analysis)


 
Differentiate between internal and external reporting 


 
needs - but leverage a single data source


 
Consistent performance measurement and reporting


 
processes across the organization


 
Establish targets and tolerances for each metric


 
Custom scorecards


 
Real-time reporting and analytics


 
Utilize exception-based information, including alerts/


 
alarms/color coded reporting


 
Divide report users into two groups: primary 


 
and secondary 


 
Include non-financial data in management reports


Review
Establish standardized (daily, weekly, monthly) 


Performance with
business rhythm for performance reporting


Management
Formal reviews should focus on the critical few


—
performance metrics aligned to business rhythm


 
Frequency of information should be based on what is


 
actionable and accurate for that particular audience


 
Link performance reporting with accountability for


 
closing gaps


 
Root cause analysis and corrective action only 


 
required when key measures are out of tolerance


 
Corrective action plans monitored


 
Rigorous, consistent post-implementation 


 
reviews of all key investment decisions


Develop Action
Employ simplified process for measuring performance 


Plans, Re-
tied to action planning with accountability to close 


Allocate
gaps


Resources, &
Root cause analysis and corrective action only 


Update Forecast
required when key measures are out of tolerance


—
Corrective action plans monitored


 
Corrective action plans actively monitored


 
Rigorous, consistent post-implementation reviews 


 
of all key investment decisions


Maintain
Maintain a common data structure with consistent


Common
definitions and performance language documented 


Performance
in a “dictionary”


Language and
Maintain a library of templates and usage guidelines 


Definitions
for recurring analyses


4204
Maintain formal enterprise data model


 
Manage data centrally


 
Integrate processes and controls to improve integrity 


 
of data and quality of outputs


Provide On-going 
Leverage a reporting and analytics center of 


Reporting &
excellence (COE)


Analytical
Employ an ongoing report rationalization process


Support
 


4206


 





Table 29 provides an explanation of the internal controls capability 142, key assessment areas within the capability and corresponding performance capability criteria. FIG. 43 illustrates capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the internal controls capability 142 and investor relations capability 144, respectively.



 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 29


 


Internal Controls 142


 




 




Description: 
Includes establishment and maintenance of internal 


 
control procedures, monitoring compliance 


 
(including Sarbox), internal/external audit, and 


 
reporting on compliance




Role/Focus/Impact 




Basic Criteria:
Internal controls do not always meet requirements; 


210
compliance is uncertain; high risk 


Competitive
Established policies and procedures for compliance 


Criteria:
are effective but inefficient; adequate internal controls 


212
but at a high cost to the organization 


Market Leading
Optimized internal controls; internal control policies 


Criteria:
and procedures are both effective and efficient; low 


214
compliance risk at low cost to the organization


 





 FIGS. 44-45 illustrate capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the ‘Treasury & Cash Management’ capability 146. Table 30 describes additional market leading criteria for the capabilities of the ‘Treasury & Cash Management’ capability 146, including criteria for: ‘Perform Treasury Governance Activities’ capability 4402; ‘Perform Banking & Cash Management Activities’ capability 4404; and ‘Perform cash flow and cash flow position forecasting’ capability 4408.
Market leading criteria for ‘Perform Treasury Governance Activities’ capability 4402 may include establishing: formal, board approved policies; standard procedures; limited local autonomy; and internal audit review of compliance. Market leading criteria for ‘Perform Treasury Governance Activities’ capability 4402 may further include: defining detailed treasury policies on a central and local business and organization unit level that are regularly reviewed by the board; and requiring treasury to actively participate on the front end in decisions impacting treasury activities. For example, treasury may provide cash flow and other financial information to the planning and budgeting teams. Market leading criteria for ‘Perform Treasury Governance Activities’ capability 4402 may include: reporting KPIs on a regular basis (e.g., monthly) and initiating proactive steps to address issues; performing external benchmarking regularly and initiating proactive steps to address gaps; and tightly integrating service management processes with company strategy; and frequently reviewing the service management processes.
Market leading criteria for ‘Perform Banking & Cash Management Activities’ capability 4404 may include: assigning corporate treasury responsibility for all bank relationship matters (e.g., bank account openings); conducting frequent bank meetings to facilitate considerable interaction and communication; measuring performance using pre-determined and agreed KPIs and comprehensive and well structured Service Level Agreements (SLAs); and implementing virtual bank accounts and in-house banks to significantly reduce transaction costs.
Market leading criteria for ‘Perform cash flow and cash flow position forecasting’ capability 4408 may include: continuously analyzing treasury to quickly assess the amount of cash that is available and required to eliminate manual involvement and provides more timely cash flow information. Continuously analyzing treasury (e.g., revenue levels, customer mix, interest rates, DSO, A/R write offs and payroll costs) may allow treasury to anticipate significant surpluses and shortfalls, and realize a true picture of global cash and plan for pooling, netting and inter-company lending. Market leading criteria for ‘Perform cash flow and cash flow position forecasting’ capability 4408 may further include: implementing treasury systems that are integrated with ERP, EPM and other key finance and operations systems; implementing automated reconciliations; deploying algorithms to clear open items automatically; and implementing real-time updates to GL.



 

 
 



TABLE 30


 


Treasury & Cash Management 146 -


Market Leading Criteria 214


 




 




Perform Treasury
A global treasury management model with 


Governance
centralized control 


Activities
Treasury policies are clearly defined and 


4402 
accepted by the board 


 
Treasury activities are centralized through a corporate 


 
treasury function 


 
Corporate treasury has extensive control over the cash 


 
operations of the business/organization units 


 
Roles and responsibilities of treasury practitioners are 


 
clearly defined - all treasury practitioners understand 


 
their role and responsibilities 


 
Treasury is fully integrated with both finance and the 


 
broader organization 


 
Treasury is regarded as an important component in 


 
strategic business decision making and is consulted 


 
before all major business decisions are made 


 
Treasury has significant interaction with the planning 


 
and budgeting process. 


 
Key Performance Indicators (KPIs) are used to track 


 
performance of treasury activities. 


 
External benchmarks regularly used to assess 


 
effectiveness of the treasury function 


 
Treasury has a formal service management process in 


 
place 


Perform Banking
One (or a few) primary global banking relationship(s) 


& Cash 
for all cash management activities 


Management
Banking relationships managed centrally 


Activities 
Treasury manages each bank relationship proactively 


4404
The performance of each bank is measured 


 
Proactive steps taken to identify the preferred banking 


 
relationship by region 


 
Central ownership and management of cash 


 
Cash swept daily from global banking partner 


 
accounts with total visibility into daily balances 


 
Treasury has visibility of all cash balances of 


 
all operating units 


 
Cash position is available online from all organization 


 
units Cash position is generated on a daily basis 


 
Minimal idle balances exist; cash is effectively 


 
managed and invested across the organization 


 
Treasury takes ownership for managing the 


 
inter-organization loan book 


 
inter-organization transactions are calculated and 


 
executed on virtual treasury accounts 


 
Cash surpluses are pooled (ZBA or notional) 


 
In-house bank used to facilitate optimized cash 


 
management 


 
Accurate and continuous cash flow forecasting 


 
Cash flow forecasting fully integrated with other 


 
forecasting activities 


 
Cash flow forecasting process and tool allows 


 
scenario planning/“what if” analysis 


 
System produced cash flow statement 


 
Cash flow forecasts incorporate cash flows from all 


 
BUs Horizon for CFF is at least one year 


 
Cash flow forecast covers all cash inflows and 


 
outflows


 
Cash flow forecasts, like other forecasts, should be 


 
driver based 


 
Consider cyclical and seasonal variability in cash 


 
flow forecasts 


 
Direct method of cash forecasting (the weekly cash 


 
flow statement) reconciled to the indirect method 


 
(working capital) 


 
Cash flow forecasts are kept simple - minimize the


 
number of line items forecasted 


 
Forecasting accuracy is measured (actual vs. forecast)


 
to gauge accuracy and areas for improvement 


 
Central coordination of forecasts; BU/region 


 
cash flows are consolidated into a global total 


 
Scenario analysis used to test sensitivity of 


 
cash flow to various drivers 


 
Cash flow forecasting used to identify areas 


 
for operational improvement (e.g., A/R management) 


 
and to aid in strategic decision making 


 
Treasury systems fully integrated with other 


 
key systems


 
Bank statements are obtained electronically 


 
Bank account reconciliations are automated using 


 
electronic bank files 


 
Bank statements are reconciled on a daily basis 


Manage Foreign
Coordinated, comprehensive, organization-wide risk 


Exchange
management strategy with active treasury 


—
involvement at a strategic level 


 
A global foreign exchange management model with 


 
centralized control, formal policies, and limited local 


 
autonomy to make transactions 


 
Effective currency hedging program resulting in 


 
immaterial foreign exchange gains/losses - both 


 
transaction and translation related 


 
Consistent netting is used to reduce the amount of 


 
FX trades and consolidate the remainder into large 


 
trade with better rates


 





Table 31 provides an explanation of the corporate tax capability 148, key assessment areas within the capability, and corresponding performance capability criteria. FIG. 46 illustrates capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the corporate tax capability 148.



 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 31


 


Corporate Tax 148


 




 




Description: 
Includes tax planning, tax accounting & reporting, 


 
and tax audit 




Tax Strategy and Focus 




Basic Criteria:
Focus around tax compliance efficiency and 


210 
minimizing cost. Tax viewed as cost center and 


 
operator.


Competitive 
Focus around tax planning strategies. Tax viewed 


Criteria: 
as value creator. 


212 
 


Market Leading
Focus around business transaction optimization. 


Criteria: 
Tax viewed as a profit center and business advisor.


214 
 




Tax Planning 




Basic Criteria:
No documentation of tax strategies including 


210 
accounting impact and implementation steps. 


 
Unstructured/ad hoc approach to assessing risks 


 
associated with tax strategies.


Competitive 
Ad hoc documentation; accounting impact and 


Criteria: 
implementation steps sent in email. Unstructured 


212 
approach to assessing risks associated with tax 


 
strategies. Qualitative assessment of tax strategy risks. 


Market Leading
Standardized processes for documenting tax strategies, 


Criteria:
implementation steps, and monitoring requirements. 


214 
Utilization of a standardized process and technology 


 
to quantitatively assess the financial, legal, and 


 
audit risks associated with a planning strategy. 




Tax Accounting & Reporting 




Basic Criteria: 
Completely disparate tax accounting & tax compliance 


210 
processes; all compliance & tax accounting filing are


 
done independent of each other. 


Competitive
Quarterly review of tax-sensitive data for issues. 


Criteria:
Compliance data is synchronized; but the provision


212 
continue to operate separate from the compliance


 
filings.


Market Leading
Monthly review and remediation of tax-sensitive 


Criteria:
transactions. All tax accounting and compliance 


214
files are based off of the same data ensuring data


 
consistency and continuity. 




Tax Audit Management 




Basic Criteria:
Audit function distinct and silo'd from both Planning 


210 
and Compliance functions. Audits conducted and 


 
information requests completed as required by local 


 
authorities. Audits coordinated and managed locally. 


Competitive
Audit processes integrated with Planning 


Criteria:
and Compliance. Historical Audits evaluated to


212
determine potential recurring inquiries. 


 
Local Audit activities communicated globally. 


Market Leading
Audit materials developed in real-time as 


Criteria:
planning and compliance activities are performed. 


214 
Audits managed and coordinated globally. 




Tax Governance 




Basic Criteria:
Limited written tax-specific policies & procedures. 


210 
Targets not aligned with business or 


 
broader financial targets.


Competitive 
Documented but silo'd policies or procedures. 


Criteria: 
Targets aligned to financial targets 


212 
 


Market Leading
Integrated tax policies & procedures with all tax 


Criteria: 
processes. Targets aligned to business targets as well 


214 
as customer and employee performance targets. 




Tax Master Data & Document Management 




Basic Criteria:
High degree of manual activities related to data 


210 
and document management. Financial data 


 
NOT tax-sensitized. Tax data resides in multiple 


 
disparate systems and spreadsheets. 


Competitive 
Financial data and operational data tax-sensitized. 


Criteria: 
Tax data collection and reconciliations


212 
streamlined and automated. Automation used 


 
to reduce data collection and scrubbing.


Market Leading
Tax data and documents centralized and organized for 


Criteria: 
optimal effectiveness. Data Management 


214 
performed by internal/external providers enabling tax 


 
professionals to focus on planning and analysis.


 





Table 32 provides an explanation of the financial risk management capability 150, key assessment areas within the capability and corresponding performance capability criteria. FIG. 47 illustrates capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the financial risk management capability 150.
Market leading criteria for financial risk management capability 150 may address a variety of enterprise-wide risks, including: business risk; operational risk; credit risk which refers to the possibility of loss due to default by a counter-party or customer; and market risk which represents the possibility of loss due to adverse movement in market prices. Market leading criteria for financial risk management capability 150 may address: liquidity risk arising from the possibility of failure to meet short-term cash commitments. Foreign Exchange/Currency Risk is a specific example of market risk that represents the possibility of loss to movement in foreign exchange rates. Business risk is the risk of adverse outcomes due to competitive pressures and/or poor decisions concerning strategy, products, markets, and structures. Operational risk is defined as the exposure to loss from inadequate or failed internal processes, people, and systems. Regulatory/Compliance Risk addresses failure to meet compliance/regulatory requirements resulting in financial penalties and/or reputation damage. Legal Risk arises when an organization becomes subject to financial loss and/or reputation damage as a result of legal actions brought against the company.



 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 32


 


Financial Risk Management 150


 




 




Description: 
Financial Risk Management is the identification, 


 
assessment, measurement, management and mitigation 


 
of financial risks across the entire enterprise 




Risk Portfolio 




Basic Criteria:
Inconsistent identification and quantification of risks; 


210 
risks are addressed individually; no integrated 


 
management of risk portfolio 


Competitive 
Active focus on identification, quantification, and 


Criteria: 
mitigation of risks; but not managed as a portfolio 


212 
or in the context of business strategy. 


Market Leading
Risk is optimized and managed as an enterprise wide 


Criteria: 
“risk portfolio” in the context of business strategy 


214 
 




Organization 




Basic Criteria: 
De-centralized, stand-alone, and sometimes redundant 


210 
risk management activities 


Competitive 
Some coordination of risk management activities; 


Criteria:
centralized risk management group but with


212 
exceptions


Market Leading
Centralized, fully integrated risk management 


Criteria: 
utilized across the enterprise 


214 
 




Tools 




Basic Criteria:
Manual, spreadsheet reliant risk management 


210 
 


Competitive
Risk management tools used for selected risks; data 


Criteria:
gathering partially integrated with enterprise systems 


212 
 


Market Leading 
Effective tools to manage both individual risks 


Criteria:
as well as the overall risk portfolio; data gathering 


214
integrated with enterprise systems 




Impact




Basic Criteria:
Risks facing the business are not always identified 


210
or well understood; risk tolerance and mitigation 


 
approach is inconsistent/ad-hoc and is not aligned 


 
with business strategy 


Competitive
Risks facing the business are generally identified 


Criteria: 
and well understood; risk tolerance and mitigation 


212 
approaches are in place, but are inconsistent and not 


 
always aligned with business strategy 


Market Leading
Risks facing the business are well understood; risk 


Criteria:
tolerance and mitigation approach is optimized based 


214 
on business strategy


 





Table 33 provides an explanation of the non-financial risk management capability 152, key assessment areas within the capability, and corresponding performance capability criteria. FIG. 48 illustrates capabilities within the finance process excellence framework multi-level hierarchy corresponding to the non-financial risk management capability 152.



 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 33


 


Non-Financial Risk Management 152


 




 




Description: 
Non-Financial Risk Management is the identification,


 
assessment, measurement, management and mitigation 


 
of non-financial risks across the entire enterprise.




Risk Portfolio 




Basic Criteria:
Inconsistent identification and quantification of risks; 


210 
risks are addressed individually; no integrated 


 
management of risk portfolio 


Competitive 
Active focus on identification, quantification, and 


Criteria: 
mitigation of risks; but not managed as a portfolio or in 


212 
the context of business strategy 


Market Leading
Risk is optimized and managed as an enterprise 


Criteria: 
wide “risk portfolio” in the context of business strategy 


214 
 




Organization 




Basic Criteria:
De-centralized, stand-alone, and sometimes 


210 
redundant risk management activities 


Competitive
Some coordination of risk management activities; 


Criteria:
centralized risk management group but with exceptions 


212 
 


Market Leading
Centralized, fully integrated risk management utilized 


Criteria:
across the enterprise 


214 
 




Tools 




Basic Criteria:
Manual, spreadsheet reliant risk management 


210
 


Competitive
Risk management tools used for selected risks; data 


Criteria: 
gathering partially integrated with enterprise systems 


212 
 


Market Leading 
Effective tools to manage both individual risks as well 


Criteria: 
as the overall risk portfolio; data gathering integrated 


214 
with enterprise systems 




Impact 




Basic Criteria:
Risks facing the business are not always identified or 


210
well understood; risk tolerance and mitigation approach 


 
is inconsistent/ad-hoc and is not aligned with business 


 
strategy 


Competitive 
Risks facing the business are generally identified and 


Criteria: 
well understood; risk tolerance and mitigation 


212 
approaches are in place, but are inconsistent and not 


 
always aligned with business strategy 


Market Leading
Risks facing the business are well understood; risk 


Criteria: 
tolerance and mitigation approach is optimized 


214 
based on business strategy


 





Table 34 provides an explanation of the finance process excellence platform 102, key assessment areas within the platform, and corresponding performance capability criteria.



 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 

 

 
 



TABLE 34


 


Finance Process Excellence 102


 




 




Description:
Finance process excellence is a framework that may be 


 
implemented as a multi-level hierarchy encompassing 


 
all processes for which a CFO may be accountable. 




Finance Function Management




Basic Criteria:
Inconsistent identification and quantification of risks; 


210 
risks are addressed individually; no integrated 


 
management of risk portfolio 


Competitive
Active focus on identification, quantification, and 


Criteria: 
mitigation of risks; but not managed as a portfolio 


212 
or in the context of business strategy 


Market Leading
Risk is optimized and managed as an enterprise wide 


Criteria: 
“risk portfolio” in the context of business strategy 


214 
 




Organization 




Basic Criteria:
De-centralized, stand-alone, and sometimes redundant 


210 
risk management activities 


Competitive
Some coordination of risk management activities; 


Criteria: 
centralized risk management group but with exceptions 


212 
 


Market Leading 
Centralized, fully integrated risk management utilized 


Criteria: 
across the enterprise 


214 
 




Tools 




Basic Criteria:
Manual, spreadsheet reliant risk management 


210 
 


Competitive
Risk management tools used for selected risks; data 


Criteria: 
gathering partially integrated with enterprise systems 


212 
 


Market Leading 
Effective tools to manage both individual risks as 


Criteria:
well as the overall risk portfolio; data gathering 


214 
integrated with enterprise systems 




Impact 




Basic Criteria:
Risks facing the business are not always identified 


210 
or well understood; risk tolerance and mitigation 


 
approach is inconsistent/ad-hoc and is not aligned


 
with business strategy 


Competitive 
Risks facing the business are generally identified and 


Criteria:
well understood; risk tolerance and mitigation 


212 
approaches are in place, but are inconsistent and 


 
not always aligned with business strategy 


Market Leading
Risks facing the business are well understood; risk 


Criteria:
tolerance and mitigation approach is optimized 


214 
based on business strategy


 





 FIG. 5 shows a multidimensional industry performance reference set 500 (“reference set 500” that is also referred to as the “capability detail pool”) that provides a capability detail pool from which the system described below may obtain benchmarking tables for a business. The reference set 500 includes multiple key assessment performance reference tables (“reference tables”), two of which are labeled 502 and 504. Each reference table may provide the benchmarking criteria for a specific capability, such as those noted above with respect to FIG. 1.
One dimension of each table may establish a ‘Basic’ performance capability level 210 specifying ‘Basic’ finance function performance assessment criteria, a ‘Competitive’ performance capability level 212 specifying ‘Competitive’ finance function performance assessment criteria, and a ‘Market Leading’ performance capability level 214 specifying ‘Market Leading’ finance function performance assessment criteria. Another dimension of each table may specify one or more key assessment areas (KAAs), several of which are labeled 506, 508, and 510. As noted above, performance capability criteria, e.g., the PCC 512, populates each key assessment performance reference table to provide benchmark criteria for ‘Basic’, ‘Competitive’, and ‘Market Leading’ characteristics.
The reference set 500 represents the FF-HPCA model 100. Consistent with the FF-HPCA model 100, the reference set 500 may organize multiple reference tables into a hierarchical structure defining discrete changes in granularity. In one implementation, the hierarchical structure includes reference tables, sub-platforms, platforms, and models. FIG. 5 labels three sub-platforms 514, 516, and 518. With reference to FIG. 1, examples of sub-platforms include finance function management platform 104, finance and accounting operations platform 106, enterprise performance management platform 108, corporate finance platform 110, and enterprise risk management platform 112. The reference set 500 may further organize the sub-platforms into platforms, two of which are labeled 520 and 522. Platforms aggregate into the FF-HPCA model 100 and corresponding reference set 500. Additional, different, or fewer levels of granularity may be defined in the FF-HPCA model 100.
The reference set 500 may dynamically populate the reference tables with the most up-to-date performance capability criteria, for example upon retrieval and presentation by a business analysis consultant. The performance capability criteria may be retrieved from a performance capability criteria database or other information source.
 FIG. 5 also shows an example of a database implementation 524 of a portion of a reference table. In particular, the database implementation 524 includes records (e.g., the records 526, 528, 530) that establish each PCC. In the example shown in FIG. 5, each record includes a PCC field 532, a Capability Specifier field 534, a KAA specifier field 536. Other fields may be provided, such as a reference table assignment field or reference set assignment field. The records categorize each PCC into a specific category (e.g., Basic), into a specific KAA, and, optionally, into a specific reference table in a specific reference set for any particular FF-HPCA model.
 FIG. 6 shows a high performance capability assessment system (“system”) 600. The system 600 includes a processor 602 and a memory 604. Several databases support the operation of the system 600, including a performance capability database 606, a performance measured database 608, a capability detail pool database 610, and an assessment results database 626. The system 600 may include a local display 612 and input/output interfaces 617 (e.g., including a keyboard, mouse, microphone, speakers, or other device), and, through the communication interface 614 and networks 616, may communicate with remote devices 618 and remote displays 620. The networks 616 may be any combination of external networks (e.g., the Internet) and internal networks (e.g., corporate LANs). The displays 612 and 620 may, for example, present performance capability assessment models 622 that the system 600 retrieves from the capability detail pool database 610 for review, modification, and application by process engineers or other individuals. With regard to local access or access by the remote devices 618, the system 600 may include a login processing program 624 to authenticate and/or authorize access to the system 600. To that end, the login processing program 624 may include username/password verification, private/public key encryption, or other validation and data protection capabilities.
In one implementation, the performance capability database 606 stores performance capability criteria. As will be described in more detail below, the system 600 may populate performance capability assessment models with performance capability criteria suited to any particular platform (e.g., vision and strategy platform 102, core functions platform 104 and support functions platform 106) and business capability at one or more capability levels across one or more key assessment areas. The performance measured database 608 may store the determined, measured, or otherwise ascertained characteristics, criteria, and other measured data of a particular key assessment area as representative practice data 648. The representative practice data 648 may be obtained through interviews with process engineers, through online questionnaires, through manual or automated analysis of business data (e.g., year end operating reports), or in other manners. The capability detail pool database 610 stores the capability detail pool 500, which includes pre-defined performance capability assessment models 622. The assessment results database 626 stores determined capability levels for specific capabilities that have been analyzed.
The system 600 facilitates the review, modification, creation, and application of performance capability assessment models. In that role, performance capability assessment model manipulation logic (“manipulation logic”) 646 within the system 600 creates, retrieves, and stores capability assessment data 628 in the memory 604. The manipulation logic 646 may establish capability assessment data 628 in the memory 604, including a capability assessment data structure 630 with multiple capability levels (“CL”) 632 organized along a capability scale dimension, multiple key assessment areas (“KAA”) 634 organized along a key factor dimension, and performance capability criteria (“PCC”) 636 that populates the performance capability assessment model 630. The manipulation logic 646 may vary widely in implementation, and, as one example, may include data storage logic 652 that saves data in memory and user interface logic that accepts capability level specifications, key assessment area specifications and performance capability criteria inputs to create new performance capability assessment models, modify existing performance capability assessment models, delete performance capability assessment models, or retrieve performance capability assessment models for review. In one implementation, the manipulation logic 646 establishes the capability assessment data structure 630 to include a multidimensional finance function performance reference set that includes multiple key assessment performance reference tables in which the key assessment performance reference tables include a ‘Basic’ performance capability level, a ‘Competitive’ performance capability level and a ‘Market Leading’ performance capability level.
The capability assessment data 628 may also include a capability position specifier 638. The capability position specifier 638 may record the capability level along the performance capability scale 216, as determined for any particular capability. Thus, the system 600 may store the capability level in the assessment results database 626 or elsewhere for future retrieval and review.
In one implementation, the data population logic 640 may be a data population program executed by the processor 602 that populates template performance capability assessment models. For example, the data population logic 640 may include input logic 650 that accepts input specifying a capability of interest that indicates a particular performance capability assessment model. The data population logic 640 may include query logic 645 that executes database queries and prompts a user for input to obtain the corresponding performance capability criteria for the capability of interest.
In one implementation, as an example, the query logic 645 may receive an input specifying a finance function area and finance function key assessment area with the finance function area for analysis. The query logic 645 searches the multidimensional finance function performance reference set for a matching key assessment performance reference table that matches the finance function area and the finance function key assessment area, and retrieves the matching key assessment performance reference table.
The data population logic 640 may further include storage logic that adds the retrieved performance capability criteria to the template performance capability assessment model. The data population logic 640 produces populated performance capability assessment models 642 that may be stored in the capability detail pool database 610.
In addition to the analysis process described above, the system 600 may provide an automated analysis of representative practice data 648 that identifies relevant performance capability criteria and determines the position on the performance capability scale 216 of each key assessment area corresponding to the performance capability criteria for the representative practice data 648. As one example, the system 600 may implement capability assessment logic 644 that includes comparison and/or matching logic that analyzes the representative practice data 648 with respect to performance capability criteria to locate key assessment areas for which the system 600 can determine capability levels to obtain a resultant performance capability level for each key assessment area.
Furthermore, the capability assessment logic 644 may determine an overall position on the performance capability scale 216, shown in FIG. 6 as the capability position specifier 638, for a capability under examination given the knowledge of where the key assessment areas corresponding to the capability under examination fall in each capability level. Thus, for example, the capability assessment logic 644 may determine an overall capability level for a capability corresponding to the capability level for the majority of the key assessment areas, or it may apply a weighted analysis technique to give more emphasis to some key assessment areas than others in determining the overall position on the performance capability scale 216 for a capability. As another example, the capability assessment logic 644 may implement an expert system (e.g., based on a neural network trained on prior determinations) that analyzes the determined characteristics with respect to the performance capability criteria and ascertains where the capability under examination falls along the performance capability scale 216 for each of the key assessment areas, or overall on the performance capability scale 216.
 FIG. 7 shows a flow diagram 700 for creating performance capability assessment models. The performance capability assessment model creator (e.g., the manipulation logic 646) establishes a key factor dimension for the performance capability assessment model (702). As one specific example, the performance capability assessment model creator establishes, in the key factor dimension, key assessment areas: a new product development key assessment area 130, a engineering key assessment area 132, a product lifecycle management key assessment area 134, a procurement strategy key assessment area 136, a strategic sourcing and category management key assessment area 138, a requisition to pay key assessment area 140, a supplier relationship management key assessment area 142, a production forecasting planning and scheduling key assessment area 144, a inbound logistics key assessment area 146, a manufacturing and assembly key assessment area 148, and a outbound logistics key assessment area 150.
The performance capability assessment model creator also establishes a capability scale dimension for the performance capability assessment model (704). The capability scale dimension may define a scale of increasing organizational capability. For example, the structure creator may create a ‘Basic’ capability level 210, a ‘Competitive’ capability level 212, and a ‘Market Leading’ capability level 214.
The performance capability assessment model creator also populates the performance capability assessment model with performance capability criteria (706). A capability detail pool 500 may be formed to hold multiple tailored key assessment performance reference tables (708). The performance capability assessment model creator may store the populated assessment structure in the capability detail pool for subsequent retrieval and analysis (710).
 FIG. 8 shows a flow diagram 800 for retrieving and applying performance capability assessment models. A selection of a capability to be analyzed is obtained (802). In one implementation, the system 600 receives input data that specifies a finance function area and a finance function key assessment area for analysis. For example, the system 600 may accept input from a business consultant that specifies a capability for analysis. The system 600 may query the capability detail pool 500 for a corresponding performance capability assessment model (804). The corresponding performance capability assessment model may be pre-defined in the capability detail pool 500, or the data population logic 630 (or other actor) may populate a performance capability assessment model template that the system 600 newly creates, or that the system 600 retrieves from a data store, such as the capability detail pool database 610.
In another example, the system 600 searches the multidimensional finance function performance reference set (e.g., capability detail pool) 500 for a matching key assessment performance reference table based on the input data that specifies a finance process excellence platform and finance process excellence key assessment area. The system 600 retrieves the matching key assessment performance reference table and initiates analysis of the matching key assessment performance reference table to obtain a resultant performance capability level for the finance process excellence key assessment area.
The system 600 obtains representative practice data 648 for the capability under examination in the specific business under review (806). For example, a business consultant may interview the business to determine how the business currently executes the capability under review. As another example, a representative from the business may complete a questionnaire, submit business data for analysis and parameter extraction, or otherwise provide the characteristics of their current capability execution. As a further example, the system 600 may retrieve the representative practice data 648 from a database of previously obtained representative practice data.
The system 600 compares the representative practice data 648 to the performance capability criteria in the performance capability assessment model (808). For example, a business consultant may use their expertise to arrive at a determination of capability level for the business and the capability under examination (810). Alternatively or additionally, the capability assessment logic 644 may perform an automated analysis of the assessment results data in the assessment results database 626 and ascertain the capability level on the performance capability scale 216 (810). The system 600 may store the assessment results, including the determined capability level, for future reference in the assessment results database 626 or other location (812).
 FIG. 9 shows a flow diagram 900 for analyzing representative practice data 648 to determine a key assessment area to which the representative practice data applies. The system 600 receives representative practice data 648 as input data (902). The system 600 may receive the representative practice data 648 from a database query performed by the query logic 645 that the query logic 645 executes periodically, when instructed by an operator, and/or automatically against any number of available database sources that store representative practice data 648. The capability assessment logic 644 analyzes the representative practice data 648 to identify performance capability criteria in the capability detail pool 500 that the capability assessment logic 644 determines relevant to the representative practice data 648 (904). For example, the capability assessment logic 644 may compare and/or match the content of the representative practice data 648 with the performance capability criteria using natural language processing (NLP), text string and/or substring matching, by comparing tags linked to the representative practice data 648 and that specify that any portion of the representative practice data 648 is applicable to a specific PCC, by querying for a manual classification of the representative practice data 648 to a PCC, or other matching technique. The capability assessment logic 644 may score and/or weight a performance capability criteria and compare the score and/or weight to a user specified relevance threshold to rank the relevance of the performance capability criteria to the representative practice data 648 (906). The user may specify particular terms and/or phrases to search and match between the performance capability criteria and the representative practice data 648, in order to score the performance capability criteria.
The capability assessment logic 644 may determine, based on the number of performance capability criteria that meet or exceed the relevance threshold, that the capability assessment logic 644 has identified a sufficient number of performance capability criteria for a specific key assessment area in order to determine a performance capability level for the capability as a whole or any key assessment area within the capability (908). As one example, where at least 51% of the performance capability criteria for a particular key assessment area meet or exceed the relevance threshold, the capability assessment logic 644 applies the performance capability criteria to the representative practice data 648. In another example, the performance capability criteria for a particular key assessment area may be ranked in importance and/or designated as mandatory in order to assess the key assessment area. In the event the capability assessment logic 644 identifies the mandatory performance capability criteria for a key assessment area the capability assessment logic 644 applies the performance capability criteria to the representative practice data 648.
The capability assessment logic 644 may apply the performance capability criteria meeting or exceeding the relevance threshold to the representative practice data 648 to determine whether any particular PCC is met. Accordingly, as the capability assessment logic 644 analyzes the PCC, the system 600 tracks the best fit of the representative practice data 648 to the PCCs in the key assessment performance reference tables. In other words, the system 600 determines how the representative practice data 648 meets (or does not meet) each PCC, thereby gaining insight into whether the representative practice data 648 is indicative of Basic, Competitive, or Market Leading practices.
The system 600 may also gauge the position on the performance capability scale 216 of each key assessment area corresponding to the performance capability criteria (910). The capability assessment logic 644 may further determine an overall position on the performance capability scale 216 for a capability (912). The capability assessment logic 644 may established that a desired number and/or designated mandatory performance capability criteria for the key assessment areas have been identified as relevant to a capability and sufficient to determine the position on the performance capability scale 216 for the capability. For example, the capability assessment logic 644 may determine an overall capability level for the capability based on the capability level determined for the majority of the key assessment areas. The capability assessment logic 644 may apply a weighted analysis technique to give more emphasis to some key assessment areas than others in determining the overall position on the performance capability scale 216 for the capability.
Although selected aspects, features, or components of the implementations are depicted as being stored in computer-readable memories (e.g., as computer-executable instructions or performance capability assessment models), all or part of the systems and structures may be stored on, distributed across, or read from other computer-readable media. The computer-readable media may include, for example, secondary storage devices such as hard disks, floppy disks, and CD-ROMs; a signal, such as a signal received from a network or received at an antenna; or other forms of memory, including ROM or RAM, either currently known or later developed.
Various implementations of the system may include additional or different components. A processor may be implemented as a microprocessor, a microcontroller, a DSP, an application specific integrated circuit (ASIC), discrete logic, or a combination of other types of circuits or logic. Similarly, memories may be DRAM, SRAM, Flash or any other type of memory. The processing capability of the system may be distributed among multiple system components, such as among multiple processors and memories, optionally including multiple distributed processing systems. Parameters, databases, and other data structures may be separately stored and managed, may be incorporated into a single memory or database, may be logically and physically organized in many different ways, and may implemented in many ways, including data structures such as linked lists, hash tables, or implicit storage mechanisms. Programs may be combined or split among multiple programs, or distributed across several memories and processors.
The FF-HPCA model provides unexpectedly good results for a performance capability assessment model, particularly in the finance functions of organizations. In particular, the combinations of key assessment areas and particular assessment criteria of the FF-HPCA model, including the criteria noted in Tables 1-34 above, provide significant advantages over other assessment models. The unexpectedly good results include clearly identifying and delineating from among multiple related complex processes specific processes to improve, and how to improve the process and identifying concrete and measurable improvement goals.
While various embodiments of the invention have been described, it will be apparent to those of ordinary skill in the art that many more embodiments and implementations are possible within the scope of the invention. Accordingly, the invention is not to be restricted except in light of the attached claims and their equivalents.